Ohio, session 136, HB379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed 2
in the name of the state conveying to one or more purchaser or 3
purchasers, their heirs, successors, and assigns all of the 4
State's right, title, and interest in the following described 5
real estate: 6
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Greene, in the 7
City of Xenia, in Virginia Military Survey 548. 8
Beginning at the North West corner of Lot No. 12 of Block 9
7 of Frank W. Dodds 2nd Addition to the City of Xenia; 10
Thence with the W line of said Lot No. 12 and the East 11
line of Detroit Boulevard, South 20 feet to a point in the West 12
line of said Lot; 13
Thence at right angles to the West line of said lot, 16 14
feet to the point of beginning of the following description: 15
Thence, Southwardly, parallel and 16 feet East of the West 16
line of Lot No. 12 and Lot No. 1, 289 feet to a point 35 feet 17
North of the North line of Park Drive; 18
Thence, in a Northeasterly direction, parallel with the 19

H. B. No. 379 Page 2
As Introduced
North line of Park Drive and 30 feet from the same, 444 feet to 20
a point; 21
Thence, in a Northwesterly direction 29 feet to a point 20 22
feet South of the South line of Weaver Street; 23
Thence, in a Westerly direction, parallel with the South 24
line of said Weaver Street and 20 feet South of same, 340 feet 25
to the beginning of this description, containing 54,444 square 26
feet (1.25 acres). The above described tract is parts of Lot 27
Nos. 1 – 2 – 3 – 4 – 5 – 6 – 7 – 8 – 9 – 10 – 11 – 12 of Block 28
No. 7 of Frank W. Dodds Second Addition to Xenia as recorded in 29
Plat Book No. 2, Page 102 – 103 (now known as Plat Cabinet 31, 30
Pages 267B-268A) of Greene County Plat Records. 31
Parcel Number(s): M40000200040012600, M40000200040012700, 32
M40000200040012800, M40000200040012900, M40000200040013000, 33
M40000200040013100, M40000200040013200, M40000200040013300, 34
M40000200040013400, M40000200040013500, M40000200040013600, 35
M40000200040013700 36
Prior Instrument: Deed Book 145, Page 118 - Greene County 37
Recorder 38
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 39
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 40
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 41
facilitate recordation of the deed. 42
(B)(1) The conveyance shall include the improvements and 43
chattels situated on the real estate, and is subject to all 44
leases, agreements, licenses, permits, memoranda of 45
understanding, easements, covenants, conditions, reservations, 46
and restrictions of record, and encroachments whether of record 47
or not; all legal highways and public rights of way; zoning, 48

H. B. No. 379 Page 3
As Introduced
building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and 49
regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due 50
and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, 51
where-is, with all faults" condition. 52
(2) The deed or deeds for the conveyance of the real 53
estate may contain restrictions, exceptions, reservations, 54
reversionary interests, and other terms and conditions the 55
Director of Administrative Services determines to be in the best 56
interest of the State. 57
(3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, 58
exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms 59
and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the 60
State or the Adjutant General's Department without the necessity 61
of further legislation. 62
(4) The real estate described above shall be conveyed 63
only if the Director of Administrative Services and the Director 64
of the Adjutant General's Department first have determined that 65
the real estate is surplus real property no longer needed by the 66
State and that the conveyance is in the best interest of the 67
State. 68
(C) The Director of Administrative Services shall conduct 69
a sale of the real estate by sealed bid auction or public 70
auction, and the real estate shall be sold to the highest bidder 71
at a price acceptable to the Director of Administrative Services 72
and the Adjutant General's Department. The Department of 73
Administrative Services shall advertise the sealed bid auction 74
or public auction by publication in a newspaper of general 75
circulation in Greene County, once a week for three consecutive 76
weeks before the date on which the sealed bids are to be opened. 77
The Director of Administrative Services shall notify the 78

H. B. No. 379 Page 4
As Introduced
successful bidder or bidders in writing. The Director of 79
Administrative Services may reject any or all bids. 80
The purchaser shall pay ten percent of the purchase price 81
to the Director of Administrative Services within five business 82
days after receiving the notice the bid has been accepted. When 83
the deposit has been received, the Director and purchaser or 84
purchasers shall enter into a real estate purchase agreement, in 85
the form prescribed by the Department of Administrative 86
Services. The purchaser or purchasers shall pay the balance of 87
the purchase price to the Department of Administrative Services 88
within sixty days after receiving notice the bid has been 89
accepted, or at closing. Payment may be made by bank draft or 90
certified check made payable to the Treasurer of State. A 91
purchaser who does not complete the conditions of the sale as 92
prescribed in this division shall forfeit ten percent of the 93
purchase price paid to the State as liquidated damages. If a 94
purchaser fails to complete the purchase, the Director of 95
Administrative Services may accept the next highest bid, subject 96
to the foregoing conditions. If the Director of Administrative 97
Services rejects all bids, the Department of Administrative 98
Services may repeat the sealed bid auction or public auction, or 99
may use an alternative sale process that is acceptable to the 100
Adjutant General's Department. 101
The Adjutant General's Department shall pay advertising 102
and other costs incident to the sale of the real estate. 103
(D) The real estate described in division (A) of this 104
section shall be sold as an entire tract and not in parcels. 105
(E) Except as otherwise specified above, the purchaser 106
shall pay all costs associated with the purchase, closing and 107
conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, 108

H. B. No. 379 Page 5
As Introduced
transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and 109
any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. 110
The proceeds of the sale of the real estate shall be 111
deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Fund 5340 112
ALI 745612, Armory Improvements, under section 5911.10 of the 113
Revised Code. 114
(F) Upon execution of the real estate purchase agreement, 115
the Director of Administrative Services, with the assistance of 116
the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the 117
real estate described in division (A) of this section. The 118
Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be 119
executed by the Governor in the name of the State, countersigned 120
by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the 121
State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services 122
for recording, and delivered to the Grantee(s). The Grantee(s) 123
shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of 124
the Greene County Recorder. 125
(G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 126
date. 127
Section 2. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed 128
in the name of the State conveying to one or more purchaser or 129
purchasers, their heirs, successors and assigns all of the 130
State's right, title, and interest in the following described 131
real estate: 132
Situated in the City of Dover, County of Tuscarawas, and 133
State of Ohio and being part of the 3rd Quarter of Township 9, 134
Range 2 of the United States Military Lands; being part of the 135
tract (PN: 15-05312-000) conveyed to The State of Ohio in Vol. 136
538, Pg. 554 and being more fully described as follows: 137

H. B. No. 379 Page 6
As Introduced
Beginning at the northeast corner of a tract conveyed to 138
Ohio Department of Transportation in Vol. 1268, Pg. 2284, being 139
2.07 feet right of Sta. 133+30.75 of the centerline of right of 140
way of Ohio Ave. (C.R. 80) as shown on the TUS-77-24.50 R/W 141
Plans (2006); thence with Wooster Ave. and on the east line of 142
said Ohio Department of Transportation tract, South 26 Degrees 143
48 Minutes 43 Seconds East, a distance of 121.00 feet to the 144
southeast corner of said Ohio Department of Transportation tract 145
and being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING for the tract hereinafter 146
described, thence in a clockwise direction along the following 147
eight courses; 148
(1) Thence continuing with Wooster Ave. and on the east 149
line of said State of Ohio tract, South 26 Degrees 48 Minutes 43 150
Seconds East, a distance of 87.38 feet to a point; 151
(2) Thence through said State of Ohio tract on a new line 152
of division, South 63 Degrees 32 Minutes 07 Seconds West, 153
passing a 5/8-inch iron pin with cap "SHAFFER PS 8726" set at a 154
distance of 28.90 feet, a total distance of 389.47 feet to a 155
5/8-inch iron pin with cap "SHAFFER PS 8726" set; 156
(3) Thence North 69 Degrees 16 Minutes 14 Seconds West, a 157
distance of 68.78 feet to a 3/4-inch iron pin found on the west 158
line of said State of Ohio tract and on the east line of a 18.54 159
acre tract conveyed to Zimmer Orthopedic Surgical Products, Inc. 160
in Vol. 1064, Pg. 2292; 161
(4) Thence on said line, North 20 Degrees 37 Minutes 59 162
Seconds East, a distance of 318.28 feet to a 5/8-inch iron pin 163
with cap "SHAFFER PS 8726" set on the south right of way line of 164
said Ohio Ave. at the southwest corner of said Ohio Department 165
of Transportation tract; 166

H. B. No. 379 Page 7
As Introduced
(5) Thence on the south right of way line of said Ohio 167
Ave. and the south line of said Ohio Department of 168
Transportation tract, South 87 Degrees 03 Minutes 02 Seconds 169
East, a distance of 162.13 feet to a 5/8-inch iron pin with cap 170
"SHAFFER PS 8726" set at a point of curvature; 171
(6) Thence continuing on said line with a curve to the 172
right, having a radius of 50.00 feet, a central angle of 61 173
Degrees 49 Minutes 54 Seconds East, a chord bearing South 56 174
Degrees 08 Minutes 05 Seconds East, a chord length of 51.38 175
feet, an arc length of 53.96 feet to a 5/8 inch iron pin with 176
cap "SHAFFER PS 8726" set at a point of tangency on the west 177
right of way line of said Wooster Ave.; 178
(7) Thence continuing on the south line of said Ohio 179
Department of Transportation tract and the west right of way 180
line of said Wooster Ave, South 25 Degrees 13 Minutes 08 Seconds 181
East, a distance of 54.69 feet to an iron pin with cap 182
"QUICKSALL" found; 183
(8) Thence continuing on said line, North 64 Degrees 46 184
Minutes 52 Seconds East, passing an iron pin with cap 185
"QUICKSALL" found at a distance of 10.01 feet, a total distance 186
of 37.07 feet to the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING. 187
The above described tract contains 1.734 acres, more or 188
less, and is subject to all easements, restrictions, and 189
covenants of record. 190
Split from Tuscarawas County APN: 15-05312-000 191
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 192
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 193
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 194
facilitate recordation of the deed. 195

H. B. No. 379 Page 8
As Introduced
(B)(1) The conveyance shall include the improvements and 196
chattels situated on the real estate, and is subject to all 197
leases, agreements, licenses, permits, memoranda of 198
understanding, easements, covenants, conditions, reservations, 199
and restrictions of record, and encroachments whether of record 200
of not; all legal highways and public rights of way; zoning, 201
building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and 202
regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due 203
and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, 204
where-is, with all faults" condition. 205
(2) The deed for the conveyance of the real estate may 206
contain restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary 207
interests, and other terms and conditions the Director of 208
Administrative Services determines to be in the best interest of 209
the State. 210
(3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, 211
exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms 212
and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the 213
State or the Adjutant General's Department without the necessity 214
of further legislation. 215
(4) The real estate described above shall be conveyed only 216
if the Director of Administrative Services and the Director of 217
the Adjutant General's Department first have determined that the 218
real estate is surplus real property no longer needed by the 219
State and that the conveyance is in the best interest of the 220
State. 221
(C) The Director of Administrative Services shall conduct 222
a sale of the real estate by sealed bid auction or public 223
auction, and the real estate shall be sold to the highest bidder 224
at a price acceptable to the Director of Administrative Services 225

H. B. No. 379 Page 9
As Introduced
and the Adjutant General's Department. The Department of 226
Administrative Services shall advertise the sealed bid auction 227
or public auction by publication in a newspaper of general 228
circulation in Tuscarawas County, once a week for three 229
consecutive weeks before the date on which the sealed bids are 230
to be opened. The Director of Administrative Services shall 231
notify the successful bidder in writing. The Director of 232
Administrative Services may reject any or all bids. 233
The purchaser shall pay ten percent of the purchase price 234
to the Director of Administrative Services within five business 235
days after receiving the notice the bid has been accepted. When 236
the deposit has been received, the Director and purchaser shall 237
enter into a real estate purchase agreement, in the form 238
prescribed by the Department of Administrative Services. The 239
purchaser shall pay the balance of the purchase price to the 240
Department of Administrative Services within sixty days after 241
receiving notice the bid has been accepted, or at closing. 242
Payment may be made by bank draft or certified check made 243
payable to the Treasurer of State. A purchaser who does not 244
complete the conditions of the sale as prescribed in this 245
division shall forfeit the ten percent of the purchase price 246
paid to the State as liquidated damages. If a purchaser fails to 247
complete the purchase, the Director of Administrative Services 248
may accept the next highest bid, subject to the foregoing 249
conditions. If the Director of Administrative Services rejects 250
all bids, the Department of Administrative Services may repeat 251
the sealed bid auction or public auction, or may use an 252
alternative sale process that is acceptable to the Adjutant 253
General's Department. 254
The Adjutant General's Department shall pay advertising 255
and other costs incident to the sale of the real estate. 256

H. B. No. 379 Page 10
As Introduced
(D) The real estate described in division (A) of this 257
section shall be sold as an entire tract and not in parcels. 258
(E) Except as otherwise specified above, the purchaser 259
shall pay all costs associated with the purchase, closing, and 260
conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, 261
transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and 262
any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. 263
The proceeds of the sale of the real estate shall be 264
deposited into the state treasury to the credit of 5340 ALI 265
745612, Armory Improvements under section 5911.10 of the Revised 266
Code. 267
(F) Upon execution of the real estate purchase agreement, 268
the Director of Administrative Services, with the assistance of 269
the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the 270
real estate described in division (A) of this section. The 271
Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be 272
executed by the Governor in the name of the State, countersigned 273
by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the 274
State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services 275
for recording, and delivered to the Grantee(s). The Grantee(s) 276
shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of 277
the Tuscarawas County Recorder. 278
(G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 279
date. 280
Section 3. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed 281
in the name of the State conveying to The Board of Education of 282
the Eastland-Fairfield Career and Technical School District 283
("Grantee"), and its successors and assigns, all of the State's 284
right, title, and interest in the following described real 285

H. B. No. 379 Page 11
As Introduced
estate: 286
Tract A 287
Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, 288
State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 289
North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the 290
State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, 291
section 501.01 of the Revised Code; also being a portion of 292
school lands as described in a Journal Entry by the Office of 293
the Auditor of the State of Ohio, Volume 17, Page 48 (dated 294
7/14/1966), allocating a 40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin 295
County Joint Vocational School District, now known as The 296
Eastland-Fairfield Career and Technical Schools; being more 297
particularly described as follows: 298
Beginning at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of 299
the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 300
317; right-of-way varies) and the northerly right-of-way line of 301
Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in 302
"Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors 303
Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland 304
Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46, Page 93; said 305
point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as 306
transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, 307
as recorded in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, Parcel 22-WL, said 308
point being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, and from said beginning 309
point; running, 310
Along the northerly right-of-way line of Directors 311
Boulevard, North 85° 36' 06" West for a distance of 62.95' to an 312
iron pin set at a point of curvature; thence, 313
Along the northerly right-of-way line of Directors 314

H. B. No. 379 Page 12
As Introduced
Boulevard following a curve to the right having an arc length of 315
28.36', a radius of 25.00', a central angle of 65° 00' 00", and 316
a chord that bears North 53° 06' 06" West for a distance of 317
26.86' to an iron pin set at a point of tangency; thence, 318
Along the easterly right-of-way line of Directors 319
Boulevard, North 20° 36' 06" West for a distance of 216.10' to a 320
1" iron pipe found in the northerly line of said 40.00 acre 321
tract, said point being the southwesterly corner of a 3.381 acre 322
tract as conveyed to 4343 South Hamilton Road, LLC as described 323
in Instrument No. 199901040000730; thence, 324
Along the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and the 325
southerly line of said 3.381 acre tract, South 85° 36' 06" East 326
for a distance of 170.62' to a 1" iron pipe found, said point 327
being the southeasterly corner of said 3.381 acre tract, said 328
point being along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and 329
along the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road; thence, 330
Along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and along 331
the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road, South 04° 31' 332
49" West for a distance of 40.22' to a 1" iron pipe found; 333
thence, 334
Along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and along 335
the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road, South 02° 14' 336
23" West for a distance of 170.20' to the point of beginning, 337
containing 0.598 acres of land, more or less, as determined by 338
Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, Ohio License No. 7978, 339
based on a survey performed by The Kleingers Group in June, 340
2017. 341
Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the 342
State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), 343

H. B. No. 379 Page 13
As Introduced
with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors 344
Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS 345
survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935". 346
Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic 347
identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP". 348
Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, 349
ordinances or agreements of record. 350
Tract B 351
Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, 352
State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 353
North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the 354
State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, 355
section 501.01 of the Revised Code; also being a portion of 356
school lands as described in a Journal Entry by the Office of 357
the Auditor of the State of Ohio, Volume 17, Page 48 (dated 358
7/14/1966), allocating a 40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin 359
County Joint Vocational School District, now known as The 360
Eastland-Fairfield Career and Technical Schools; being more 361
particularly described as follows: 362
Beginning at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of 363
the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 364
317; right-of-way varies) and the southerly right-of-way line of 365
Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in 366
"Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors 367
Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland 368
Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46, Page 93; said 369
point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as 370
transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, 371
as recorded in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, Parcel 22-WL, said 372

H. B. No. 379 Page 14
As Introduced
point being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, and from said beginning 373
point running thence the following four courses along the 374
westerly right-of-way lines of Hamilton Road and along westerly 375
lines of said 7.507 acre tract: 376
(1) South 12° 10' 08" East for a distance of 104.34' to an 377
iron pin set; thence, 378
(2) South 04° 31' 49" West for a distance of 250.00' to an 379
iron pin set; thence, 380
(3) South 06° 26' 22" West for a distance of 300.17' to an 381
iron pin set; thence, 382
(4) South 01° 15' 35" West for a distance of 160.67' to a 383
point, said point referenced by an iron pin set that bears North 384
85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 5.00' from said corner, said 385
point also being along the northerly line of a 49.736 acre 386
tract, the residual of a 49.998 acre tract as conveyed to 387
Madison Local School District as described in Deed Book 3336, 388
Page 482; thence, 389
Along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and 390
along the northerly line of said 49.736 acre tract, North 85° 391
35' 40" West for a distance of 1496.33' to a point, passing over 392
an iron pin set at a distance of 5.00' from the beginning of 393
this course and passing over an iron pin set at a distance of 394
3.00' from the terminus of this course, said point also 395
witnessed by an iron pin that bears South 04° 18' 59" West for a 396
distance of 3.00' from said point; said point also being the 397
southeasterly corner of a 0.2625 acre tract as conveyed to 398
Groveport Madison Local School District as described in 399
Instrument No. 201601070002077, Tract 1, said point also being 400
the northeasterly corner of a 0.2625 acre tract as conveyed to 401

H. B. No. 379 Page 15
As Introduced
Groveport Madison Local School District as described in 402
Instrument No. 201601070002077, Tract 2, thence, 403
Along the easterly line of said 0.2625 acre tract as 404
described in Instrument No. 201601070002077, Tract 1 and then 405
along the easterly line of a 4.647 acre tract as conveyed to 406
Groveport Madison Local School District as described in 407
Instrument No. 201511160161625 and then along the easterly line 408
of a 1.6187 acre tract as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local 409
School District as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 410
and then along the easterly line of a 2.10 acre tract as 411
conveyed to Corporation of the Presiding Bishop of the Church of 412
Jesus Christ of the Latter-Day Saints as described in Deed Book 413
3752, Page 204, North 04° 18' 59" East for a distance of 414
1100.52' to a 1" iron pipe found, passing over an iron pin set 415
at a distance of 288.33' from the terminus of this course, said 416
point being the northwesterly corner of said 40.00 acre tract, 417
said point also being the northeasterly corner of said 2.10 acre 418
tract, said point also being along the southerly line of a 4.410 419
acre tract as conveyed to Mulligan Real Estate II, LLC as 420
described in Instrument No. 201403140031424; thence, 421
Along the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and 422
along the southerly line of said 4.410 acre tract and then along 423
the southerly line of a 1.500 acre tract as conveyed to Charles 424
and Vicki Golden as described in Instrument No. 200108140187784, 425
Instrument No 200108140187785 and Instrument No. 200108140187788 426
and then along the southerly line of a 3.00 acre tract as 427
conveyed to Kinell Properties, LLC as described in Instrument 428
No. 201201050001830 and then along the southerly line of a 2.433 429
acre tract as conveyed to Peerless Saw Company as described in 430
Official Record 8645 B-05, South 85° 36' 06" East for a distance 431
of 1224.44' to a 1" iron pipe found, said point being the 432

H. B. No. 379 Page 16
As Introduced
southeasterly corner of said 2.433 acre tract and being along 433
the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard (60' 434
right-of-way as dedicated in Plat Book 46, Page 93); thence, 435
Along the westerly right-of-way line of Directors 436
Boulevard, South 20° 36' 06" East for a distance of 320.30' to a 437
railroad spike found; thence, 438
Along the southerly right-of-way line of Directors 439
Boulevard, South 85° 36' 06" East for a distance of 110.81' to 440
the point of beginning, containing 36.400 acres of land, more or 441
less, as determined by Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, 442
Ohio License No. 7978, based on a survey performed by The 443
Kleingers Group in June, 2017. 444
Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the 445
State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), 446
with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors 447
Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS 448
survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935." 449
Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic 450
identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP". 451
Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, 452
ordinances or agreements of record. 453
Tract C 454
Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, 455
State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 456
North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the 457
State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, 458
section 501.01 of the Revised Code; also being a portion of 459
school lands as described in a Journal Entry by the Office of 460
the Auditor of the State of Ohio, Volume 17, Page 48 (dated 461

H. B. No. 379 Page 17
As Introduced
7/14/1966), allocating a 40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin 462
County Joint Vocational School District, now known as The 463
Eastland-Fairfield Career and Technical Schools; being more 464
particularly described as follows: 465
Commencing at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of 466
the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 467
317; right-of-way varies) and the southerly right-of-way line of 468
Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in 469
"Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors 470
Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland 471
Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46, Page 93; said 472
point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as 473
transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, 474
as recorded in Deed Book 3241 Page 395 Parcel 22-WL, thence the 475
following four courses along the westerly right-of-way lines of 476
Hamilton Road and along westerly lines of said 7.507 acre tract: 477
(1) South 12° 10' 08" East for a distance of 104.34' to an 478
iron pin set; thence, 479
(2) South 04° 31' 49" West for a distance of 250.00' to an 480
iron pin set; thence, 481
(3) South 06° 26' 22" West for a distance of 300.17' to an 482
iron pin set; thence, 483
(4) South 01° 15' 35" West for a distance of 160.67' to a 484
point, said point referenced by an iron pin set that bears North 485
85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 5.00' from said corner, said 486
point also being along the northerly line of a 49.736 acre 487
tract, the residual of a 49.998 acre tract as conveyed to 488
Madison Local School District as described in Deed Book 3336, 489
Page 482; said point being the thence, 490

H. B. No. 379 Page 18
As Introduced
Along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and 491
along the northerly line of said 49.736 acre tract and then 492
along a common line between two 0.2625 acre tracts as conveyed 493
to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in 494
Instrument No. 201601070002077, Tracts 1 and 2, North 85° 35' 495
40" West for a distance of 1877.52' to an iron pin set, passing 496
over an iron pins set at a distance of 5.00' and at a distance 497
of 1493.33 from the beginning of this course, said point being 498
along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, said point 499
also being a common corner of said 49.736 acre tract and said 500
0.2625 acre tracts, said point also being the TRUE POINT OF 501
BEGINNING, and from said beginning point running thence, 502
Along a common line between said 40.00 acre tract and said 503
49.736 acre tract, North 85° 35' 53" West for a distance of 504
280.18' to a point generally along Black Lick Creek, said point 505
witnessed by a 1" iron pipe found that bears South 53° 43' 34" 506
East for a distance of 0.93' from said point; thence, 507
Along a westerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and 508
generally following Black Lick Creek, North 48° 01' 47" West for 509
a distance of 49.20' to a point, said point witnessed by a 1" 510
iron pipe found that bears South 25° 51' 12" East for a distance 511
of 0.54' from said point; thence, 512
Along a northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, South 85° 513
35' 53" East for a distance of 319.10' to an iron pin set, said 514
point being the northwesterly corner of said northerly-most 515
0.2625 acre tract as described in Instrument No. 516
201601070002077, Tract 1; thence, 517
Along the westerly line of said 0.2625 acre tract, South 518
04° 15' 07" West for a distance of 30.00' to the point of 519
beginning, containing 0.206 acres of land, more or less, as 520

H. B. No. 379 Page 19
As Introduced
determined by Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, Ohio 521
License No. 7978, based on a survey performed by The Kleingers 522
Group in June, 2017. 523
Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the 524
State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), 525
with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors 526
Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS 527
survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935." 528
Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic 529
identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP." 530
Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, 531
ordinances or agreements of record. 532
The foregoing legal descriptions may be corrected or 533
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 534
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 535
facilitate recordation of the deeds. 536
(B) In 1966, the Auditor of State, as Supervisor of School 537
and Ministerial Lands pursuant to former section 501.01 of the 538
Revised Code consented to the use of these lands by the 539
predecessor to the Board of Education of the Eastland-Fairfield 540
Career and Technical School District for school purposes, and 541
the purpose of this legislation is to fulfill this intention. 542
(C) Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate 543
described in division (A) of this section shall be $1.00. 544
(D) The conveyance includes improvements and chattels 545
situated on the real estate, and is subject to all easements, 546
covenants, conditions, leases, and restrictions of record; all 547
legal highways and public rights-of-way; zoning, building, and 548
other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real 549

H. B. No. 379 Page 20
As Introduced
estate taxes and assessments not yet due and payable. The real 550
estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all 551
faults" condition. 552
(E) The Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the 553
purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title 554
evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording 555
costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and 556
costs that may be imposed. 557
The net proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the 558
state treasury to the credit of the General Revenue Fund. 559
(F) Upon payment of the purchase price, the Director of 560
Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney 561
General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate 562
described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed 563
shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the 564
Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the 565
Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, 566
presented in the Department of Administrative Services for 567
recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall 568
present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the 569
Franklin County Recorder. 570
(G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 571
date. 572
Section 4. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed 573
in the name of the State transferring the following described 574
real estate to the State of Ohio for the use and benefit of the 575
Board of Education of the Groveport Madison Local School 576
District ("Grantee"): 577
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, the 578

H. B. No. 379 Page 21
As Introduced
City of Groveport and the City of Columbus, and, the Township of 579
Madison, being all of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, 580
Congress Lands East of the Scioto, as held in trust by the State 581
of Ohio, Department of Administrative Services, and pursuant to 582
Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, section 501.01 of the Revised 583
Code, less and excepting those properties as conveyed out of 584
title as identified as Tracts 1 through 21 and being more 585
particularly described as follows: 586
Tract 1 587
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 588
Village of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, 589
Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as 590
follows: 591
Commencing at a found iron pin at the intersection of the 592
centerline of Bixby Road with the centerline of Hendron Road, 593
and at the southwest corner of said Section 16; 594
Thence along the southerly line of said Section 16, and 595
along the centerline of said Bixby Road, South 85 degrees 15 596
minutes 30 seconds East, a distance of 300.0 feet to a spike and 597
the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THIS DESCRIPTION: 598
Thence partly across said Section 16, and parallel to the 599
westerly line of said Section 16, passing iron pins on line at 600
30.0 feet and 40.0 feet, North 4 degrees 08 minutes East, a 601
total distance of 940.0 feet to an iron pin; Thence partly 602
across said Section 16, and parallel to the southerly line of 603
said Section 16 (centerline of said Bixby Road), South 85 604
degrees 15 minutes 30 seconds East, a distance of 500.0 feet to 605
an iron pin; 606
Thence partly across said Section 16, South 4 degrees 08 607

H. B. No. 379 Page 22
As Introduced
minutes West, passing iron pins on line at 900.0 feet and 910.0 608
feet, a total distance of 940.0 feet to a spike in the southerly 609
line of said Section 16, and in the centerline of said Bixby 610
Road; 611
Thence along the southerly line of said Section 16, and 612
along the centerline of said Bixby Road, North 85 degrees 15 613
minutes 30 seconds West, a distance of 500.0 feet to the place 614
of beginning, containing 10.789 acres, subject to all legal 615
highways and easements and restrictions and leases and 616
agreements and utilities of record. 617
Tract 2 618
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village 619
of Groveport, being part of the northwest quarter of Section 16, 620
Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey of the Congress Lands 621
and containing 44.557 acres of land, more or less, said 44.57 622
acres being particularly described as follows: 623
Beginning, for reference, at a monument assembly at the 624
point of intersection of the centerline of Williams Road and 625
(OLD) Hamilton Road, said point being in the easterly line of 626
the northwest quarter of Section 16; thence S 4° 24' 13" W, with 627
the original centerline of said Hamilton Road, a distance of 628
1,069.07 feet to a point, said point being the northeasterly 629
corner of a 40.00 acre tract of land used by all five of the 630
school districts in the Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational 631
School District, including the Groveport School District and the 632
Canal Winchester School District in Madison Township and shown 633
of record in "Journal Entry" Office of the Auditor of the State 634
of Ohio; thence N 85° 35' 47" W, perpendicular to the preceding 635
course, with the northerly tine of said 40.00 acre tract, a 636
distance of 104.71 feet to the true point of beginning, said 637

H. B. No. 379 Page 23
As Introduced
point located In the westerly right-of-way line of Relocated 638
Hamilton Road, as the same is shown on State of Ohio, Department 639
of Highway Plans (FRA-317 6.38) being 140 feet left of Station 640
146 + 40.27: 641
Thence, from said true point of beginning, N 85° 35' 47" 642
W, continuing with the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, 643
a distance of 1,847.41 feet to a point: 644
Thence, N 4° 24' 13" E, perpendicular to the preceding 645
course, parallel to and 1,952.12 feet westerly from (as measured 646
at right angles) the original center line of said Hamilton Road, 647
a distance of 1,042.06 feet to a point, said point located 20 648
feet southerly of the centerline of Williams Road; 649
Thence S 85° 48' 08" E, parallel with and 20.00 feet 650
southerly from (as measured at right angles) the centerline of 651
said Williams Road, a distance of 1,477.55 feet to a point, said 652
point being 20.00 feet left of Station 4+75 as same is shown on 653
Highway Plan FRA-33-(26.21-30.13); 654
Thence, S 78° 57' 34" E, a distance of 125.90 feet to a 655
point, said point located 35.00 feet left of Station 3 + 50 of 656
said Plan; 657
Thence, S 80° 41' 18" E, a distance of 220.25 feet to a 658
point located in the westerly right-of-way line of said 659
relocated Hamilton Road; 660
Thence, S 30° 15' 51" E, with said westerly right-of-way 661
line, a distance of 65.98 feet to a point, said point located 662
130.00 feet left of Station 156 + 00 (FRA-317 6.3R); 663
Thence with said westerly right-of-way line by the 664
following four courses and distances: 665

H. B. No. 379 Page 24
As Introduced
(1) S 0° 02' 29" E, a distance of 250.80 feet to a point, 666
said point located 110.00 feet left of Station 155 + 50; 667
(2) S 4° 51' 58" W, a distance of 300.00 feet to a point, 668
said point located 110.00 feet left of Station 150 + 50; 669
(3) S 15° 50' 30" W, a distance of 152.97 feet to a point, 670
said point located 140.00 feet left of Station 149 + 00; 671
(4) S 4° 31' 53" W, a distance of 259.73 feet to the true 672
point of beginning and containing 44.557 acres of land, more or 673
less. 674
Subject to all easements, right-of-way and restrictions, 675
if any, of previous record. 676
The above description was prepared by Hockaden-Lipes- 677
Rousculp, Inc., Consulting Engineers, Columbus, Ohio, from 678
information obtained by an actual survey of premises. 679
Tract 3 680
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 681
Township of Madison and being part of the Southwest Quarter and 682
part of the Northwest Quarter of Section 16, Township 11, Range 683
21, Congress Lands and being more particularly described as 684
follows: 685
Beginning at a railroad spike in the center line of 686
Hamilton Road and in the easterly line of the Northwest Quarter 687
of Section 16, said spike being S. 4° 28' W. a distance of 688
2169.07 feet from the northeasterly corner of the Northwesterly 689
Quarter of Section 16; thence S. 4° 28' W. along the center line 690
of Hamilton Road and passing an iron pin at the southeast corner 691
of the Northwest Quarter of Section 16 at a distance of 527.43 692
feet, a distance of 1112.83 feet to a railroad spike; thence N. 693

H. B. No. 379 Page 25
As Introduced
85° 32' W. and parallel to the northerly line of the Southwest 694
Quarter of Section 16 and 585.40 feet. Southerly therefrom, 695
passing an iron pin on line at 35.00 feet and passing an iron 696
pin at top of bank at a distance of 1689.17 feet a distance of 697
1905.00 feet to a point in the center line of Blacklick Creek; 698
thence in a Northerly direction the following ten courses and 699
distances along the center line of Blacklick Creek: 700
(1) N. 00° 25' 37" W. a distance of 58.61 feet to a point; 701
(2) Thence N. 27° 39' 55" E, a distance of 114.24 feet to 702
a point; 703
(3) Thence N. 17° 51' 33" E, a distance of 107.94 feet to 704
a point; 705
(4) Thence N. 7° 18' 03" E, a distance of 202.25 feet to a 706
point; 707
(5) Thence N. 25° 00' 33" W. a distance of 132.10 feet to 708
a point; 709
(6) Thence N. 26° 04' 26" W. a distance of 116.11 feet to 710
a point; 711
(7) Thence N. 56° 44' 59" W. a distance of 207.66 feet to 712
a point; 713
(8) Thence N. 28° 12' 59" E. a distance of 109.25 feet to 714
a point; 715
(9) Thence N. 22 12' 41" E. a distance of 105.00 feet to a 716
point; 717
(10) Thence N. 47° 57' 54" W. a distance of 209.00 ft. to 718
a point; 719
Said point being Northerly as measured at right angles to 720

H. B. No. 379 Page 26
As Introduced
the southerly line of the Northwest Quarter of Section 16, a 721
distance of 527.43 feet; thence S. 85° 32' E. and parallel to 722
the southerly line of the Northwest Quarter of Section 16, 723
passing an iron pin on line at 271.00 feet, and an iron pin on 724
line at 2190.66 feet a distance of 2225.66 feet to the place of 725
beginning, containing 49.998 acres; subject to all easements and 726
restrictions shown of record; also subject to all legal 727
highways. 728
Tract 4 729
PARCEL NO. 1 730
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 731
Village of Groveport, and being a part of the Madison School 732
Section, Section 16, Twp. 11, R. 21, Buckingham's Survey, 733
Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as 734
follows: 735
Beginning at the Southwesterly corner of Marketing Place 736
(60' wide) as shown on dedicated plat in Plat Book 46, Page 93, 737
said point being on the south line of a 44.557 acre tract 738
conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs, an Ohio general 739
partnership, by deed of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174, said 740
point being located a distance of 56.14 feet Easterly of the 741
Southwest corner of said 44.557 acre tract. 742
Thence, South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along 743
the south line of said Marketing Place, and along a part of the 744
south line of a 4.410 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, 745
Galloway and Jacobs, an Ohio general partnership, by deed of 746
record in Deed Book 3393, Page 888,889, a distance of 330.52 747
feet to a point; 748
Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, across 749

H. B. No. 379 Page 27
As Introduced
said Madison School Section, along a line perpendicular to the 750
last described line, a distance of 495.0 feet to a point; 751
Thence North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, across 752
said Madison School Section, along a line perpendicular to the 753
last described line, and along a line parallel to the south line 754
of the said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 311.19 feet to a 755
point, said point being on the arc of a curve having a radius of 756
70.0 feet; 757
Thence, Southerly and Westerly, along the arc of said 758
curve having a radius of 70.0 feet, sub-delta angle of 180 759
degrees 0 minutes 00 seconds, along chord bearing North 85 760
degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, a distance of 140.00 feet to 761
a point; 762
Thence, North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, 763
across said Madison School Section, along a line parallel to the 764
south line of the said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 365.00 765
feet to a point; 766
Thence, North 20 degrees 34 minutes 54 seconds West, 767
across said Madison School Section, a distance of 275.82 feet to 768
a point; 769
Thence, South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along 770
a line parallel to the south line of the said 44.557 acre tract, 771
a distance of 527.49 feet to a point, said point being on the 772
arc of a curve to the right having a radius of 730 feet; 773
Thence, Northernly, along the arc of said curve to the 774
right having a radius of 730 feet, a delta angle of 24 degrees 775
30 minutes 00 seconds, a chord bearing North 20 degrees 19 776
minutes 29 seconds East, a distance of 217.90 feet to a point of 777
reverse curvature; said chord having a sub-delta angle of 17 778

H. B. No. 379 Page 28
As Introduced
degrees 10 minutes 00 seconds; 779
Thence, continuing northernly, along the arc of a curve to 780
the left, having a radius of 670 feet, a delta angle of 3 781
degrees 17 minutes 27 seconds, a chord bearing North 27 degrees 782
15 minutes 46 seconds East, a distance of 38.47 feet to the 783
place of beginning containing 7.3032 acres of land, subject 784
however to all legal highways and easements and restrictions of 785
record. 786
PARCEL NO. 2 787
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 788
Village of Groveport, and being a part of the Madison School 789
Section, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey, 790
Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as 791
follows: 792
Commencing at the southwesterly corner of Marketing Place 793
(60' wide) as shown on dedicated plat in Plat Book 46, Page 93, 794
said corner being on the south line of a 44.557 acre tract 795
conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs, an Ohio general 796
partnership, by deed of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174, said 797
corner being located a distance of 56.14 feet easterly of the 798
Southwest corner of the said 44.557 acre tract, said point also 799
being on the arc of a curve to the right having a radius of 670 800
feet; 801
Thence, southerly, along the west right-of-way of a 802
proposed road 60 feet wide and along the arc of a curve to the 803
right having a radius of 670 feet, a sub-delta angle of 3 804
degrees 17 minutes 27 seconds, a chord bearing South 27 degrees 805
15 minutes 46 seconds West, a distance of 38.47 feet to a point 806
of reverse curvature of a said west line; 807

H. B. No. 379 Page 29
As Introduced
Thence, southerly, continuing along the west right-of-way 808
of said proposed road, along the arc of a curve to the left 809
having a radius of 730.0 feet, a delta angle of 24 degrees 30 810
minutes 00 seconds, a long chord bearing South 16 degrees 39 811
minutes 29 seconds East, a distance of 309.78 feet to a point of 812
tangency of said curve; 813
Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, 814
continuing along the west right-of-way line of said proposed 815
road, along a tangent to the last described curve, a distance of 816
58.84 feet to a point on a curve: 817
Thence, southerly, continuing along the said west right- 818
of-way line, along the arc of a curve to the right having a 819
radius of 70.0 feet, a delta angle of 44 degrees 24 minutes 55 820
seconds, a chord bearing South 26 degrees 36 minutes 56 seconds 821
West, a distance of 52.91 feet to a point of reverse curvature; 822
Thence, southerly, continuing along the said west right- 823
of-way line, along the arc of a curve to the left having a 824
radius of 70.0 feet, a sub-delta angle of 44 degrees 24 minutes 825
55 seconds, a chord bearing South 26 degrees 36 minutes 56 826
seconds West, a distance of 52.91 feet to a point, and the TRUE 827
POINT OF BEGINNING OF THIS DESCRIPTION; 828
Thence, southerly, continuing along the west right-of-way 829
line, and along the arc of the said curve to the left having a 830
radius of 70.0 feet, a sub-delta angle of 37 degrees 26 minutes 831
19 seconds, a chord bearing South 14 degrees 18 minutes 40 832
seconds East, a distance of 44.93 feet to a point; 833
Thence, southwesterly, across said Madison School Section, 834
along a line radial to the last described curve, S 56°58'10" 835
West, a distance of 333.02 feet to a point; 836

H. B. No. 379 Page 30
As Introduced
Thence, North 20 degrees 44 minutes 12 seconds West, 837
across said Madison School Section, a distance of 270.65 feet to 838
a point; 839
Thence, South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along 840
a line radial to the last described curve, a distance of 365.0 841
feet to the place of beginning, containing 1.1866 acres of land, 842
subject however to all legal highways and easements and 843
restrictions of record. 844
Tract 5 845
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village 846
of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, 847
and being a part of School Section 16 as reserved by Act of 848
Congress in the Land Act of May 8, 1796, and being more 849
particularly described as follows: 850
Beginning, for reference, at a monument found at 851
Centerline Station 140+00.00 as shown on a plat entitled 852
"CENTERLINE SURVEY PLAT, FRA-317-6.38", of record in Plat Book 853
41, Page 65, Franklin County Recorder's Office: 854
Thence N 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds E, with said 855
centerline, a distance of 390.28 feet to a point, said point 856
being on the easterly extension of the centerline of Eastland 857
School Avenue as shown on a plat entitled DEDICATION OF WILLIAMS 858
ROAD, MARKETING PLACE, DIRECTORS BOULEVARD, INVESTORS AVENUE, 859
AND EASTLAND SCHOOL AVENUE, of record in Plat Book 46, Page 93; 860
Thence S 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds E, with said 861
easterly extension of the centerline of Eastland School Avenue, 862
a distance of 140.00 feet to an iron pin in the easterly line of 863
a 3.213 acre tract described in a deed to the Ohio Department of 864
Highways (Parcel 22-WD-1), of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 865

H. B. No. 379 Page 31
As Introduced
395, said point being the TRUE PLACE OF BEGINNING; 866
Thence S 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds E, continuing 867
with said easterly extension of said centerline, a distance of 868
1260.00 feet to an iron pin; 869
Thence S 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds W, a distance of 870
1586.08 feet to an iron pin; 871
Thence S 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds E, a distance of 872
320.00 feet to an iron pin; 873
Thence S 4 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds W, a distance of 874
522.00 feet to an iron pin; 875
Thence N 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds W, a distance of 876
1572.72 feet to an iron pin in the easterly line of said 3.213 877
acre tract; 878
Thence N 4 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds E, with the 879
easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract, passing an iron pin at a 880
distance of 522.00 feet, a total distance of 737.70 feet to an 881
iron pin at an angle point therein, said point being located S 882
85 degrees 35 minutes 26 seconds E (along the angular bisector), 883
a distance of 150.00 feet from a monument found at Station 884
130+19.90 in said centerline; 885
Thence N 3 degrees 57 minutes 45 seconds E, continuing 886
with the easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract, a distance of 887
979.81 feet to an iron pin at an angle point therein, said point 888
being located S 85 degrees 27 minutes 36 seconds E (along the 889
angular bisector), a distance of 140.00 feet from a monument 890
found at Station 140+00.00; 891
Thence N 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds E, continuing 892
with the easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract, a distance of 893

H. B. No. 379 Page 32
As Introduced
390.60 feet to THE TRUE PLACE OF BEGINNING, containing 64.627 894
acres, more or less, subject to all easements restrictions, and 895
rights-of-way of previous record. 896
Tract 6 897
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village 898
of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, 899
and being a part of School Section 16 as reserved by Act of 900
Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more 901
particularly described as follows: 902
Beginning at an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of a 903
64.627 acre tract described in a deed from the State of Ohio to 904
Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs, recorded February 8, 1978, and 905
bearing instrument No. 17, Page 134, School Lands, said iron pin 906
being in the easterly line of a 3.213 acre tract described in a 907
deed to the Ohio Department of Highways (Parcel 22-WD-1), of 908
record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395; 909
Thence N 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds E, with the 910
easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract, a distance of 9.41 feet 911
to an angle point therein; 912
Thence N 12 degrees 09 minutes 59 seconds W, continuing 913
with said easterly line, a distance of 16.26 feet to a point; 914
Thence, through said School Lands, the following four 915
courses: 916
(1) S 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds E (parallel to and 917
25.00 feet northerly from the northerly line of said 64.627 acre 918
tract), a distance of 45.70 feet to a point; 919
(2) N 64 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds E, a distance of 920
55.00 feet to a point; 921

H. B. No. 379 Page 33
As Introduced
(3) S 55 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds E, a distance of 922
65.00 feet to a point; 923
(4) S 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds W, a distance of 924
20.00 feet to a point in the northerly line of said 64.627 acre 925
tract. 926
Thence N 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds W, with said 927
northerly line, a distance of 145.00 feet to the place of 928
beginning, containing 0.114 acres, more or less. 929
This description was prepared by Hockaden and Associates, 930
Inc., Consulting Engineers, Columbus, Ohio, a plat of said 0.144 931
acre tract being attached hereto and made a part hereof. 932
Tract 7 933
Situated in the State of Ohio, Franklin County, Village of 934
Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, 935
and being a part of School Section 16 as reserved by act of 936
Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more fully 937
described as follows: 938
Beginning at the northeast corner of a 64.627 acre tract 939
conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs, an Ohio general 940
partnership, and recorded February 8, 1978, and bearing 941
instrument No. 17, Page 134, School Lands; 942
Thence with the north line of said 64.627 acre tract 943
extended easterly, South 85°35'31" East a distance of 170.00 944
feet; 945
Thence South 00°15'37" East a distance of 232.69 feet; 946
Thence South 29°14'06" East a distance of 158.03 feet; 947
Thence South 02°02'33" West a distance of 1190.81 feet; 948

H. B. No. 379 Page 34
As Introduced
Thence South 20°53'00" East a distance of 610.84 feet; 949
Thence North 86°08'06" West a distance of 265.38 feet; 950
Thence with the east line of said 64.627 acre tract North 951
04° 16' 18" East a distance of 522.00 feet; 952
Thence continuing with said east line North 85°35'31" West 953
a distance of 320.00 feet; 954
Thence continuing with said east line North 04°24' 29" 955
East a distance of 1586.08 feet to the point of beginning, 956
containing 11.849 acres more or less. 957
Tract 8 958
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village 959
of Groveport in the Madison School Section, Section 16, Township 960
11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey, Congress Lands and being more 961
particularly described as follows: 962
Beginning at an iron pipe in the westerly Cul-de-sac 963
right-of-way line of Marketing Place (said Marketing Place was 964
dedicated in Plat Book 51, Page 119, Recorder's Office, Franklin 965
County) and at the southeasterly corner of the Metal Art 966
Investment Company 1.1866 acre tract (Parcel I) of record in 967
Deed Book 3642, Page 793, said Recorder's Office; 968
Thence, along the line of said Marketing Place and along 969
the arc of a curve to the left having a radius of 70.00 feet, a 970
sub-delta angle of 84 degrees 28 minutes 10 seconds, a tangent 971
distance of 63.55 feet and a chord bearing and distance of South 972
75 degrees 15 minutes 58 seconds East, 94.10 feet to an iron 973
pipe; 974
Thence, across said Madison School Section, South 4 975
degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, 355.58 feet to an iron pipe; 976

H. B. No. 379 Page 35
As Introduced
Thence, continue across said Madison School Section, North 977
85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, 165.00 feet to an iron 978
pipe at the southeasterly corner of the Metal Art Investment 979
Company, 1.073 acre tract 9 parcel II) of record in Deed Book 980
3642, Page 793, said Recorder's Office; 981
Thence, along the easterly line of said 1.073 acre tract, 982
North 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds East, 317.00 feet to an 983
iron pipe at the northeasterly corner of said 1.073 acre tract 984
and in the southeasterly line of said 1.1866 acre tract; 985
Thence, along the southeasterly line of said 1.1866 acre 986
tract, North 56 degrees 58 minutes 10 seconds East, 91.21 feet 987
to the place of beginning, containing 1.320 acres, subject, 988
however, to all legal highways, easements, restrictions, 989
agreements and leases of record and of records in the respective 990
utility offices. 991
The above survey was made by Albert J. Myers, Registered 992
Surveyor No. 6579. 993
Tract 9 994
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village 995
of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, 996
and being a part of the School Section 16 as reserved by Act of 997
Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1795, and being more 998
particularly described as follows: 999
Beginning, for reference, at the northwesterly corner of a 1000
64.627 acre tract of land described in a deed to Columbus and 1001
Southern Ohio Electric Company, to Deed Book 3636, Page 229, 1002
(all references to Deed Books in this description are of record 1003
in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio), said corner 1004
being in the easterly line of a 3.213 acre tract of land 1005

H. B. No. 379 Page 36
As Introduced
described in a deed to the Ohio Department of Highways (Parcel 1006
22-WD-1), of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, thence S 1007
85°35'31" E, with the northerly line of said 64.627 acre tract, 1008
a distance of 181.64 feet to the TRUE PLACE OF BEGINNING; 1009
Thence S 85°35'31" E, continuing with said northerly line, 1010
a distance of 182.11 feet to a point; 1011
Thence N 79°54'08" W, a distance of 187.48 feet to a 1012
point; 1013
Thence S 9°03'45" E, with the easterly right-of-way of 1014
proposed HIGGINS BOULEVARD, a distance of 19.12 feet to the TRUE 1015
PLACE OF BEGINNING, and containing 0.0395 acres of land, more or 1016
less. 1017
This description was prepared by Hockaden and Associates, 1018
Inc., Consulting Engineers, Columbus, Ohio. Cloyd E. Evers, 1019
Registered Surveyor No. 6579. 1020
Tract 10 1021
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village 1022
of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, 1023
and being a part of School Section 16 as reserved by Act of 1024
Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more 1025
particularly described as follows: 1026
Beginning, for reference at an iron pin at the 1027
northwesterly corner of a 64.627 acre tract described in a deed 1028
to COLUMBUS & SOUTHERN OHIO ELECTRIC COMPANY, of record in Deed 1029
Book 3636, Page 229, (all references to Deed Books in this 1030
description are of record in the Recorder's Office, Franklin 1031
County, Ohio) said iron pin being in the easterly line of a 1032
3.213 acre tract described in a deed to The Ohio Department of 1033
Highways (Parcel 22-WD-1), of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 1034

H. B. No. 379 Page 37
As Introduced
395, thence N 4°31'58" E, with the easterly line of said 3.213 1035
acre tract, a distance of 9.41 feet to an angle point; 1036
Thence N 12°09'59" W, continuing with said easterly line, 1037
a distance of 16.26 feet to the northwesterly corner of a 0.114 1038
acre tract of land described in a deed to Ball, Ball, Galloway 1039
and Jacobs, of record in Deed Book 3636, page 225, said corner 1040
being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING; 1041
Thence N 12°09'59" W, continuing with said easterly line, 1042
a distance of 8.45 feet to a point; 1043
Thence, through said School Lands, the following three 1044
courses: 1045
(1) N 74°40'07" E, a distance of 116.24 feet to a point; 1046
(2) S 55°35'31" E, a distance of 85.10 feet to a point; 1047
(3) S 9°03'45" E, a distance of 30.66 feet to a point in 1048
the northerly line of said 64.627 acre tract. 1049
Thence N 85°35'31" W, with said northerly line, a distance 1050
of 38.22 feet to the southeasterly corner of said 0.114 acre 1051
tract; 1052
Thence, with the easterly and northerly lines of said 1053
0.114 acre tract, the following four courses: 1054
(1) N 4°24'29" E, a distance of 20.00 feet to a point; 1055
(2) N 55°35'31" W, a distance of 65.00 feet to a point; 1056
(3) S 64°24'29" W, a distance of 55.00 feet to a point; 1057
(4) N 85°35'31" W, a distance of 45.70 feet to the point 1058
of beginning, containing 0.104 acres of land, more or less. 1059
This description was prepared by Hockaden and Associates, 1060

H. B. No. 379 Page 38
As Introduced
Inc., Consulting Engineers, Columbus, Ohio. Cloyd E. Evers, 1061
Registered Surveyor No. 6579. 1062
Tract 11 1063
PARCEL #2 1064
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 1065
Village of Groveport, and being a part of Madison School 1066
Section, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey 1067
of Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as 1068
follows: 1069
Commencing at a point on the southerly right-of-way line 1070
of Williams Road (40 feet wide) at the northwesterly corner of 1071
an original 44.557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway 1072
and Jacobs shown of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174, and at 1073
the northwesterly corner of Williams Road as dedicated in Plat 1074
Book 46, Page 93, said point being on the City of Columbus, and 1075
Village of Groveport Corporation line; 1076
Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along 1077
the westerly line of said Williams Road as dedicated in Plat 1078
Book 46, Page 93, and along the westerly line of said 44.557 1079
acre tract, a distance of 20.00 feet to a point and THE TRUE 1080
POINT OF BEGINNING OF THIS DESCRIPTION: 1081
Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along 1082
the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 1083
456.33 feet to a point; 1084
Thence, North 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds West, along 1085
a line parallel with the centerline of said Williams Road, a 1086
distance of 388.48 feet to a point; 1087
Thence, North 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds East, along 1088

H. B. No. 379 Page 39
As Introduced
a line parallel with the westerly line of said 44.557 acre 1089
tract, a distance of 456.33 feet to a point; 1090
Thence, South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along 1091
a line parallel with and 40.00 feet southerly of and measured at 1092
right angles to the centerline of said Williams Road, a distance 1093
of 388.48 feet to the place of beginning, containing 4.0697 1094
acres, subject however, to all highways and easements of record 1095
and of records, easements and restrictions in the respective 1096
utility offices. 1097
PARCEL #2-A 1098
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 1099
Village of Groveport, and being a part of Madison School Section 1100
16, Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey of Congress 1101
Lands, and being more particularly described as follows: 1102
Beginning at a point on the southerly right-of-way line of 1103
Williams Road (40 feet wide) at the northwesterly corner of an 1104
original 44.557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and 1105
Jacobs shown of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174, and at the 1106
northwesterly corner of Williams Road as dedicated in Plat Booke 1107
46, Page 93, said point being on the City of Columbus, and 1108
Village of Groveport Corporation line; 1109
Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along 1110
the westerly line of said Williams Road as dedicated in Plat 1111
Book 46, Page 93, a distance of 20.00 feet to a point at the 1112
southwesterly corner of Williams Road dedicated in Plat Book 46, 1113
Page 93; 1114
Thence, North 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds West, along 1115
a line parallel with and 40.00 feet southerly of measured at 1116
right angles to the centerline of said Williams Road, a distance 1117

H. B. No. 379 Page 40
As Introduced
of 388.48 feet to a point; 1118
Thence, North 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds East, along 1119
a line parallel with the westerly line of said 44.557 acre 1120
tract, a distance of 20.00 feet to a point on the southerly 1121
right-of-way line of said Williams Road; 1122
Thence, South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along 1123
the southerly right-of-way line of said Williams Road, and along 1124
a line parallel with and 20.00 feet southerly of and measured at 1125
right angles to the centerline of said Williams Road, a distance 1126
of 388.48 feet to the place of beginning, containing 0.1784 1127
acres, subject however, to all highways and easements of record 1128
and of records, easements and restrictions in the respective 1129
utility offices. 1130
PARCEL 02-B 1131
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 1132
Village of Groveport, and being a part of Madison School 1133
Section, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey 1134
of Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as 1135
follows: 1136
Commencing at a point on the Southerly right-of-way line 1137
of Williams Road (40 feet wide) at the northwesterly corner of 1138
an original 44.557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway 1139
and Jacobs shown of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174, and at 1140
the northwesterly corner of Williams Road as dedicated in Plat 1141
Book 46, Page 93, said point being on the City of Columbus and 1142
Village of Groveport Corporation line; 1143
Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along 1144
the westerly line of said Williams Road as dedicated in Plat 1145
Book 46, Page 93, and along the westerly line of said 44.557 1146

H. B. No. 379 Page 41
As Introduced
acre tract, a distance of 476.33 feet to a point, and THE TRUE 1147
POINT OF BEGINNING OF THIS DESCRIPTION; 1148
Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along 1149
the westerly line of said 44.57 acres tract, a distance of 50.00 1150
feet to a point; 1151
Thence, North 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds West, along 1152
a line parallel with the centerline of said Williams Road, a 1153
distance of 408.48 feet to a point; 1154
Thence, North 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds East, along 1155
a line parallel with the westerly line of said 44.557 acre 1156
tract, a distance of 50.00 feet to a point; 1157
Thence, South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along 1158
a line parallel with the centerline of said Williams Road, a 1159
distance of 408.48 feet to the place of beginning, containing 1160
0.4689 acres, subject however, to all highways and easements of 1161
record and of records, easements and restrictions in the 1162
respective utility offices. 1163
The description for Parcel No. 2, 2-A and 2-B were 1164
prepared by Albert H. Andrews, Registered Surveyor No. 5699. 1165
Tract 12 1166
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 1167
Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 1168
11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School 1169
Section 16 as reserved by Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 1170
18, 1796, and being more particularly described as follows: 1171
Commencing at a point on the easterly limited access 1172
right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (FRA-317-6.38), and on the 1173
westerly right-of-way line of Higgins Boulevard as dedicated in 1174

H. B. No. 379 Page 42
As Introduced
Plat Book 58, Page 63, said point being at the northwesterly 1175
corner of an original 64.627 acre tract conveyed to Columbus and 1176
Southern Ohio Electric Company shown of record in Deed Book 1177
3636, Page 229; 1178
Thence North 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds East, along 1179
the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said Hamilton 1180
Road and along the westerly right-of-way line of said Higgins 1181
Boulevard, a distance of 9.41 feet to an angle point in said 1182
line; 1183
Thence North 12 degrees 09 minutes 59 seconds West 1184
continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line 1185
of said Hamilton Road and along the westerly right-of-way line 1186
of said Higgins Boulevard, a distance of 24.72 feet to an iron 1187
pin at the northwesterly corner of said Higgins Boulevard, and 1188
also the northwesterly corner of a 0.104 acre tract conveyed to 1189
Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs shown of record in official 1190
Record 721, Page A-12, and the true point beginning of the 1191
description: 1192
Thence North 12 degrees 09 minutes 59 seconds West, 1193
continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line 1194
of said Hamilton Road, distance of 79.68 feet to an iron pin at 1195
the angle point in said line; 1196
Thence North 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds East, 1197
continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line 1198
of said Hamilton Road, a distance of 500.13 feet to an iron pin 1199
at an angle point in said line; 1200
Thence North 1 degree 05 minutes 57 seconds East, 1201
continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line 1202
of said Hamilton Road, a distance of 500.90 feet to an iron pin 1203

H. B. No. 379 Page 43
As Introduced
at an angle point in said line; 1204
Thence North 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds East, 1205
continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line 1206
of said Hamilton Road, a distance of 209.02 feet to an iron pin 1207
at the intersection of the easterly limited access right-of-way 1208
line of said Hamilton Road, with the northerly line of Section 1209
16, (southerly line of Section 9), said point being at the 1210
southwesterly corner of a 3.781 acre tract conveyed to James E. 1211
Gillain shown of record in Deed Book 3172, Page 248; 1212
Thence South 85 degrees 22 minutes 52 seconds East, along 1213
the northerly line of Section 16, and along the southerly line 1214
of said 3.781 acre tract (southerly line of Section 9), a 1215
distance of 872.84 feet to an iron pin on the southwesterly 1216
limited access right-of-way line of U.S. 33 (FRA-33-26.21-30.13) 1217
at the southeasterly corner of said 3.781 acre tract, said point 1218
being at the intersection of the northerly line of Section 16 1219
(southerly line of Section 9), with the southwesterly limited 1220
access right-of-way line of said U.S. 33; 1221
Thence South 49 degrees 26 minutes 03 seconds East, along 1222
the southwesterly limited access right-of-way line of said U.S. 1223
33, a distance of 68.25 feet to a concrete monument at an angle 1224
point in said line; 1225
Thence South 50 degrees 14 minutes 27 seconds East, 1226
continuing along the southwesterly limited access right-of-way 1227
line of said U.S. 33, a distance of 710.07 feet to a concrete 1228
monument at an angle point in said line; 1229
Thence South 49 degrees 26 minutes 03 seconds East, 1230
continuing along the southwesterly limited access right-of-way 1231
line of said U.S. 33, a distance of 100.00 feet to a concrete 1232

H. B. No. 379 Page 44
As Introduced
monument at an angle point in said line; 1233
Thence South 46 degrees 34 minutes 18 seconds Eat, 1234
continuing along the southwesterly limited access right-of-way 1235
line of said U.S. 33, a distance of 200.25 feet to a concrete 1236
monument at an angle point in said line; 1237
Thence South 52 degrees 17 minutes 48 seconds East, 1238
continuing along the southwesterly limited access right-of-way 1239
line of said U.S. 33, a distance of 159.97 feet to an iron pin 1240
at an angle point in said line; 1241
Thence South 72 degrees 03 minutes 23 seconds West, a 1242
distance of 458.50 feet to an iron pin; 1243
Thence South 0 degrees 15 minutes 37 seconds East, a 1244
distance of 418.51 feet to an iron pin at the northeasterly 1245
corner of an 11.849 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway 1246
and Jacobs shown of record in Deed Book 3673, Page 519; 1247
Thence North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, along 1248
the northerly line of said 11.849 acre tract, and along the 1249
northerly line of said 64.627 acre tract, a distance of 1246.78 1250
feet to a cross in concrete on the easterly right-of-way line of 1251
said Higgins Boulevard, said point being at the southeasterly 1252
corner of said 0.104 acre tract; 1253
Thence North 9 degrees 03 minutes 45 seconds West, along 1254
the easterly right-of-way line of said Higgins Boulevard and 1255
along said line produced northerly, and along the easterly line 1256
of said 0.104 acre tract, a distance of 30.66 feet to an iron 1257
pin at the northeasterly corner of said 0.104 acre tract; 1258
Thence North 55 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, along 1259
the northerly right-of-way line of said Higgins Boulevard 1260
produced easterly, and along the northerly right-of-way line of 1261

H. B. No. 379 Page 45
As Introduced
Higgins Boulevard, and along the northerly line of said 0.104 1262
acre tract, a distance of 85.10 feet to an iron pin at an angle 1263
point in the northerly line of said 0.104 acre tract, and at a 1264
corner of said Higgins Boulevard; 1265
Thence South 74 degrees 40 minutes 07 seconds West, 1266
leaving the northerly right-of way line of said Higgins 1267
Boulevard, and along the northerly line of said 0.104 acre 1268
tract, a distance of 116.24 feet to the place of beginning, 1269
containing 42.849 acres, subject however to all highways and 1270
easements of record and of records, easements, and restrictions 1271
in the respective utility office. 1272
The above description was prepared by Albert H. Andrews, 1273
Registered Surveyor No. 5699. 1274
Tract 13 1275
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 1276
Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 1277
11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School 1278
Section 16, as reserved by the Act of Congress in the Land Act 1279
of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as 1280
follows: 1281
Beginning at an iron pin on the westerly right-of-way line 1282
of Marketing Place (60 feet wide), said point being at the 1283
northwesterly corner of Marketing Place (60 feet wide) as 1284
dedicated in Plat Book 51, Page 119, and the southwesterly 1285
corner of Marketing Place (60 feet wide) as dedicated in Plat 1286
Book 46, Page 93, said point being on the southerly line of an 1287
original 44.557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and 1288
Jacobs shown of record in Deed Booke 3327, Page 174; 1289
Thence in a southerly direction, along the westerly right- 1290

H. B. No. 379 Page 46
As Introduced
of-way line of said Marketing Place, and along the arc of a 1291
curve to the right having a radius of 670.00 feet, a subdelta 1292
angle of 3 degrees 17 minutes 27 seconds, a tangent of 19.24 1293
feet, an arc of 38.48 feet, a long chord bearing and distance of 1294
South 27 degrees 15 minutes 46 seconds West, 38.47 feet to an 1295
iron pin at a point of Reverse Curvature; 1296
Thence in a southerly direction continuing along the 1297
westerly right-of-way line of said Marketing Place, and along 1298
the arc of a curve to the left having a radius of 730.00 feet, a 1299
subdelta angle of 17 degrees 10 minutes, a tangent of 110.18 1300
feet, an arc of 218.72 feet, along chord bearing and distance of 1301
South 20 degrees 19 minutes 29 seconds West, 217.90 feet to an 1302
iron pin at the northeasterly corner of a 2.618 acre tract 1303
conveyed to Westinghouse Electric Corporation shown of record in 1304
Deed Book 3585, Page 445; 1305
Thence North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, along 1306
the northerly line of said 2.618 acre tract, a distance of 1307
527.49 feet to an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of said 1308
2.618 acre tract; 1309
Thence North 20 degrees 34 minutes 54 seconds West, along 1310
the westerly line of said 2.618 acre tract produced 1311
northwesterly, a distance of 393.01 feet to an iron pin; 1312
Thence South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along 1313
a line parallel with the northerly line of said 2.618 acre 1314
tract, a distance of 712.08 feet to an iron pin on the westerly 1315
line of said 44.557 acre tract; 1316
Thence South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along 1317
the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 1318
111.22 feet to an iron pin at the southwesterly corner of said 1319

H. B. No. 379 Page 47
As Introduced
44.557 acre tract; 1320
Thence South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along 1321
the southerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 1322
56.14 feet to the place of beginning, containing 5.211 acres, 1323
subject however to all highways and easements of record, and of 1324
records, easements, and restrictions in the respective utility 1325
offices. 1326
The above description was prepared by Albert H. Andrews 1327
Registered Surveyor No. 5699. 1328
Tract 14 1329
PARCEL 1 1330
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 1331
Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 1332
11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School 1333
Section 16, as reserved by the Act of Congress in the Land Act 1334
of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as 1335
follows: 1336
Beginning at an iron pin on the easterly right-of-way line 1337
of South Hamilton Road (State Route 317) (FRA-317-6.38), and on 1338
the easterly line of a 3.213 acre tract (Parcel 22-WD-1) 1339
conveyed to the State of Ohio shown of record in Deed Book 3241, 1340
Page 395, said point being at the southwesterly corner of an 1341
original 64.627 acre tract conveyed to the Columbus and Southern 1342
Ohio Electric Company shown of record in Deed Book 3636, Page 1343
229, and the southwesterly corner of a 3.00 acre tract conveyed 1344
to Madison Township Trustees shown of record in Official Record 1345
833, Page C-17, said point being South 4 degrees 16 minutes 18 1346
seconds West, along the easterly right-of-way line of South 1347
Hamilton Road (Easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract) (westerly 1348

H. B. No. 379 Page 48
As Introduced
line of said 3.00 acre tract), a distance of 462.00 feet from 1349
the intersection of the easterly right-of-way line of said South 1350
Hamilton Road, with the southerly right-of-way line of Firehouse 1351
Lane (100 feet wide), as dedicated in Plat Book 58, Page 13; 1352
Thence South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, and 1353
along the southerly line of said 3.00 acre tract, and along the 1354
southerly line of Madison Lane (60 feet wide) dedicated in Plat 1355
Book 58, Page 13, and along the southerly line of a 5.037 acre 1356
tract conveyed to The 614 Company shown of record in Deed Book 1357
3760, Page 586, and along the southerly line of 64.627 acre 1358
tract, passing iron pins on line at 222.84 feet and 282.84 feet, 1359
a total distance of 1572.72 feet to an iron pin at the 1360
southwesterly corner of said 64.627 acre tract, and the 1361
southwesterly corner of an 11.849 acre tract conveyed to Donald 1362
E. Ball, Jr. shown of record in Official Record 1967, Page F-04; 1363
Thence South 86 degrees 08 minutes 06 seconds East, along 1364
the southerly line of said 11.849 acre tract, a distance of 1365
265.38 feet to an iron pin at the southeasterly corner of said 1366
11.849 acre tract; 1367
Thence South 20 degrees 53 minutes East, a distance of 1368
220.68 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; 1369
Thence South 25 degrees 35 minutes 47 seconds West, a 1370
distance of 406.99 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said 1371
line; 1372
Thence South 70 degrees 08 minutes 18 seconds West, a 1373
distance of 330.95 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said 1374
line; 1375
Thence South 17 degrees 11 minutes 44 seconds West, a 1376
distance of 651.86 Feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said 1377

H. B. No. 379 Page 49
As Introduced
line; 1378
Thence North 89 degrees 18 minutes 31 seconds West, a 1379
distance of 392.44 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said 1380
line; 1381
Thence South 8 degrees 35 minutes 26 seconds West, a 1382
distance of 357.44 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said 1383
line; 1384
Thence North 81 degrees 35 minutes 15 seconds West, a 1385
distance of 277.26 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said 1386
line; 1387
Thence North 34 degrees 03 minutes 07 seconds West, a 1388
distance of 300.05 feet to an iron pin at angle point in said 1389
line; 1390
Thence North 55 degrees 05 minutes 06 seconds West, a 1391
distance of 651.84 feet to an iron pin on the easterly Limited 1392
Access right-of-way line of said South Hamilton Road, and on the 1393
easterly line of a 28.207 acre tract (Parcel 22-WL) conveyed to 1394
the State of Ohio shown of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395; 1395
Thence North 27 degrees 26 minutes 40 seconds East, along 1396
the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said South 1397
Hamilton Road (easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract), a 1398
distance of 42.52 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said 1399
line; 1400
Thence North 7 degrees 18 minutes 52 seconds East, 1401
continuing along the easterly limited access right-of- way lines 1402
of said South Hamilton Road (easterly line of said 28.207 acre 1403
tract) a distance of 114.08 feet to an iron pin at an angle 1404
point in said line; 1405

H. B. No. 379 Page 50
As Introduced
Thence North 9 degrees 15 minutes 26 seconds East, 1406
continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line 1407
of said South Hamilton Road (easterly line of said 28.207 acre 1408
tract), a distance of 204.66 feet to an iron pin at the 1409
southeasterly corner of said 3.213 acre tract; 1410
Thence South 82 degrees 43 minutes 42 seconds East, along 1411
the right-of-way line of said South Hamilton Road (Southerly 1412
line of said 3.213 acre trat), a distance of 50.00 feet to an 1413
iron pin at the Southeasterly corner of said 3.213 acre tract; 1414
Thence North 6 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East, along 1415
the easterly right-of-way line of said South Hamilton Road 1416
(easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract), a distance of 508.96 1417
feet to an iron pin at an angle point in the said line; 1418
Thence North 4 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds East, 1419
continuing along the easterly right-of-way line of said South 1420
Hamilton Road (easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract), a 1421
distance of 281.67 feet to the place of beginning, containing 1422
54.788 acres, subject to all highways and easements of record, 1423
and of records, easements, and restrictions in the respective 1424
utility offices, also subject to the following described 1425
easement 30 feet wide to be used for Ingress and Egress for farm 1426
equipment, and being more particularly described as follows: 1427
Commencing at a point on the easterly limited access 1428
right-of-way of South Hamilton Road (State Route 317) (FRA-317- 1429
6.38), and on the easterly line of a 28.207 acre tract (Parcel 1430
22-WL) shown of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, said point 1431
being at the southwesterly corner of a 3.213 acre tract (Parcel 1432
22-WD-1) conveyed to the State of Ohio shown of record in Deed 1433
Book 3241, Page 395, said point being 90.00 feet right of 1434
centerline Station 114 + 98.52 as shows on the plans of said 1435

H. B. No. 379 Page 51
As Introduced
South Hamilton Road; 1436
Thence south nine degrees fifteen minutes twenty-six 1437
seconds West (S-9°-15'-26"-W), along the easterly limited access 1438
right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, the easterly line 1439
of said 28.207 acre tract, a distance of 50 feet to a point, and 1440
the true point of beginning of this description. 1441
Thence south eighty degrees forty-four minutes thirty four 1442
seconds east (S-80°-44'-34"E) a distance of 30 feet to a point; 1443
Thence south nine degrees fifteen minutes twenty-six 1444
seconds West (S-9°-15'-26"W), along a line parallel with and 30 1445
feet easterly as measured at right angles to the easterly 1446
limited access right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, a 1447
distance of one hundred fifty-four and fourteen hundredths 1448
(154.14) feet; 1449
Thence south seven degrees eighteen minutes fifty-two 1450
seconds West (S-7°-18-52"W), along a line parallel with and 30 1451
feet easterly as measured at right angles to the easterly 1452
limited access right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, a 1453
distance of one hundred eighteen and ninety-two hundredths 1454
(118.92) feet to a point; 1455
Thence south twenty-seven degrees twenty-six minutes forty 1456
Seconds west (S-27°-26'-40"-W) along a line parallel with and 30 1457
feet easterly as measures at angle to the easterly limited 1458
access right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, a distance 1459
of fifty-one and seventy-three hundredths (51.73) feet to a 1460
point; 1461
Thence north fifty-five degrees five minutes six seconds 1462
west (N-55°-05'-06"-W), a distance of thirty and twenty-six 1463
hundredths (30.26) feet to an iron pin on the easterly limited 1464

H. B. No. 379 Page 52
As Introduced
access right-of-way Line of said south Hamilton Road, the 1465
easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract; 1466
Thence north twenty-seven degrees twenty-six minutes forty 1467
seconds East (N-27°-26'-40"E), along the easterly limited access 1468
Right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, the easterly line 1469
of said 28.207 acre tract a distance of forty-two and fifty-two 1470
hundredths (42.52) feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said 1471
line; 1472
Thence north seven degrees eighteen minutes fifty-two 1473
seconds East (N-7°-18'-52"E), continuing along the easterly 1474
limited access right-of- way line of said south Hamilton Road, 1475
the easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract, a distance of one 1476
hundred fourteen and eight hundredths (114.08) feet to an iron 1477
pin at an angle point in said line; 1478
Thence north nine degrees fifteen minutes twenty-six 1479
seconds east (N-9°-15'-26"-E), continuing along the easterly 1480
limited access right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, 1481
the easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract, a distance of one 1482
hundred fifty-four and sixty-six hundredths (154.66) feet to the 1483
place of beginning containing 0.219 acres, subject however to 1484
all highways and easements of record and of records, easements, 1485
and restrictions in the respective utility offices. 1486
Point of access to the above described easement is right 1487
of highway Station 114+50 as shown on the plans of said Hamilton 1488
Road, and also shown on the records of Deed Book 3421, Page 395, 1489
(The point of access to the Subject 54.788 acre tract is at 1490
highway Station 114+50 as shown on the right-of-way plans of 1491
south Hamilton Road and State Route 317). 1492
PARCEL 2 1493

H. B. No. 379 Page 53
As Introduced
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 1494
Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 1495
11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School 1496
Section 16, as reserved by the Act of Congress in the Land Act 1497
of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as 1498
follows: 1499
Commencing at an iron pin found on the centerline of 1500
Williams Road, at the northwesterly corner of Section 16 said 1501
point being at the northeasterly corner of 0.617 acre tract 1502
conveyed to Stanley F, and Dorothy E. Carter shown of record in 1503
Deed Book 3266,,Page 693 (northeasterly corner of Section 17), 1504
said point being at the intersection of the centerline of said 1505
Williams Road, with the centerline of Hendron Road, dedicated in 1506
Plat Book 48, Page 36; 1507
Thence South 4 degrees 08 minutes 43 seconds West, along 1508
the westerly line of Section 16, (easterly line of Section 17) 1509
and along the easterly line of said 0.617 acre tract, a distance 1510
of 40.00 feet to an iron pin, and the true point of beginning of 1511
this description; 1512
Thence South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along 1513
a line parallel with, and 40.00 feet southerly of, measured at 1514
right angles to the centerline of said Williams Road (northerly 1515
line of Section 16), a distance of 409.82 feet to an iron pin at 1516
the southwesterly corner of a 0.1784 acre tract conveyed to the 1517
Village of Groveport shown of record in Official Record 1067, 1518
PageE-01, and the northwesterly corner of 4.0697 acre tract 1519
(Parcel #2) conveyed to the Barnes Group, Inc. shown of record 1520
in Official Record 1067, Page 6-04; 1521
Thence South, 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along 1522
the westerly line of said 4.0697 acre tract, a distance of 1523

H. B. No. 379 Page 54
As Introduced
456.33 feet to an iron pin at the southwesterly corner of said 1524
4.0697 acre tract, and in the northerly line of a 0.4689 acre 1525
tract (Parcel 2B) conveyed to Ball and Galloway shown of record 1526
is Official Record 1067, Page D-17; 1527
Thence North 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds West, along 1528
the northerly line of said 0.4689 acre tract, a distance of 1529
20.00 feet to an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of said 1530
0.4689 acre tract; 1531
Thence South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along 1532
the westerly line of said 0.4689 acre tract, a distance of 50.00 1533
feet to an iron pin at the southwesterly corner of said 0.4689 1534
acre tract; 1535
Thence South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along 1536
the southerly line of said 0.4689 acre tract, a distance of 1537
408.48 feet to an iron pin at the southeasterly corner of said 1538
0.4689 acre tract, and on the westerly line of an original 1539
44,557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs 1540
shown of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174; 1541
Thence South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, long 1542
the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 1543
404.36 feet to an iron pin at the northeasterly corner of a 1544
5.211 acre tract conveyed to Ball and Galloway shown of record 1545
in Official Record 2103, Page J-16; 1546
Thence North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, the 1547
northerly line of said 5.211acre tract, a distance of 712.08 1548
feet to an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of said 5.211 1549
acre tract; 1550
Thence North 20 degrees 34 minutes 54 seconds West, along 1551
the westerly line of said5.211 acre tract produced northwesterly 1552

H. B. No. 379 Page 55
As Introduced
a distance of 196.13 feet to an iron pin on the westerly line of 1553
Section 16, (easterly line of Section 17) and on the easterly 1554
line of a 12.979 acre tract conveyed to Emil and Giseka Heurich 1555
shown of record in Deed Book 1240, Page 61; 1556
Thence North 4 degrees 08 minutes 43 seconds East, along 1557
the westerly line of Section 16, (easterly line of Section 17) 1558
and along the easterly line of said 12.979 acre tract, and along 1559
the easterly line of said 0.617 acre tract, a distance of 730.00 1560
feet to the place of beginning, containing 11.9133 acres, 1561
subject however to all highways and easements of record, and of 1562
records, easements, and restrictions in the respective utility 1563
offices. 1564
PARCEL 3 1565
Proposed right-of-way limits of Williams Road. 1566
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 1567
Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 1568
11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School 1569
Section 16, as reserved by the Act of Congress in the Land Act 1570
of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as 1571
follows: 1572
Commencing at an iron pin found on the centerline of 1573
Williams Road, at the northwesterly corner of Section 16, said 1574
point being at the northeasterly corner of a 0.617 acre tract 1575
conveyed to Stanley F. and Dorothy E. Carter shown of record in 1576
Deed Book 3266, Page 693 (northeasterly corner of Section 17), 1577
said point being at the intersection of the centerline of said 1578
Williams Road, with the centerline of said Williams Road, with 1579
the centerline of Hendron Road dedicated in Plat Book 48, Page 1580
36; 1581

H. B. No. 379 Page 56
As Introduced
Thence South 4 degrees 08 minutes 43 seconds West, along 1582
the westerly line of Section 16, and along the easterly line of 1583
said 0.617 acre tract (easterly line of Section 17), a distance 1584
of 20.00 feet to an iron pin on the southerly right-of-way of 1585
said Williams Road, and the true point of beginning of this 1586
description; 1587
Thence South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along 1588
the southerly right-of-way line of said Williams Road, and along 1589
the corporation line, and along a line parallel with and 20.00 1590
feet southerly of, measured at right angles to the centerline of 1591
said Williams Road (Northerly line of Section 16), a distance of 1592
409.91 feet to an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of a 1593
0.1784 acre tract conveyed to the Village of Groveport shown of 1594
record in Official Records 1067, Page E-01; 1595
Thence South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along 1596
the westerly line of said 0.1784 acre tract, a distance of 20.00 1597
feet to an iron pin at the southwesterly corner of said 0.1784 1598
acre tract, and northwesterly corner of a 4.0697 acre tract 1599
(Parcel #2) conveyed to the Barnes Group, Inc. shown of record 1600
in Official Record 1067, Page C-04; 1601
Thence North 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds West, along 1602
a line parallel with and 40.00 feet southerly of measured at 1603
right angles to the centerline of said Willians Road (northly 1604
line of Section 16), a distance of 409.82 feet to an iron pin on 1605
the westerly line of Section 16, and on the easterly line of 1606
said 0.617 acre tract (easterly line of Section 17); 1607
Thence North 4 degrees 08 minutes 43 seconds East, along 1608
the westerly line of Section 16, and along the easterly line of 1609
said 0.617 acre tract (easterly line of Section 17), a distance 1610
of 20.00 feet to the place of the beginning, containing 0.1882 1611

H. B. No. 379 Page 57
As Introduced
acres, subject however to all highways and easements of record, 1612
and of records, easements and restrictions in the respective 1613
utility offices. 1614
The above descriptions were prepared by Albert H. Andrews, 1615
Registered Surveyor No. 5699. 1616
Tract 15 1617
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 1618
Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 1619
11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School 1620
Section 16, as reserved by the Act of Congress in the Land Act 1621
of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as 1622
follows: 1623
Beginning at a point in the southeast corner of the W.C.N. 1624
Enterprises 4.647 acre tract recorded in Official Record 2068, 1625
Pg. F-19 and proceeding in a southerly line S. 4° 24' 29" W., 30 1626
feet to a point; 1627
Thence west along a line N. 85° 35' 31" W. for a distance 1628
of 381.19 feet to a point in the westerly boundary; 1629
Thence north along a line S. 4° 24' 29" W. 30 feet to an 1630
iron pin; 1631
Thence east along a line N. 85° 35' 31" W. 381.19 feet to 1632
the point of beginning, containing.2625 acres more or less. 1633
The above description was prepared by Albert Myers, 1634
Registered Surveyor No. 6579. 1635
Tract 16 1636
Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 1637
Village of Groveport, Part of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, 1638

H. B. No. 379 Page 58
As Introduced
Congress Lands, and being part of the 49.998 acre tract conveyed 1639
to Madison Local School District recorded in Deed Book 3336, 1640
Page 482, (Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio), and being 1641
more particularly described as follows: 1642
Beginning at a point in the north line of the said 49.998 1643
acre tract, said point being the intersection of said line with 1644
the east line, (produced southernly), of the 4.647 acre tract 1645
conveyed to W.C.N. Enterprises Limited, recorded in Official 1646
Records Volume 2068, F-19, said point being located 30.0 feet 1647
south of the southeast corner of the said 4.647 acre tract; said 1648
point also being in a southerly line of the 40 acre tract to 1649
Easten Franklin County Joint Vocational School District (Volume 1650
17, Page 48, School Land Records, State Auditor's Office); 1651
Thence South 4° degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, across 1652
the said 49.998 acre tract, along the east line (produced 1653
southerly) of the said 4.647 acre tract, a distance of 0.0 feet 1654
to a point; 1655
Thence, North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, 1656
across the said 49.998 acre tract, along a line parallel with 1657
the north line of said tract and parallel with the south line of 1658
the said 4.647 acre tract, a distance of 381.19 feet to a point, 1659
said point being the intersection of said line with a west line 1660
(produced southerly) of the said 4.647 acre tract; 1661
Thence, North 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds East, across 1662
the said 49.998 acre tract and along a west line of the said 1663
4.647 acre tract (produced southerly), a distance of 30.0 feet 1664
to a point in the north line of the said 49.998 acre tract 1665
(south line of the said 40.0 acre tract); 1666
Thence, South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along 1667

H. B. No. 379 Page 59
As Introduced
part of the north line of said 49.998 acre tract, along a line 1668
parallel with and 30.0 feet south of the south line of the said 1669
4.647 acre tract, a distance of 381.19 feet to the place of the 1670
beginning containing 0.2625 acres of land, subject however to 1671
all legal highways and easements and restrictions of record. 1672
The above was prepared from records only. The basis of 1673
bearing is the south line of said 4.647 acre tract. 1674
MYERS SURVEYING COMPANY, INC. 1675
Albert J. Myers, P. S. 6579 1676
Tract 17 1677
Situated in Madison Township, Franklin County, Ohio, and 1678
being part of the Northwest Corner of Section 16, Town 11N, 1679
Range 21W, of Congress Lands, being that section set aside by 1680
Act of Congress dated March 3, 1803, for schools and in Trust to 1681
the State of Ohio, and being more particularly described as 1682
follows: 1683
Beginning at a stone found at the northeast corner of said 1684
section, thence South 00 degrees 01 minute 00 seconds East along 1685
the east line of said section 943.21 feet to a pin set in the 1686
north line of Route 33, thence, the following courses along the 1687
north line of said Route: 1688
North 54 degrees 06 minutes 00 seconds West 92.46 feet to 1689
a point, 1690
North 52 degrees 40 minutes 04 seconds West 170.05 feet to 1691
a point, 1692
North 53 degrees 42 minutes 52 seconds West 55.00 feet to 1693
a point, 1694

H. B. No. 379 Page 60
As Introduced
North 52 degrees 20 minutes 21 seconds West 175.08 feet to 1695
a point, 1696
North 52 degrees 57 minutes 15 seconds West 500.10 feet to 1697
a point, 1698
North 56 degrees 57 minutes 55 seconds West 200.25 feet to 1699
a point, 1700
North 59 degrees 48 minutes 38 seconds West 100.50 feet to 1701
a point, 1702
North 54 degrees 06 minutes 00 seconds West 314.29 feet to 1703
a pin set in the north line of said section at its intersection 1704
with said north line of Route 33, thence, North 89 degrees 57 1705
minutes 13 seconds East along the north line of said section 1706
1301.27 feet to the place of beginning. Containing 13.792 acres 1707
of land, and being all that part of section 16 that line north 1708
of the north line of Route 33. 1709
Excepting therefrom, all that land which lies south and 1710
east of the west bank of Blacklick Creek being 2.268 Acres of 1711
land. And being more particularly described as follows: 1712
Beginning at a pin at the southernmost corner of the above- 1713
described parcel at the intersection of the north line of Route 1714
33 and the east line of section 16: 1715
Thence, along said north line of Route 33 the following 1716
courses: 1717
North 54 degrees 06 minutes 00 seconds West 92.46 feet to 1718
a point, 1719
North 52 degrees 40 minutes 04 seconds West 170.05 feet to 1720
a point, 1721
North 53 degrees 42 minutes 52 seconds West 55.00 feet to 1722

H. B. No. 379 Page 61
As Introduced
a point, 1723
North 52 degrees 20 minutes 21 seconds West 175.00 feet to 1724
a point. 1725
Thence, leaving said line North 82 degrees 39 minutes 36 1726
seconds East across said parcel 442.31 feet to a point in the 1727
east line of said section. 1728
Thence, South 00 degrees 01 minute 00 seconds East along 1729
said section line 500.00 feet to the place of beginning. 1730
Allowing 11.524 acres of land to be transferred herewith. 1731
This description is based on a field survey done by Ahlers 1732
Moe and Associate, Inc. in May of 1988, which bearings are based 1733
on the Centerline of Route 33 being North 54 degrees 06 minutes 1734
00 seconds West. 1735
Tract 18 1736
Situated in Madison Township, Franklin County, Ohio, and 1737
being part of Section 16, Town 11N, Range 21W, of Congress 1738
Lands, being that section set aside by Act of Congress dated 1739
March 3, 1803 for schools and in Trust to the State of Ohio, and 1740
being more particularly described as follows: 1741
Beginning at an iron pin found at a Southwesterly corner 1742
of Hamilton/33 Industrial Park of record in Plat Book 70, Page 1743
62/63 (all deed and plat reference refer to the records of the 1744
Recorder's Office Franklin County, Ohio) said pin also being in 1745
the Easterly right-of-way of Hamilton Road, S.R. 317; 1746
Thence South 55 degrees 05 minutes 06 seconds East with a 1747
Southerly line of said Hamilton/33 Industrial Park a distance of 1748
415.36 to an iron pin found at the Southwesterly corner of Lot 1749
#8 of said Hamilton/33 Industrial Park. 1750

H. B. No. 379 Page 62
As Introduced
Thence South 34 degrees 54 minutes 54 seconds West a 1751
distance of 58.02 feet to an iron pin set; 1752
Thence North 64 degrees 01 minute 43 seconds West a 1753
distance of 101.50 feet to an iron pin set at an angle point; 1754
Thence North 69 degrees 59 minutes 33 seconds West a 1755
distance of 254.42 feet to a pin set in said Easterly right-of- 1756
way. 1757
Thence North 08 degrees 24 minutes 35 seconds East with 1758
said easterly right-of-way distance of 155.57 feet to the POINT 1759
OF BEGINNING and containing 0.863 acres of land more or less. 1760
Subject to all, restrictions, easements and right-of-way 1761
of record. 1762
This description was prepared by Civil Engineering 1763
Associate's, Inc., Columbus, Ohio, based on a field survey of 1764
the premises in June, 1989 by Jeffrey A. Miller, P.S. # 7211. 1765
The basis of bearings used herein is in the same bearing system 1766
as Hamilton/33 Industrial Park, a plat of this survey is 1767
attached hereto and made a part thereof. 1768
Tract 19 1769
Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, 1770
State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 1771
North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the 1772
State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, 1773
R.C. Section 501.01; also being a portion of school lands as 1774
described in a Journal Entry by the Office of the Auditor of the 1775
State of Ohio, Volume 17 Page 48 (dated 7/14/1966), allocating a 1776
40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational 1777
School District, now known as The Eastland-Fairfield Career & 1778
Technical Schools; being more particularly described as follows: 1779

H. B. No. 379 Page 63
As Introduced
Beginning at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of 1780
the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 1781
317; right-of-way varies) and the southerly right-of-way line of 1782
Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in 1783
"Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors 1784
Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland 1785
Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46 Page 93; said 1786
point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as 1787
transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, 1788
as recorded in Deed Book 3241 Page 395 Parcel 22-WL, said point 1789
being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, and from said beginning point 1790
running thence the following four courses along the westerly 1791
right-of-way lines of Hamilton Road and along westerly lines of 1792
said 7.507 acre tract: 1793
(1) South 12° 10' 08" East for a distance of 104.34' to an 1794
iron pin set; thence, 1795
(2) South 04° 31' 49" West for a distance of 250.00' to an 1796
iron pin set; thence, 1797
(3) South 06° 26' 22" West for a distance of 300.17' to an 1798
iron pin set; thence, 1799
(4) South 01° 15' 35" West for a distance of 160.67' to a 1800
point, said point referenced by an iron pin set that bears North 1801
85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 5.00' from said corner, said 1802
point also being along the northerly line of a 49.736 acre 1803
tract, the residual of a 49.998 acre tract as conveyed to 1804
Madison Local School District as described in Deed Book 3336 1805
Page 482; thence, 1806
Along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and 1807
along the northerly line of said 49.736 acre tract, North 85° 1808

H. B. No. 379 Page 64
As Introduced
35' 40" West for a distance of 1496.33' to a point, passing over 1809
an iron pin set at a distance of 5.00' from the beginning of 1810
this course and passing over an iron pin set at a distance of 1811
3.00' from the terminus of this course, said point also 1812
witnessed by an iron pin that bears South 04° 18' 59" West for a 1813
distance of 3.00' from said point; said point also being the 1814
southeasterly corner of a 0.2625 acre tract as conveyed to 1815
Groveport Madison Local School District as described in 1816
Instrument No. 201601070002077 Tract 1, said point also being 1817
the northeasterly corner of a 0.2625 acre tract as conveyed to 1818
Groveport Madison Local School District as described in 1819
Instrument No. 201601070002077 Tract 2, thence, 1820
Along the easterly line of said 0.2625 acre tract as 1821
described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 Tract 1 and then 1822
along the easterly line of a 4.647 acre tract as conveyed to 1823
Groveport Madison Local School District as described in 1824
Instrument No. 201511160161625 and then along the easterly line 1825
of a 1.6187 acre tract as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local 1826
School District as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 1827
and then along the easterly line of a 2.10 acre tract as 1828
conveyed to Corporation of the Presiding Bishop of the Church of 1829
Jesus Christ of the Latter-Day Saints as described in Deed Book 1830
3752 Page 204, North 04° 18' 59" East for a distance of 1100.52' 1831
to a 1" iron pipe found, passing over an iron pin set at a 1832
distance of 288.33' from the terminus of this course, said point 1833
being the northwesterly corner of said 40.00 acre tract, said 1834
point also being the northeasterly corner of said 2.10 acre 1835
tract, said point also being along the southerly line of a 4.410 1836
acre tract as conveyed to Mulligan Real Estate II, LLC as 1837
described in Instrument No. 201403140031424; thence, 1838
Along the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and 1839

H. B. No. 379 Page 65
As Introduced
along the southerly line of said 4.410 acre tract and then along 1840
the southerly line of a 1.500 acre tract as conveyed to Charles 1841
and Vicki Golden as described in Instrument No. 200108140187784, 1842
Instrument No 200108140187785 and Instrument No. 200108140187788 1843
and then along the southerly line of a 3.00 acre tract as 1844
conveyed to Kinell Properties, LLC as described in Instrument 1845
No. 201201050001830 and then along the southerly line of a 2.433 1846
acre tract as conveyed to Peerless Saw Company as described in 1847
Official Record 8645 B-05, South 85° 36' 06" East for a distance 1848
of 1224.44' to a 1" iron pipe found, said point being the 1849
southeasterly corner of said 2.433 acre tract and being along 1850
the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard (60' 1851
right-of-way as dedicated in Plat Book 46 Page 93); thence, 1852
Along the westerly right-of-way line of Directors 1853
Boulevard, South 20° 36' 06" East for a distance of 320.30' to a 1854
railroad spike found; thence, 1855
Along the southerly right-of-way line of Directors 1856
Boulevard, South 85° 36' 06" East for a distance of 110.81' to 1857
the point of beginning, containing 36.400 acres of land, more or 1858
less, as determined by Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, 1859
Ohio License No. 7978, based on a survey performed by The 1860
Kleingers Group in June, 2017. 1861
Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the 1862
State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), 1863
with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors 1864
Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS 1865
survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935". 1866
Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic 1867
identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP". 1868

H. B. No. 379 Page 66
As Introduced
Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, 1869
ordinances or agreements of record. 1870
Tract 20 1871
Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, 1872
State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 1873
North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the 1874
State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, 1875
R.C. Section 501.01; also being a portion of school lands as 1876
described in a Journal Entry by the Office of the Auditor of the 1877
State of Ohio, Volume 17 Page 48 (dated 7/14/1966), allocating a 1878
40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational 1879
School District, now known as The Eastland-Fairfield Career & 1880
Technical Schools; being more particularly described as follows: 1881
Beginning at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of 1882
the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 1883
317; right-of-way varies) and the northerly right-of-way line of 1884
Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in 1885
"Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors 1886
Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland 1887
Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46 Page 93; said 1888
point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as 1889
transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, 1890
as recorded in Deed Book 3241 Page 395 Parcel 22-WL, said point 1891
being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, and from said beginning point 1892
running 1893
Along the northerly right-of-way line of Directors 1894
Boulevard, North 85° 36' 06" West for a distance of 62.95' to an 1895
iron pin set at a point of curvature; thence, 1896
Along the northerly right-of-way line of Directors 1897

H. B. No. 379 Page 67
As Introduced
Boulevard following a curve to the right having an arc length of 1898
28.36', a radius of 25.00', a central angle of 65° 00' 00", and 1899
a chord that bears North 53° 06' 06" West for a distance of 1900
26.86' to an iron pin set at a point of tangency; thence, 1901
Along the easterly right-of-way line of Directors 1902
Boulevard, North 20° 36' 06" West for a distance of 216.10' to a 1903
1" iron pipe found in the northerly line of said 40.00 acre 1904
tract, said point being the southwesterly corner of a 3.381 acre 1905
tract as conveyed to 4343 South Hamilton Road, LLC as described 1906
in Instrument No. 199901040000730; thence, 1907
Along the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and the 1908
southerly line of said 3.381 acre tract, South 85° 36' 06" East 1909
for a distance of 170.62' to a 1" iron pipe found, said point 1910
being the southeasterly corner of said 3.381 acre tract, said 1911
point being along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and 1912
along the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road; thence, 1913
Along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and along 1914
the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road, South 04° 31' 1915
49" West for a distance of 40.22' to a 1" iron pipe found; 1916
thence, 1917
Along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and along 1918
the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road, South 02° 14' 1919
23" West for a distance of 170.20' to the point of beginning, 1920
containing 0.598 acres of land, more or less, as determined by 1921
Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, Ohio License No. 7978, 1922
based on a survey performed by The Kleingers Group in June, 1923
2017. 1924
Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the 1925
State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), 1926

H. B. No. 379 Page 68
As Introduced
with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors 1927
Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS 1928
survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935". 1929
Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic 1930
identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP". 1931
Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, 1932
ordinances or agreements of record. 1933
Tract 21 1934
Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, 1935
State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 1936
North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the 1937
State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, 1938
R.C. Section 501.01; also being a portion of school lands as 1939
described in a Journal Entry by the Office of the Auditor of the 1940
State of Ohio, Volume 17 Page 48 (dated 7/14/1966), allocating a 1941
40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational 1942
School District, now known as The Eastland-Fairfield Career & 1943
Technical Schools; being more particularly described as follows: 1944
Commencing at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of 1945
the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 1946
317; right-of-way varies) and the southerly right-of-way line of 1947
Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in 1948
"Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors 1949
Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland 1950
Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46 Page 93; said 1951
point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as 1952
transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, 1953
as recorded in Deed Book 3241 Page 395 Parcel 22-WL, thence the 1954
following four courses along the westerly right-of-way lines of 1955

H. B. No. 379 Page 69
As Introduced
Hamilton Road and along westerly lines of said 7.507 acre tract: 1956
(1) South 12° 10' 08" East for a distance of 104.34' to an 1957
iron pin set; thence, 1958
(2) South 04° 31' 49" West for a distance of 250.00' to an 1959
iron pin set; thence, 1960
(3) South 06° 26' 22" West for a distance of 300.17' to an 1961
iron pin set; thence, 1962
(4) South 01° 15' 35" West for a distance of 160.67' to a 1963
point, said point referenced by an iron pin set that bears North 1964
85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 5.00' from said corner, said 1965
point also being along the northerly line of a 49.736 acre 1966
tract, the residual of a 49.998 acre tract as conveyed to 1967
Madison Local School District as described in Deed Book 3336 1968
Page 482; said point being the thence, 1969
Along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and 1970
along the northerly line of said 49.736 acre tract and then 1971
along a common line between two 0.2625 acre tracts as conveyed 1972
to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in 1973
Instrument No. 201601070002077 Tracts 1 and 2, North 85° 35' 40" 1974
West for a distance of 1877.52' to an iron pin set, passing over 1975
an iron pins set at a distance of 5.00' and at a distance of 1976
1493.33 from the beginning of this course, said point being 1977
along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, said point 1978
also being a common corner of said 49.736 acre tract and said 1979
0.2625 acre tracts, said point also being the TRUE POINT OF 1980
BEGINNING, and from said beginning point running thence, 1981
Along a common line between said 40.00 acre tract and said 1982
49.736 acre tract, North 85° 35' 53" West for a distance of 1983
280.18' to a point generally along Black Lick Creek, said point 1984

H. B. No. 379 Page 70
As Introduced
witnessed by a 1" iron pipe found that bears South 53° 43' 34" 1985
East for a distance of 0.93' from said point; thence, 1986
Along a westerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and 1987
generally following Black Lick Creek, North 48° 01' 47" West for 1988
a distance of 49.20' to a point, said point witnessed by a 1" 1989
iron pipe found that bears South 25° 51' 12" East for a distance 1990
of 0.54' from said point; thence, 1991
Along a northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, South 85° 1992
35' 53" East for a distance of 319.10' to an iron pin set, said 1993
point being the northwesterly corner of said northerly-most 1994
0.2625 acre tract as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 1995
Tract 1; thence, 1996
Along the westerly line of said 0.2625 acre tract, South 1997
04° 15' 07" West for a distance of 30.00' to the point of 1998
beginning, containing 0.206 acres of land, more or less, as 1999
determined by Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, Ohio 2000
License No. 7978, based on a survey performed by The Kleingers 2001
Group in June, 2017. 2002
Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the 2003
State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), 2004
with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors 2005
Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS 2006
survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935". 2007
Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic 2008
identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP". 2009
Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, 2010
ordinances or agreements of record. 2011
Partition Tract Sources of Title 2012

H. B. No. 379 Page 71
As Introduced
Tract Recording Reference Conveyance Type Acreage Notes 2013
1 DB 3259 page 238 Governor's Deed 10.789 Board if FCC 2014
2 DB 3327 page 174 Governor's Deed 44,557 Private 2015
Developer 2016
3 DB 3336 page 482 Governor's Deed 49,998 Madison Local 2017
S. D. 2018
4 DB 3585 page 424 Governor's Deed 7.3032 Private 2019
Developer 2020
1.1866 2021
5 DB 3636 page 185 Governor's Deed 64.627 Private 2022
Developer 2023
6 DB 3636 page 225 Governor's Deed 0.144 Private 2024
Developer 2025
7 DB 3673 page 519 Governor's Deed 11.849 Private 2026
Developer 2027
8 DB 3718 page 413 Governor's Deed 1.320 Private 2028
Developer 2029
9 OR 473 F10 Governor's Deed 0.0395 Private Developer 2030
9 OR 485 B 19 Governor's Deed 0.0395 Re-record OR 473 F10 2031
10 OR 721 A12 Governor's Deed 0.104 Private Developed 2032
11 OR 1067 D17 Governor's Deed 4.0697 Private Developed 2033
0.1784 2034
0.4689 2035
12 OR 1739 106 Governor's Deed 42.849 Private Developed 2036

H. B. No. 379 Page 72
As Introduced
13 OR 2103 J16 Governor's Deed 5.211 Private Developer 2037
14 OR 2891 119 Governor's Deed 54.788 Private Developed 2038
11.9133 2039
0.1882 2040
15 OR 4791 F07 Governor's Deed 0.2625 Private Developer 2041
16 OR 4951 J10 Governor's Deed 4.647 Private Developer 2042
17 OR 12990 G07 Governor's Deed 11.524 Private Developer 2043
18 OR 15062 J04 Governor's Deed 0.863 Private Developer 2044
19 36.400 Eastland-Fairfield 2045
20 0.598 Eastland-Fairfield 2046
21 0.026 Eastland-Fairfield 2047
Rights of Way 2048
All of the above-described real estate is subject to the 2049
following Rights-of-Way as established by the Franklin County 2050
Commissioners: 2051
Bixby Road in Road Record 7 page 63. 2052
Williams Road in Road Record 7 page 347. 2053
Hendron Road in Road Record 7 page 397. 2054
Hamilton Road Record 8 page 470. 2055
AND, 2056
Subject to the following easement Rights-of-Way and 2057
Rights-of Entry for SR-317 as established by deed to the State 2058
of Ohio in Deed Book 3241 page 395 and Deed Book 3189 page 623, 2059
respectively more particularly described as follows: 2060

H. B. No. 379 Page 73
As Introduced
PARCEL NO. 22-WL 2061
Being a parcel of land lying on the right and left sides 2062
of the centerline of a survey, made by the Department of 2063
Highways, and recorded in Book 41, Page 65, of the records of 2064
Franklin County and being located within the following described 2065
points in the boundary thereof: 2066
Beginning at a point in the grantor's southerly line and 2067
the northerly line of Section 21 and in the southerly line of 2068
Section 16 which lies North 85° 19' 06" W., a distance of 135.62 2069
feet from the half-section corner, said point being 150.00 feet 2070
right of and radially from Station 103+12.60 in the centerline 2071
of a survey made in 1968 by the Ohio Department of Highways of 2072
State Route 317, Section 6.38 in Franklin County; thence N. 85° 2073
19' 06" W., a distance of 339.31 feet passing the centerline of 2074
Survey at P.O.C. Station 102+37.94 along the grantor's southerly 2075
line and the northerly line of the Fern Cole 136.670 acre tract 2076
of land of record in Volume 2616, Page 454 of the Franklin 2077
County Deed Records and also along the southerly lime of Section 2078
16 to a point 150.00 feet left of and radially from Station 2079
101+53.82; thence 1274.29 feet along the line of a circular 2080
curve to the left, the radius of which is 2714.79 feet, the 2081
delta of which is 26° 53' 38", and the chord of which bears N. 2082
20° 43' 07" E., a distance of 1262.62 feet to a point 150.00 2083
feet left and radially from C.S. Station 114+98.52; thence. 9° 2084
10" 10" E., a distance of 293.14 feet to a point 130.00 feet 2085
left of S.T. Station 117+98.52; thence N. 11 20" 42"E., a 2086
distance of 203.03 feet to a point 105.00 left of Station 120+ 2087
00.00; thence N. 6° 25' 09" E., a distance of 400.28 feet to a 2088
point 90.00 feet left of Station 124+00.00; thence N. 4° 16' 18" 2089
E., a distance of 620.10 feet to a point 90.00 feet left and 2090
along the angular bisector from P. I. Station 130+19.90; thence 2091

H. B. No. 379 Page 74
As Introduced
N. 4° 31' 58" E., a distance of 330.31 feet to a point 90.00 2092
feet left of Station of 130+50.00; thence N. 1° 15" 44" E., a 2093
distance of 300.17 feet to a point 110.00 feet left of Station 2094
137+00.00; thence N. 6° 26' 31" E., a distance of 300.17 feet to 2095
a point 100.00 feet left of Station 140+00.00; thence N. 4° 31' 2096
58" E., a distance of 250.00 feet to a point 100.00 feet left of 2097
Station 142+50.00; thence N. 12° 09' 59" W., a distance of 2098
104.40 feet to a point 130.00 feet left of Station 143+50.00; 2099
thence N. 2° 14' 31" E., a distance of 250.20 feet to a point 2100
140.00 feet left of Station146+00.00; thence N. 4° 31' 58" E., a 2101
distance of 300.00 feet to a point 140.00 feet left of Station 2102
149+00.00; thence N. 15° 50' 33" E., a distance of 152.97 feet 2103
to a point 110.00 feet left of Station 150+50.00; thence N. 4° 2104
31' 58" E., a distance of 300.00 feet to a point 110.00 left of 2105
Station 153+50.00; thence N. 00° 02' 28" W., a distance of 2106
250.80 feet to a point 130.00 feet left of Station 156+00.00; 2107
thence N. 30° 15' 51" W., a distance of 131.43 feet to a point 2108
in the grantor's Northerly line and the northerly line of 2109
Section 16 and in the southerly line of Section 9, said point 2110
being 205.00 feet left of Station 157+07.93; thence S. 85° 48' 2111
24" E., a distance of 285.00 feet along the grantor's northerly 2112
line and the southerly line of the Dorothy M. Davis and 2113
Marguerite C. Hinton 6.208 acre tract of land of record in 2114
Volume 2375, Page 396 of Franklin County Deed Records and the 2115
northerly line of Section 16 and the southerly line of Section 2116
9, passing the centerline of Survey at P.O.T. Station 157+09.14 2117
to a point 80.00 feet right of Station 157+09.61: thence S. 4° 2118
31' 58" W., a distance of 209.61 feet to a point 80.00 feet 2119
right of Station 155+00.00; thence S. 1° 05' 57" W., a distance 2120
of 500.90 feet to a point 110.00 feet right of Station 2121
150+00.00; thence S. 4° 31' 58" W., a distance of 500.00 feet to 2122
a point 110.00 feet right of Station 145+00.00; thence S. 10° 2123

H. B. No. 379 Page 75
As Introduced
48' 38" W., a distance of 100.60 feet to a point 99.00 feet 2124
right of Station 144+00.00; thence S. 4° 31' 58" W., a distance 2125
of 1379.87 feet to a point 99.00 feet right of and along the 2126
angular bisector from P. I. Station 130+19.90; thence S. 4° 16' 2127
18" W., a distance of 1221.15 feet to a point 99.00 feet right 2128
of S.T. Station 117+98.52; thence S. 6° 58' 12" W., a distance 2129
of 305.02 feet to a point 90.00 feet right of and radially from 2130
C.S. Station 114+98.52; thence S. 9° 15' 26" W., a distance of 2131
204.66 feet to a point 90.00 feet right of and radially from 2132
Station 113+00.00; thence S. 7° 18" 52" W., a distance of 114.03 2133
feet to a point 100.00 feet right of and radially from Station 2134
111+90.00; thence S. 27° 26' 40" W., a distance of 42.52 feet to 2135
a point 90.00 feet right of and radially from Station 111+50.00; 2136
thence S. 8° 24' 35" W., a distance of 369.32 feet to a point 2137
150.00 feet right of and radially from Station 108+00.00; thence 2138
512.92 feet along the line of the circular curve to the right, 2139
the radius of which us 3014.79 feet, the delta of which is 9° 2140
44' 53", and the chord if which bears S., 26°06' 57" W., a 2141
distance of 512.29 feet to the point of beginning containing 2142
28.207 acres, more or less, of which the present road occupies 2143
7.507 acres, more or less. 2144
Except that the grantor reserves the right to ingress and 2145
egress right of and radially from Station 114+50; left of and 2146
radially from Station 114+50, right of Station 128+04.20, left 2147
of Station 128+04.20, right of Station 143+80.20, and left of 2148
Station 143+80.20. 2149
PARCEL NO. 22-WD 2150
Beginning at a point in the line between Section 21 and 2151
Section 16 which lies N. 85° 19" 06" W., a distance of 474.93 2152
feet from the half section point; said point being 150.00 feet 2153

H. B. No. 379 Page 76
As Introduced
left of and radially from Station 101+53.82 in the centerline of 2154
a survey made in 1968 by the Ohio Department of Highways of 2155
State Route 317, Section 6.38, in Franklin County; thence N. 85° 2156
19' 06" W., a distance of 319.98 feet along the section line to 2157
a point 1.13 feet right of Station 5+50.00 in the centerline of 2158
Bixby Road West, as the same was established as part of the 2159
aforementioned survey of State Route 317; thence N. 4° 40' 19" 2160
E., a distance of 41.23 feet to a point 40.00 feet left of 2161
Station 5+50.00; thence S. 85° 19' 06" E., a distance of 341.54 2162
feet parallel to the section line to a point 150.00 feet left of 2163
and radially from State Route 317 Station 102+00.72; thence S. 2164
33° 41' 48" W., a distance of 44.45 feet to the point of the 2165
beginning containing 0.299 acres, more or less, of which the 2166
present road occupies 0.224 acres, more or less. 2167
PARCEL NO. 22 – WD-1 2168
Beginning at a point which lies 90.00 feet right of and 2169
radially from C. S. Station 114+98.52 in the centerline of a 2170
survey made in 1968 by The Ohio Department of Highways of State 2171
Route 317, Section 6.38, in Franklin County; thence N. 6° 58' 2172
12" E., a distance of 305.02 feet to a point 99.00 feet right of 2173
S.T. Station 117+98.52; thence N. 4° 16' 18" E., a distance of 2174
1221.15 feet to a point 99.00 feet right of and along the 2175
angular bisector from P.I. Station 130+19.90: thence N. 4° 31' 2176
58"E., a distance of 1379.87 feet to a point 99.00 feet right of 2177
Station 144+00.00; thence N. 10° 48' 38" E., a distance of 2178
100.60 feet to a point 110.00 feet right of Station 145.00.00; 2179
thence S. 12° 09' 59" E., a distance of 104.40 feet to a point 2180
140.00 feet right of Station 144+00.00; thence S. 4° 31' 58" W., 2181
a distance of 400.00 feet to a point 140.00 feet right of 2182
Station 140+00.00; thence S. 3° 56" 53" W., a distance of 979.81 2183
feet to a point 150.00 feet right of and along the angular 2184

H. B. No. 379 Page 77
As Introduced
bisector from P.I. Station 130+19.90: thence S. 4° 16' 18" W., a 2185
distance of 1019.56 feet to a point 150.00 feet right of Station 2186
120+00.00; thence S. 6° 00' 31" W., a distance of 508.96 feet to 2187
point 140.00 feet right of and radially from C. S> Station 2188
114+98.52; thence N. 82° 43" 42" W., a distance of 50.00 feet to 2189
the point of beginning.. 2190
It is understood that the tract of land above described 2191
contains 3.213 acres, more or less, exclusive of the present 2192
road which occupies 0.000 acres, more or less. 2193
All of the above descriptions are based on a survey made 2194
under the direction of David B. Guthrie, Registered Surveyor No. 2195
4378. 2196
AND 2197
Subject to the existing easement Rights-of-Way for US-33 2198
delineated and occupied as Parcels 42-LA, 42-X1, 42-X2, 42-X3, 2199
42-Y1, 42-Y2 and 42-WA on the State of Ohio Department of 2200
Highways plan set titled FRA-33-(26.21-30.13). 2201
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 2202
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 2203
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 2204
facilitate recordation of the deed. 2205
(B) Pursuant to various Acts of Congress, section 16 in 2206
every township was dedicated for the use of schools (the "school 2207
lands"). In 1985, pursuant to former sections 501.01, et seq., 2208
of the Ohio Revised Code, the Ohio Department of Administrative 2209
Services was granted administrative control of school lands. 2210
Then in 1988, sections 501.01, et seq., of the Ohio Revised Code 2211
were amended to grant administrative control of school lands to 2212
the board of education of each school district. The real estate 2213

H. B. No. 379 Page 78
As Introduced
described herein are the remaining portions of section 16 in 2214
Madison Township, Franklin County, which have not been conveyed 2215
to purchasers over the years. The real estate is currently 2216
titled in the records of the Franklin County Auditor as State of 2217
Ohio for the use and benefit of the Department of Administrative 2218
Services. The purpose of this legislation is to correct title of 2219
the real estate to the State of Ohio for the use and benefit of 2220
the Board of Education of the Groveport Madison Local School 2221
District. 2222
(C) The conveyance is subject to all easements, covenants, 2223
conditions, leases, and restrictions of record: all legal 2224
highways and public rights-of-way; zoning, building, and other 2225
laws, ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate 2226
taxes and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate 2227
shall be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" 2228
condition. 2229
(D) Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the 2230
purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title 2231
evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording 2232
costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and 2233
costs that may be imposed. 2234
(E) The Director of the Department of Administrative 2235
Services, with the assistance of the Attorney General, shall 2236
prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate described in 2237
division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed shall state 2238
the consideration and shall be executed by the Governor in the 2239
name of the State, countersigned by the Secretary of State, 2240
sealed with the Great Seal of the State, presented in the 2241
Department of Administrative Services for recording, and 2242
delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall present the 2243

H. B. No. 379 Page 79
As Introduced
Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the Franklin 2244
County Recorder. 2245
(F) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 2246
date. 2247
Section 5. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed 2248
in the name of the State conveying to the Madison County Board 2249
of Commissioners ("Grantee"), and its successors and assigns, 2250
all of the State's right, title, and interest in the following 2251
described real estate: 2252
The following described 10.8003-acre tract is situated in 2253
the State of Ohio, Madison County, Deer Creek Township, VMS 2254
6246, being part of a 579.44 original acre tract (Deer Creek 2255
Township Parcel 05-00542.000) as conveyed to the State of Ohio 2256
Madison Correctional Prison by Deed Book 134 page 347, and being 2257
more particularly described as follows: 2258
Beginning at a mag nail set in the centerline of State 2259
Route 38, in the line between VMS 6246 and VMS 6169, in the line 2260
between Deer Creek Township and the City of London, being the 2261
Southeast corner of a 1.000-acre tract conveyed to Tom Farms Inc 2262
by Deed Book 278 page 889 and a corner to said 579.44 original 2263
acre tract, said mag nail bears North 15° 36' 05" West a 2264
distance of 5646.35 feet from Madison County Monument 02-004, 2265
said mag nail bears North 04° 15' 00" East a distance of 1079.10 2266
feet from the intersection of the centerline of State Route 38 2267
with the line between Deer Creek Township and Union Township; 2268
Thence, with the centerline of State Route 38, said VMS 2269
line and said Corp. line, South 04° 15' 00" West a distance of 2270
616.00 feet to a mag nail set; 2271
Thence, across said 579.44 original acre tract with the 2272

H. B. No. 379 Page 80
As Introduced
following two new courses: 2273
(1) South 81° 53' 47" West, passing an iron pin and cap 2274
set at 35.00 feet, a total distance of 728.66 feet to an iron 2275
pin and cap set; 2276
(2) North 10° 12' 38" West a distance of 569.69 feet to an 2277
iron pin and cap set in the South line of a 100 original acre 2278
tract conveyed to Tom Farms Inc by Deed Book 268 page 770. 2279
Thence, with the South line of said 100 original acre 2280
tract, North 79° 47' 22" East, passing a 1/2-inch diameter iron 2281
pipe found at the Southwest corner of said Tom Farms Inc's 1.000 2282
acre tract at 591.70 feet, passing a 5-inch diameter steel post 2283
in concrete found at 849.53 feet, a total distance of 881.99 2284
feet returning to the Point of Beginning, containing 10.8003 2285
Acres more or less. 2286
Bearings are based on the centerline of State Route 38 2287
(North 04° 15' 00" East) as described in Official Record 307, 2288
page 2131. 2289
Subject to and with the benefit of all legal highways, 2290
restrictions, easements, limitations, and reservations, of 2291
record, if any and to zoning restrictions which have been 2292
imposed thereon, if any. 2293
All iron pins set are 5/8-inch diameter rebar with yellow 2294
plastic cap stamped "Cottrill Surveying." This description is 2295
based on an actual field survey performed by Nathan L. Cottrill, 2296
PS registration #8821 on October 25, 2024. 2297
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 2298
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 2299
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 2300
facilitate recordation of the deed. 2301

H. B. No. 379 Page 81
As Introduced
(B)(1) The conveyance includes all improvements and 2302
chattels situated on the real estate, and is subject to all 2303
leases, agreements, licenses, permits, memoranda of 2304
understanding, easements, covenants, conditions, reservations, 2305
and restrictions of record, and encroachments whether of record 2306
or not; all legal highways and public rights-of-way; zoning, 2307
building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and 2308
regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due 2309
and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, 2310
where-is, with all faults" condition. 2311
(2) The deed or deeds for the conveyance of the real 2312
estate may contain restrictions, exceptions, reservations, 2313
reversionary interests, and other terms and conditions the 2314
Director of Administrative Services determines to be in the best 2315
interest of the State. 2316
(3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, 2317
exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms 2318
and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the 2319
State or the Ohio Department of Rehabilitation without the 2320
necessity of further legislation. 2321
(C) Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate 2322
described in division (A) of this section shall be $211,686.00. 2323
The Director of Administrative Services shall offer the 2324
real estate to Madison County Board of Commissioners through a 2325
real estate purchase agreement. Consideration for the conveyance 2326
of the real estate shall be at a price acceptable to the 2327
Director of Administrative Services and the Director of the Ohio 2328
Department of Rehabilitation. If the Madison County Board of 2329
Commissioners does not complete the purchase of the real estate 2330
within the time period provided in the real estate purchase 2331

H. B. No. 379 Page 82
As Introduced
agreement, the Director of Administrative Services may use any 2332
reasonable method of sale considered acceptable by the Ohio 2333
Department of Rehabilitation to determine an alternate grantee 2334
willing to complete the purchase within three years after the 2335
effective date of this section. The Ohio Department of 2336
Rehabilitation shall pay all advertising costs, additional fees, 2337
and other costs incident to the sale of the real estate. 2338
(D) The real estate described in division (A) of this 2339
section shall be sold as an entire tract and not in parcels. 2340
(E) Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the 2341
purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title 2342
evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording 2343
costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and 2344
costs that may be imposed. 2345
The net proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the 2346
state treasury to the credit of the Leased Property Maintenance 2347
and Operating Fund under section 5120.22 of the Revised Code. 2348
(F)(1) Upon execution of the real estate purchase 2349
agreement, the Director of Administrative Services, with the 2350
assistance of the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's 2351
Deed to the real estate described in division (A) of this 2352
section. The Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and 2353
shall be executed by the Governor in the name of the State, 2354
countersigned by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great 2355
Seal of the State, presented in the Department of Administrative 2356
Services for recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The 2357
Grantee shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the 2358
Office of the Madison County Recorder. 2359
(2) The intent of this conveyance is for the Purchaser to 2360

H. B. No. 379 Page 83
As Introduced
use the real estate for the operational use of the Madison 2361
County Sheriff's Department; therefore, the deed shall contain a 2362
restriction stating that if the real estate described in 2363
division (A) of this section is no longer being used for the 2364
operations of the Madison County Sheriff's Department, the real 2365
estate described in division (A) of this section shall revert 2366
back to the State of Ohio at the sole discretion of the Director 2367
of Administrative Services and the Ohio Department of 2368
Rehabilitation and Correction, at the purchase price of the real 2369
estate described in division (A) of this section. 2370
(G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 2371
date. 2372
Section 6. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed 2373
in the name of the State conveying to the Secretary of the 2374
United States Air Force, and its successors and assigns, all of 2375
the State's right, title, and interest in the building, the 2376
National Aviation Hall of Fame, located on the following 2377
described real estate: 2378
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Montgomery, 2379
Township of Mad River, part of Section 18, Town 2, Range 7 MRS 2380
and being part of the Wright-Patterson Air Force Base being more 2381
particularly described as follows: 2382
Commencing at the Northeast corner of Building No. 487, 2383
also known as Hangar No. 2 of the Air Force Museum: 2384
Thence South 45 degrees -06 minutes -30seconds West, along 2385
the face of the North wall of said Building No. 487, a distance 2386
of 278.21 feet to the real place of beginning of the following 2387
described tract; 2388
Thence continuing South 45 degrees -06 minutes -30 seconds 2389

H. B. No. 379 Page 84
As Introduced
West, along the face of wall of said Building No. 487, a 2390
distance of 179.49 feet to a corner of the passageway between 2391
said Building No. 487 and Building No. 489 of the museum also 2392
known as Hangar No. 1 of the Air Force Museum. 2393
Thence along the face of wall of said passageway by the 2394
next three courses; 2395
Thence North 44 degrees -53 minutes-30 seconds West, a 2396
distance of 34.70 feet; 2397
Thence North 45 degrees -06 -30 seconds East, a distance 2398
of 29.90 feet; 2399
Thence North 44 degrees -53minutes-30 seconds West, a 2400
distance of 55.30 feet; 2401
Thence North 45 degrees -06 minutes -30 seconds East, a 2402
distance of 149.59 feet to a point in the face of the South wall 2403
of Building No. 489; 2404
Thence South 44 degrees -53 minutes -30 seconds East, a 2405
distance of 90.00 feet to the place of beginning, containing, 2406
0.3329 Acre (14,500.63 square feet); 2407
Along with the right of ingress and egress over open base 2408
roads. 2409
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 2410
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 2411
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 2412
facilitate recordation of the deed. 2413
(B) The conveyance includes the building, and any 2414
improvements, fixtures, and chattels contained within the 2415
building. The conveyance does not include the land, which is not 2416
owned by the State of Ohio. 2417

H. B. No. 379 Page 85
As Introduced
(C) Consideration for the conveyance of the building 2418
described in division (A) of this section shall be $0. 2419
The Director of Administrative Services shall offer the 2420
building to the Secretary of the United States Air Force as a 2421
gift. If the United States Air Force does not accept the gift, 2422
the Director of Administrative Services may use any reasonable 2423
method considered acceptable by the Ohio Facilities Construction 2424
Commission to determine an alternate grantee willing to accept 2425
the building as a gift within three years after the effective 2426
date of this section. The Ohio Facilities Construction 2427
Commission shall pay all advertising costs, additional fees, and 2428
other costs incident to the transfer of the building. 2429
(D) Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the 2430
transfer, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title 2431
evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording 2432
costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and 2433
costs that may be imposed. 2434
(E) Upon acceptance of the gift, the Director of 2435
Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney 2436
General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the building 2437
described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed 2438
shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the 2439
Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the 2440
Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, 2441
presented in the Department of Administrative Services for 2442
recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall 2443
present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the 2444
Montgomery County Recorder. 2445
(F) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 2446
date. 2447

H. B. No. 379 Page 86
As Introduced
Section 7. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed 2448
in the name of the State conveying to Trumbull County 2449
Metropolitan Park District ("Grantee"), and its successors and 2450
assigns, all of the State's right, title, and interest in the 2451
following described real estate: 2452
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Trumbull being a 2453
part of Lots 9, 14, 31, 36, 53, 57, 58, 72, and 75 (Twp. 5-N, 2454
Range 4-W) of Champion Township, and part of Lots 4, 5, 9, 11, 2455
12, 29, 36 and 45 (Twp. 6-N, Range 4-W) of Bristol Township, and 2456
parts of Lots 87 through 94 inclusive and 101 through 119 2457
inclusive (Twp. 7-N, Range 4-W) of Bloomfield Township, 2458
Connecticut Western Reserve, and being more fully described as 2459
follows: 2460
Commencing at the intersection of the centerlines of 2461
Champion Avenue and the original centerline of the Penn Central 2462
Railroad; 2463
Thence North 24° 23' 08" West a distance of 31.72 feet to 2464
an iron pipe set on the north right of way line of Champion 2465
Avenue and being THE TRUE PLACE OF BEGINNING of the tract herein 2466
to be described: 2467
Thence South 84° 33' 34" West, along the north right of 2468
way line of Champion Avenue, a distance of 169.85 feet to an 2469
iron pipe set on the east line of the lands of Northwood Golf 2470
Club; 2471
Thence North 01° 27' 18" West a distance of 216.29 feet to 2472
an iron pipe set; 2473
Thence North 26° 52' 59" West a distance of 899.50 feet to 2474
an iron pipe set; 2475
Thence South 84° 33' 34" West a distance of 24.71 feet to 2476

H. B. No. 379 Page 87
As Introduced
an iron pipe set; 2477
Thence North 26° 52' 59" West a distance of 1141.27 feet 2478
to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 75; 2479
Thence North 85° 33' 34" East, along the north line of Lot 2480
75, a distance of 24.88 feet to an iron pipe set; 2481
Thence North 26° 55' 56" West a distance of 4036.83 feet 2482
to an iron pipe set; 2483
Thence South 63° 04' 04" West a distance of 13.00 feet to 2484
an iron pipe set; 2485
Thence North 26° 55' 56" West (passing through the 2486
centerline of State Route 305 at 322.00 feet) a total distance 2487
of 355.31 feet to an iron pipe set on the north right of way 2488
line of State Route 305; 2489
Thence South 88° 50' 04" West, along the north right of 2490
way line of State Route 305, a distance of 94.48 feet to an iron 2491
pipe set; 2492
Thence North 26° 55' 56" West a distance of 788.90 feet to 2493
an iron pipe set; 2494
Thence North 88° 50' 04" East a distance of 120.02 feet to 2495
an iron pipe set; 2496
Thence North 26° 55' 56" West a distance of 3650.27 feet 2497
to an iron pipe set; 2498
Thence North 19° 00' 46" West a distance of 346.00 feet to 2499
an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2500
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 11° 06' 2501
20", a radius of 2850.973 feet, a chord which bears North 14° 2502
28' 32" West, a chord distance of 551.732 feet to an iron pipe 2503

H. B. No. 379 Page 88
As Introduced
set at a point of tangency, being on the west line of Lot 36; 2504
Thence along the west lines of Lots 36, 31 and 14, North 2505
08° 55' 22" West a distance of 7263.35 feet to an iron pipe set 2506
at the southwest corner of Lot 9; 2507
Thence North 88° 07' 48" East a distance of 0.50 feet to 2508
an iron pipe set; 2509
Thence North 08° 58' 02" West a distance of 1111.00 feet 2510
to an iron pipe set; 2511
Thence North 88° 07' 48" East a distance of 6.55 feet to 2512
an iron pipe set; 2513
Thence North 08° 58' 02" West a distance of 1502.62 feet 2514
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Town-Line Road; 2515
Thence South 88° 30' 46" West, along the centerline of 2516
Town-Line Road, a distance of 7.06 feet to a railroad spike set; 2517
Thence North 08° 58' 02" West a distance of 5545.66 feet 2518
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2519
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 08° 05' 2520
54", a radius of 5404.557 feet, a chord which bears North 04° 2521
55' 05" West, a chord distance of 763.254 feet to an iron pipe 2522
set at a point of tangency; 2523
Thence North 00° 52' 08" West, a distance of 9099.29 feet 2524
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of State Route 88; 2525
Thence North 00° 55' 33" West, a distance of 6675.01 feet 2526
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Hyde-Oakfield Road; 2527
Thence South 77° 54' 27" West, along the centerline of 2528
said road, a distance of 152.90 feet to a railroad spike set; 2529
Thence North 00° 54' 13" West a distance of 549.78 feet to 2530

H. B. No. 379 Page 89
As Introduced
an iron pipe set; 2531
Thence North 89° 05' 54" East a distance of 117.00 feet to 2532
an iron pipe set; 2533
Thence North 00° 54' 06" West a distance of 2285.04 feet 2534
to an iron pipe set on the south right of way line of Mahan- 2535
Denman Road; 2536
Thence North 73° 34' 29" East, along the south right of 2537
way line of said road, a distance of 34.25 feet to an iron pipe 2538
set; 2539
Thence North 00° 54' 06" West a distance of 1642.48 feet 2540
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2541
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 44' 2542
09", a radius of 11426.192 feet, a chord which bears North 04° 2543
16' 11" West, a chord distance of 1342.503 feet to an iron pipe 2544
set at a point of tangency; 2545
Thence North 07° 38' 15" West a distance of 741.51 feet to 2546
an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2547
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 06° 37' 2548
43", a radius of 11492.192 feet, a chord which bears North 04° 2549
19' 24" West, a chord distance of 1328.817 feet to an iron pipe 2550
set at a point of tangency; 2551
Thence North 01° 00' 32" West, along the west line of Lots 2552
118, 117, 116, 115, i14, 113 and 112 a distance of 11358.57 feet 2553
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Burton-Bloomfield 2554
Road; 2555
Thence North 89° 02' 50" East, along the centerline of 2556
said road and the north line of Lot 112, a distance of 3.00 feet 2557
to a railroad spike set; 2558

H. B. No. 379 Page 90
As Introduced
Thence North 01° 00' 32" East (being 30.0 feet west of and 2559
parallel to the west line of Lots 111 and 110) a distance of 2560
3362.67 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 93; 2561
Thence South 89° 07' 40" West, along the north line of Lot 2562
93, a distance of 3.00 feet to an iron pipe set; 2563
Thence North 01° 00' 32" West (being 33.0 feet west of and 2564
parallel to the west line of Lots 109 and 108) a distance of 2565
2463.00 feet to an iron pipe set; 2566
Thence North 89° 07' 40" East a distance of 3.0 feet to an 2567
iron pipe set; 2568
Thence North 01° 00' 32" West (being 30.0 feet west of and 2569
parallel to the west line of Lot 108) a distance of 820.00 feet 2570
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Haines-East Road; 2571
Thence South 89° 07' 40" West, along the north line of Lot 2572
91 and the centerline of said road a distance of 3.0 feet to a 2573
railroad spike set; 2574
Thence North 01° 00' 32" West (being 33.0 feet west of and 2575
parallel to the west line of Lots 107, 106, 105 and 104) a 2576
distance of 5293.02 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of 2577
curvature; 2578
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 07° 46' 2579
31", a radius of 11492.192 feet, a chord which bears North 02° 2580
52' 44" East, a chord distance of 1558.342 feet to an iron pipe 2581
set at a point of tangency; 2582
Thence North 06° 45' 59" East a distance of 393.14 feet to 2583
an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2584
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 01° 53' 2585
06", a radius of 11426.192 feet, a chord which bears North 05° 2586

H. B. No. 379 Page 91
As Introduced
49' 26" East, a chord distance of 375.921 feet to an iron pipe 2587
set on the county line common to Trumbull County and Ashtabula 2588
County; 2589
Thence North 88° 34' 38" East, along the north line of 2590
Trumbull County (passing iron pipes set at 3.02 feet and 33.20 2591
feet) a total distance of 66.40 feet to an iron pipe set; 2592
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 01° 55' 2593
17", a radius of 11492.192 feet, a chord which bears South 05° 2594
40' 20" West, a chord distance of 385.382 feet to an iron pipe 2595
set at a point of tangency; 2596
Thence South 06° 45' 59" West a distance of 393.14 feet to 2597
an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2598
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 01° 05' 2599
42", a radius of 11426.192 feet, a chord which bears South 06° 2600
13' 08" West, a chord distance of 218.35 feet to an iron pipe 2601
set on the south line of Lot 103; 2602
Thence South 88° 34' 38" West, along the south line of Lot 2603
103 a distance of 3.02 feet to an iron pipe set; 2604
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 40' 2605
43", a radius of 11429.192 feet, a chord which bears South 02° 2606
19' 49" West, a chord distance of 1331.452 feet to an iron pipe 2607
set at a point of tangency; 2608
Thence South 01° 00" 32" East (being 30.0 feet east of and 2609
parallel to the west lines of Lots 104, 105, and 106) a distance 2610
of 3630.382 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 2611
106; 2612
Thence North 89° 07' 40" East, a distance of 3.00 feet to 2613
an iron pipe set; 2614

H. B. No. 379 Page 92
As Introduced
Thence South 01° 00' 32" West (being 33.0 feet east of and 2615
parallel to the west line of Lot 107) a distance of 1662.79 feet 2616
to a railroad spike set in the-centerline of Haines-East Road; 2617
Thence South 89° 07' 40" West, along the centerline of 2618
said road, and the south line of Lot 107, a distance of 3.00 2619
feet to a railroad spike set; 2620
Thence South 01° 00' 32" East (being 30.0 feet east of and 2621
parallel with the west line of Lots 108, 109, 110 and 111, a 2622
distance of 6645.58 feet to a railroad spike set in the 2623
centerline of Burton-Bloomfield Road; 2624
Thence North 89° 02' 51" East, along the centerline of 2625
said road, and the south line of Lot 111, a distance of 3.00 2626
feet to a railroad spike set; 2627
Thence South 01° 00' 32" East a distance of 334.75 feet to 2628
an iron pipe set; 2629
Thence South 88° 40' 35" West a distance of 3.05 feet to 2630
an iron pipe set; 2631
Thence South 01° 19' 25" East a distance of 109.25 feet to 2632
an iron pipe set; 2633
Thence North 88° 40' 35" East, a distance of 2.45 feet to 2634
an iron pipe set; 2635
Thence South 01° 00' 32" East (being 66.0 feet east of and 2636
parallel to the west lines of Lots 112, 113, 114 and 115) a 2637
distance of 5368.00 feet to an iron pipe set; 2638
Thence North 89° 59' 28" East a distance of 33.0 feet to 2639
an iron pipe set; 2640
Thence South 01° 00' 32" East a distance of 825.00 feet to 2641

H. B. No. 379 Page 93
As Introduced
a railroad spike set in the centerline of Dunkerton-East Road; 2642
Thence South 88° 59' 28" West, along the centerline of 2643
Dunkerton-East Road, a distance of 33.00 feet to a railroad 2644
spike set; 2645
Thence South 01° 00' 32" East (being 66.0 feet east of the 2646
west line of Lots 115, 116, 117 and 118) a distance of 4721.51 2647
feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2648
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 37' 2649
43", a radius of 11426.192 feet, a chord which bears South 04° 2650
19' 24" East, a chord distance of 1321.185 feet to an iron pipe 2651
set at a point of tangency; 2652
Thence South 07° 38' 15" East a distance of 741.51 feet to 2653
an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2654
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 06° 44' 2655
09", a radius of 11492.192 feet, a chord which bears South 04° 2656
16' 11" East, a chord distance of 1350.258 feet to an iron pipe 2657
set at a point of tangency; 2658
Thence South 00° 54' 06" East, a distance of 1738.96 to an 2659
iron pipe set; 2660
Thence South 24° 47' 13" East, a distance of 81.50 feet to 2661
an iron pipe set; 2662
Thence South 00° 54' 06" East, a distance of 245.00 feet 2663
to an iron pipe set; 2664
Thence South 18° 16' 03" West, a distance of 100.50 feet 2665
to an iron pipe set; 2666
Thence South 00° 54' 06" East, a distance of 2296.84 feet 2667
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Hyde-Oakfield Road; 2668

H. B. No. 379 Page 94
As Introduced
Thence South 00° 55' 33" East, a distance of 5867.36 feet 2669
to an iron pipe set; 2670
Thence North 65° 48' 23" East, a distance of 5.00 feet to 2671
an iron pipe set; 2672
Thence South 16° 55' 13" East, a distance of 250.05 feet 2673
to an iron pipe set; 2674
Thence South 00° 55' 33" East a distance of 530.00 feet to 2675
a railroad spike set in the centerline of State Route 88; 2676
Thence South 65° 48' 23" West, along the centerline of 2677
State Route 88, a distance of 44.05 feet to a state highway 2678
monument box; 2679
Thence South 00° 52' 08" East, a distance of 9127.76 feet 2680
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2681
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 51° 54' 2682
11", a radius of 5305.557 feet, a chord which bears South 04° 2683
55' 05" East, a chord distance of 749.273 feet to an iron pipe 2684
set at a point of tangency; 2685
Thence South 08° 58' 02" East a distance of 3144.86 feet 2686
to an iron pipe set; 2687
Thence North 89° 56' 02" East a distance of 59.60 feet to 2688
an iron pipe on the east line of lot 12; 2689
Thence South 01° 23' 14" East, along the east line of Lot 2690
12, a distance of 446.425 feet to an iron pipe set; 2691
Thence South 08° 58' 02" East a distance of 4575.05 feet 2692
to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 9; 2693
Thence South 08° 55' 22" East a distance of 6876.45 feet 2694
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2695

H. B. No. 379 Page 95
As Introduced
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 17° 50' 2696
22" East, a radius of 5670.15 feet, a chord which bears South 2697
18° 18' 18" East, a chord distance of 1758.32 feet to an iron 2698
pipe set; 2699
Thence South 89° 20' 05" West, a distance of 22.20 feet to 2700
an iron pipe set; 2701
Thence South 26° 55' 21" East, a distance of 10362.75 feet 2702
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2703
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 02° 27' 2704
09", a radius of 562.65 feet, a chord which bears South 25° 39' 2705
24" East, a chord distance of 246.64 feet, to an iron pipe set 2706
on the north right of way of Champion Avenue; 2707
Thence South 84° 33' 34" West, along the north right of 2708
way line of Champion Avenue, a distance of 34.91 feet to The 2709
True Place of Beginning; 2710
Containing 153.799 acres, of which 53.099 acres are in 2711
Champion Township, 59.466 acres in Bristol Township and 41.234 2712
acres in Bloomfield Township. 2713
Iron pipes set are 111 O.D. x 30" length steel pipes with 2714
a yellow plastic cap stamped STULTS AND ASSOCIATES, INC. 2715
The bearing system herein are referenced to and derived 2716
from the Ohio State Plane Coordinate System, North Zone (pages 2717
Ohio revised code, Sections 157.01 to 157.07 inclusive). All 2718
distances, bearings and coordinates have been converted from 2719
geographic position to plane coordinate position based on the 2720
Lambert conformal conic projection. The coordinates of The True 2721
Place of Beginning are North 596,499.89831 and East 2722
2,461,031.30901. 2723

H. B. No. 379 Page 96
As Introduced
This survey is made subject to all easements, 2724
restrictions, and rights-of-way that are recorded or unrecorded. 2725
A survey plat entitled "Plat of Survey of Land of the Penn 2726
Central Corporation to be acquired by The State of Ohio" 2727
consists of Sheet No. 1 through Sheet No. 14 inclusive, is to be 2728
recorded upon final acquisition with the Recorder's Office of 2729
Trumbull County. 2730
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 2731
modified by the Department of Administrative Services or the 2732
Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the 2733
Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, to a final form if such 2734
corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate 2735
recordation of the deed. 2736
(B)(1) The conveyance includes all privileges, rights, 2737
easements, and appurtenances to the real estate, and any 2738
buildings and other structures and improvements erected thereon, 2739
and is subject to all leases, easements, reservations, 2740
restrictions, licenses, permits, memoranda of understanding, 2741
agreements, conditions, and covenants of record and 2742
encroachments whether of record or not; all legal highways and 2743
public rights-of-way; zoning, building, and other laws, 2744
ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate taxes 2745
and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate shall 2746
be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" condition. 2747
(2) The deed or deeds may contain restrictions, 2748
exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, and other 2749
terms and conditions the Director of Administrative Services 2750
determines to be in the best interest of the State. 2751
(3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, 2752

H. B. No. 379 Page 97
As Introduced
exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms 2753
and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the 2754
State or the Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in 2755
interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, without the 2756
necessity of further legislation. 2757
(C) Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate 2758
described in division (A) of this section shall be $1.00. 2759
The Director of Administrative Services shall offer the 2760
real estate to Trumbull County Metropolitan Park District 2761
through a real estate purchase agreement. Consideration for the 2762
conveyance of the real estate shall be at a price acceptable to 2763
the Director of Administrative Services and the Director of Ohio 2764
Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio 2765
Rail Transportation Authority. If Trumbull County Metropolitan 2766
Park District does not complete the purchase of the real estate 2767
within the time period provided in the real estate purchase 2768
agreement, the Director of Administrative Services may use any 2769
reasonable method of sale considered acceptable by the Ohio Rail 2770
Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail 2771
Transportation Authority, to determine an alternate grantee 2772
willing to complete the purchase within three years after the 2773
effective date of this section. The Ohio Rail Development 2774
Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail 2775
Transportation Authority, shall pay all advertising costs, 2776
additional fees, and other costs incident to the sale of the 2777
real estate. 2778
(D) The real estate described in division (A) of this 2779
section may be conveyed as an entire tract or as multiple 2780
parcels. 2781
(E) Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the 2782

H. B. No. 379 Page 98
As Introduced
purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title 2783
evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording 2784
costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and 2785
costs that may be imposed. 2786
The net proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the 2787
state treasury to the credit of the Rail Development Fund (Fund 2788
4N40) under section 4981.09 of the Revised Code. 2789
(F)(1) Upon payment of the purchase price, the Director of 2790
Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney 2791
General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate 2792
described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed 2793
shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the 2794
Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the 2795
Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, 2796
presented in the Department of Administrative Services for 2797
recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall 2798
present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the 2799
Trumbull County Recorder. 2800
(2) The intent of this conveyance is for the Purchaser to 2801
use the real estate for recreational purposes; therefore, the 2802
deed shall contain a restriction stating that if the real estate 2803
described in division (A) of this section is no longer being 2804
used for recreational purposes, the real estate described in 2805
division (A) of this section shall revert back to the State of 2806
Ohio at the sole discretion of the Director of the Ohio Rail 2807
Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail 2808
Transportation Authority, at the purchase price of the real 2809
estate described in division (A) of this section. 2810
(G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 2811
date. 2812

H. B. No. 379 Page 99
As Introduced
Section 8. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed 2813
in the name of the State conveying to Ashtabula County 2814
Metropolitan Park District ("Grantee"), and its successors and 2815
assigns, all of the State's right, title, and interest in the 2816
following described real estate: 2817
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Ashtabula being a 2818
part of Sections 3, 4, 7, 8, 13, 14, 18, 17, 23 and 24 (Township 2819
8-North, Range 4-West) of Orwell Township, and part of Lots 21, 2820
22, 23, 24, 25, 26,27, 28, 29, 30, 33, 32, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39 2821
and 40 (Township 9-North, Range 4-West) of Rome Township, and 2822
part of Lots 6, 7, 17, 27, 37, 47, 57, 67, 76, 77, 86, 87, 96, 2823
106, 116, 126, 127, 136, 137, 146, 147, 156 and 157 (Township 2824
10-North, Range 4-West) of Morgan Township, and parts of Lots 6, 2825
7, 16, 26, 36, 46, 56, 57, 67, 66, 76, 77, 86, 87, 96 and 97 2826
(Township 11-North, Range 4-West) of Austinburg Township, and 2827
part of Lots 48, 49, 51, 52, 78, 79, 85, 86 and 87 (Township 12- 2828
North, Range 4-West) of Saybrook Township, and part of Lots 16 2829
and 17 (Township 12-North, Range 3-West) of Ashtabula Township, 2830
and part of Lot 16 of The City of Ashtabula, Connecticut Western 2831
Reserve, and being more fully described as follows: 2832
Beginning at an iron pipe set at the southeast corner of 2833
Section 23 (Township 8-North, Range 4-West) in Orwell Township, 2834
being on the county line common to Ashtabula County and Trumbull 2835
County; 2836
Thence South 88° 34' 38" West, along said common county 2837
line (passing an iron pipe set at 35.69 feet, and passing 2838
through an iron pipe set on the centerline of the railroad at 2839
68.89 feet) a total distance of 99.07 feet to an iron pipe set; 2840
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 18' 2841
09", a radius of 11429.192 feet, a chord which bears North 01° 2842

H. B. No. 379 Page 100
As Introduced
43' 43" East, a chord distance of 1256.570 feet to an iron pipe 2843
set at a point of tangency; 2844
Thence North 01° 25' 22" West a distance of 1223.00 feet 2845
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Winter Road; 2846
Thence South 89° 05' 14" West, along the centerline of 2847
Winter Road, a distance of 30.00 feet to an iron pipe set; 2848
Thence North 01° 25' 22" West, along the west right of way 2849
line of Columbia Road, a distance of 1841.47 feet to a railroad 2850
spike set; 2851
Thence North 88° 34' 38" East a distance of 30.00 feet to 2852
an iron pipe set on the east right of way line of Columbia Road; 2853
Thence North 01° 25' 22" West a distance of 8168.45 feet 2854
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of U.S. Route 322; 2855
Thence South 88° 58' 16" West, along the centerline of 2856
U.S. Route 322, a distance of 3.00 feet to a railroad spike set; 2857
Thence North 01°29' 34" West a distance of 1253.73 feet to 2858
an iron pipe set on the west line of Section 14; 2859
Thence North 02° 20' 33" West, along the west line of 2860
Section 14, a distance of 1348.62 feet to an iron pipe set on 2861
the southwest corner of Section 7; 2862
Thence North 00° 53' 34'' West, along the west line of 2863
Section 7, a distance of 2674.20 feet to a railroad spike set in 2864
the centerline of Hague Road; 2865
Thence South 89° 03' 03" West, along the centerline of 2866
said Hague Road, a distance of 8.00 feet to an iron pipe set; 2867
Thence continuing along the west line of Section 7 and the 2868
west line of Section 4, North 01° 29' 34" West, a distance of 2869

H. B. No. 379 Page 101
As Introduced
4726.29 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2870
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 12° 48' 2871
22", a radius of 5762.65 feet, a chord which bears North 04° 54' 2872
38" East, a chord distance of 1285.32 feet to an iron pipe set 2873
at a point of tangency; 2874
Thence North 11° 18' 49" East (passing through the 2875
township line common to Orwell and Rome Townships, at 2035.00 2876
feet, more or less) a total distance of 2391.76 feet to an iron 2877
pipe set at a point of curvature; 2878
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 12° 22' 2879
07", a radius of 5696.65 feet, a chord which bears North 05° 47' 2880
46" East, a chord distance of 1227.38 feet to an iron pipe set 2881
at a point of tangency; 2882
Thence North 01° 03' 18" West (being 33.00 feet west of 2883
and parallel to the east line of Lots 30, 29 and 28) a distance 2884
of 4468.69 feet to an iron pipe found; 2885
Thence South 88 ° 31' 16" West, a distance of 140.00 feet 2886
to an iron pipe set; 2887
Thence North 01° 03' 18" West a distance of 1000.00 feet 2888
to a railroad spike set on the north line of Lot 28, and being 2889
in the centerline of Dodgeville Road; 2890
Thence North 88° 31' 16" East, along the north line of Lot 2891
28 and the centerline of said Dodgeville Road, a distance of 2892
140.00 feet to a railroad spike set; 2893
Thence North 01° 26' 00" West (being 33.00 feet west of 2894
and parallel to the east line of Lots 27 and 26) a distance of 2895
5347.30 feet to a railroad spike set on the north line of Lot 2896
26, and being in the centerline of U.S. Route 6; 2897

H. B. No. 379 Page 102
As Introduced
Thence South 88° 32' 19" West, along the north line of Lot 2898
26 and the centerline of U.S. Route 6, a distance of 47.00 feet 2899
to a railroad spike set; 2900
Thence North 01° 27' 02" West (being 113.00 feet west of 2901
and parallel to the east line of Lot 25) a distance of 1000.00 2902
feet to an iron pipe set; 2903
Thence North 88° 32' 19" East a distance of 47.00 feet to 2904
an iron pipe set; 2905
Thence North 01° 27' 02" West (being 66.00 feet west of 2906
and parallel to the east line of Lots 25 and 24) a distance of 2907
4358.45 feet to a railroad spike set on the north line of Lot 2908
24, being in the centerline of Ketcham Road; 2909
Thence North 01° 26' 14" West a distance of 6113.99 feet 2910
to an iron pipe set; 2911
Thence North 00° 43' 56" West a distance of 2072.80 feet 2912
to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 21 (also being on 2913
the north line of Rome Township and the south line of Morgan 2914
Township); 2915
Thence North 00° 39' 48" West a distance of 4185.75 feet 2916
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Rock Creek Road; 2917
Thence North 00° 40' 45" West a distance of 571.65 feet to 2918
a point on the north waters edge of Rock Creek; 2919
Thence North 26° 01' 45" West (passing an iron pipe set at 2920
40.00 feet) a total distance of 105.00 feet to an iron pipe set; 2921
Thence North 00° 40' 45" West a distance of 150.00 feet to 2922
an iron pipe set; 2923
Thence North 06° 09' 15" East a distance of 151.10 feet to 2924

H. B. No. 379 Page 103
As Introduced
an iron pipe set; 2925
Thence North 23° 33' 15" East a distance of 65.80 feet to 2926
an iron pipe set; 2927
Thence North 00° 40' 45" West a distance of 1540.39 feet 2928
to an iron pipe set; 2929
Thence North 34° 28' 16" West a distance of 178.00 feet to 2930
an iron pipe set; 2931
Thence North 00° 40' 45" West a distance of 910.08 feet to 2932
an iron pipe set; 2933
Thence South 87° 47' 05" East a distance of 99.13 feet to 2934
an iron pipe set; 2935
Thence North 00° 40' 45" West a distance of 823.23 feet to 2936
an iron pipe set; 2937
Thence North 00° 38' 02" West a distance of 4116.14 feet 2938
to an iron pipe set on the centerline of Tische Road; 2939
Thence North 00° 32' 27" West a distance of 1663.87 feet 2940
to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 76; 2941
Thence North 00° 57' 05" West a distance of 1673.80 feet 2942
to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 66; 2943
Thence South 89° 37' 22" East, along the north line of Lot 2944
66, a distance of 12.00 feet to an iron pipe set; 2945
Thence North 00° 26' 27" West, a distance of 3329.39 feet 2946
to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 47; 2947
Thence North 00° 20' 39" West a distance of 6346.68 feet 2948
to an iron pipe set; 2949
Thence South 89° 39' 21" West a distance of 33.00 feet to 2950

H. B. No. 379 Page 104
As Introduced
an iron pipe set; 2951
Thence North 00° 20' 39" West a distance of 311.34 feet to 2952
an iron pipe set; 2953
Thence North 00 ° 13' 46" West a distance of 513.66 feet 2954
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Eagleville-Jefferon 2955
Road; 2956
Thence North 72° 26' 11" East, along the centerline of 2957
said Eagleville-Jefferson Road, a distance of 34.57 feet to a 2958
railroad spike set; 2959
Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 539.74 feet to 2960
an iron pipe set; 2961
Thence North 18° 29' 32" West a distance of 105.30 feet to 2962
an iron pipe set; 2963
Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 400.00 feet to 2964
a point in or near the center of Mill Creek; 2965
Thence South 89° 46' 14" West, along or near the center of 2966
Mill Creek, a distance of 29.00 feet to a point; 2967
Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 1095.17 feet 2968
to an iron pipe set in the centerline of Mill Creek Road; 2969
Thence South 88° 51' 08" East, along the centerline of 2970
said Mill Creek Road, a distance of 13.00 feet to a railroad 2971
spike set; 2972
Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 108.04 feet to 2973
an iron pipe set; 2974
Thence North 89° 46' 14" East a distance of 49.00 feet to 2975
an iron pipe set; 2976
Thence North 00" 13' 46" West a distance of 532.00 feet to 2977

H. B. No. 379 Page 105
As Introduced
an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 97; 2978
Thence South 89° 46' 14" West, along said lot line, a 2979
distance of 47.00 feet to an iron pipe set at the northwest 2980
corner of Lot 97; 2981
Thence North 02° 28' 35" East a distance of 535.93 feet to 2982
an iron pipe set; 2983
Thence South 89° 46' 14" West a distance of 25.30 feet to 2984
an iron pipe set; 2985
Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 1566.62 feet 2986
to an iron pipe set; 2987
Thence South 83° 31' 08" East a distance of 10.07 feet to 2988
an iron pipe set; 2989
Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 3289.98 feet 2990
to an iron pipe set on the north right of way line of Allen 2991
Road; 2992
Thence North 89° 09' 21" East, along the north right of 2993
way line of Allen Road, a distance of 37.00 feet to an iron pipe 2994
set; 2995
Thence North 00 ° 13' 46" West a distance of 3906.81 feet 2996
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 2997
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 07° 37' 2998
57", a radius of 11426.192 feet, a chord which bears North 04° 2999
02' 44" West, a chord distance of 1520.96 feet to an iron pipe 3000
set on the north line of Lot 56, and being in the centerline of 3001
Lampson Road; 3002
Thence South 89° 00' 39" West, along said north line of 3003
Lot 56, and the centerline of said Lampson Road, a distance of 3004

H. B. No. 379 Page 106
As Introduced
17.12 feet to an iron pipe set; 3005
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 32' 3006
14", a radius of 11409.192 feet, a chord which bears North 11° 3007
08' 26" West, a chord distance of 1301.03 feet to an iron pipe 3008
set; 3009
Thence South 78° 42' 44" West a distance of 10.01 feet to 3010
an iron pipe set; 3011
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 45' 3012
26", a radius of 11399.192 feet, a chord which bears North 17° 3013
47' 26" West, a chord distance of 1343.58 feet to an iron pipe 3014
set on the north line of Lot 46; 3015
Thence North 89° 17' 57" West, along the north line of Lot 3016
46, a distance of 10.78 feet to an iron pipe set; 3017
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 02° 20' 3018
37", a radius of 11389.192 feet, a chord which bears North 22° 3019
21' 40" West, a chord distance of 465.802 feet to an iron pipe 3020
set at a point of tangency; 3021
Thence North 23° 31' 58" West a distance of 1064.95 feet 3022
to an iron pipe set; 3023
Thence North 89° 28' 02" East a distance of 40.20 feet to 3024
an iron pipe set; 3025
Thence North 23° 31' 58" West a distance of 1022.77 feet 3026
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 3027
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 20° 53' 3028
07", a radius of 5762.65 feet, a chord which bears North 13° 05' 3029
25" West, a chord distance of 2088.959 feet to an iron pipe set 3030
at a point of compound curve; 3031

H. B. No. 379 Page 107
As Introduced
Thence continuing on a curve with an arc to the right, 3032
having a delta of 26° 39' 42", a radius of 2633.574, a chord 3033
which bears North 10° 40' 59" East, a chord distance of 1214.463 3034
feet to an iron pipe set; 3035
Thence South 88° 05' 43" West a distance of 29.98 feet to 3036
an iron pipe set; 3037
Thence North 23° 45' 38" East a distance of 2657.47 feet 3038
to a railroad spike set on the north line of Lot 16, being in 3039
the centerline of Clay Street; 3040
Thence North 88° 57' 25" East, along the north line of Lot 3041
16, and the centerline of said Clay Street, a distance of 11.02 3042
feet to a railroad spike set; 3043
Thence North 23° 44' 58" East a distance of 2885.84 feet 3044
to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 7, also being on 3045
the township line common to Austinburg Township and Saybrook 3046
Township; 3047
Thence South 89° 15' 30" West, along the common township 3048
line, a distance of 12.02 feet to an iron pipe set; 3049
Thence North 23° 44' 45" East a distance of 5313.94 feet 3050
to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 86; 3051
Thence South 45° 31' 02" West, along the north line of Lot 3052
86, a distance of 57.12 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of 3053
intersection of the centerline of Ashtabula-Austinburg Road; 3054
Thence North 23° 29' 02" East, along the tangent of said 3055
Ashtabula-Austinburg Road, a distance of 148.5 feet to an iron 3056
pipe set on the west line of Lot 79, being in the centerline of 3057
Moody Road; 3058
Thence North 00° 47' 34" West, along the west line of Lot 3059

H. B. No. 379 Page 108
As Introduced
79 and the centerline of Moody Road, a distance of 396.35 feet 3060
to an iron pipe set; 3061
Thence South 66° 15' 14" East a distance of 213.47 feet to 3062
an iron pipe set; 3063
Thence North 23° 44' 45" East a distance of 1260.01 feet 3064
to an iron pipe set; 3065
Thence North 23° 49' 36" East a distance of 2865.35 feet 3066
to an iron pipe set; 3067
Thence North 23° 50' 37" East a distance of 5228.23 feet 3068
to an iron pipe set; 3069
Thence South 89° 04' 38" West a distance of 36.34 feet to 3070
an iron pipe set; 3071
Thence North 23° 50' 37" East a distance of 717.00 feet to 3072
an iron pipe set; 3073
Thence South 63° 04' 37" East a distance of 33.05 feet to 3074
an iron pipe set; 3075
Thence North 23° 50' 37" East a distance of 205.28 feet to 3076
an iron pipe set; 3077
Thence North 23° 46' 38" East (passing through the east 3078
line of Saybrook Township, at 2552.00 feet, more or less) a 3079
total distance of 2871.98 feet to an iron pipe set; 3080
Thence North 23° 48' 59" East a distance of 2951.01 feet 3081
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of State Route 84; 3082
Thence South 58° 57' 41" West, along the centerline of 3083
State Route 84, a distance of 29.53 feet to a railroad spike 3084
set; 3085
Thence North 23° 48' 59" East a distance of 370.67 feet to 3086

H. B. No. 379 Page 109
As Introduced
an iron pipe set; 3087
Thence North 27° 46 1 21" East a distance of 246.41 feet 3088
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 3089
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 12° 59' 3090
02", a radius of 11492.19 feet, a chord which bears North 30° 3091
18' 30" East, a chord distance of 2598.70 feet to an iron pipe 3092
set at a point of tangency; 3093
Thence North 36° 48' 01" East a distance of 1937.23 feet 3094
to an iron pipe set on the north side of South 58th Street (in 3095
The City of Ashtabula); 3096
Thence North 36° 45' 46" East a distance of 2906.79 feet 3097
to an iron pipe set in the lands of the N.Y.C. & St. Louis 3098
Railroad; 3099
Thence North 56° 16' 25" East (passing an iron pipe set on 3100
the original centerline of the Penn Central Railroad, at 98.81 3101
feet) a total distance of 197.61 feet to an iron pipe set; 3102
Thence South 36° 45' 46" West a distance of 3105.31 feet 3103
to an iron pipe set on the south side of South 58th Street; 3104
Thence North 88° 40' 10" East, along the south side of 3105
said South 58th Street, a distance of 34.31 feet to an iron pipe 3106
set; 3107
Thence South 36° 48' 01", along a portion of the east 3108
right of way line of Nathan Avenue, a distance of 1946.20 feet 3109
to an iron pipe set; 3110
Thence South 36° 35' 28" West a distance of 83.24 feet to 3111
an iron pipe found at the southwest corner of Bardmoor 3112
Subdivision as platted in Plat Book 12, page 89, Ashtabula 3113
County Recorders Office; 3114

H. B. No. 379 Page 110
As Introduced
Thence South 45° 00' 00" East, along the south line of 3115
said Bardmoor Subdivision, a distance of 10.11 feet to an iron 3116
pipe set; 3117
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 12° 33' 3118
28", a radius of 11389.192 feet, a chord which bears South 30° 3119
05' 44" West, a chord distance of 2491.282 feet to an iron pipe 3120
set at a point of tangency; 3121
Thence South 23° 48' 59" West a distance of 245.83 feet to 3122
an iron pipe set; 3123
Thence South 66° 11' 0" East a distance of 20.00 feet to 3124
an iron pipe set; 3125
Thence South 23° 48' 59" West a distance of 171.80 feet to 3126
a railroad spike set in the centerline of State Route 84; 3127
Thence South 58° 57' 41" West, along the centerline of 3128
State Route 84, a distance of 64.28 feet to an iron pipe set; 3129
Thence South 23° 48' 59" West (passing through the west 3130
line of Ashtabula Township, at 635.00 feet, more or less) a 3131
total distance of 1710.16 feet to an iron pipe set; 3132
Thence South 00" 41' 01" East a distance of 16.88 feet to 3133
an iron pipe set; 3134
Thence South 23° 48' 59" West a distance of 1347.62 feet 3135
to an iron pipe set; 3136
Thence South 23° 46' 38" West a distance of 1405.99 feet 3137
to an iron pipe set; 3138
Thence South 66° 13' 22" East a distance of 5.00 feet to 3139
an iron pipe set; 3140
Thence South 23° 46' 38" West a distance of 1466.00 feet 3141

H. B. No. 379 Page 111
As Introduced
to an iron pipe set; 3142
Thence South 23° 50' 37" West a distance of 117.36 feet to 3143
an iron pipe set; 3144
Thence South 03° 26' 23" East a distance of 76.35 feet to 3145
an iron pipe set; 3146
Thence South 23° 50' 37" West a distance of 1067.00 feet 3147
to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 48; 3148
Thence South 89° 04' 38" West, along the south line of Lot 3149
48, a distance of 44.05 feet to an iron pipe set; 3150
Thence South 23° 50' 37" West, a distance of 1124.63 feet 3151
to a railroad spike set on the west line of Lot 51, being in the 3152
centerline of Sanborn Road; 3153
Thence South 00° 56' 43" East, along the west line of Lot 3154
51, and the centerline of Sanborn Road, a distance of 23.85 feet 3155
to a railroad spike set; 3156
Thence South 23° 50' 37" West a distance of 1037.50 feet 3157
to an iron pipe set; 3158
Thence South 89° 16' 37" West a distance of 11.00 feet to 3159
an iron pipe set; 3160
Thence South 23° 50' 37" West a distance of 2647.54 feet 3161
to an iron pipe found; 3162
Thence North 89° 36' 28" East a distance of 21.92 feet to 3163
an iron pipe set; 3164
Thence South 23° 49' 36" West a distance of 639.20 feet to 3165
an iron pipe set on the west line of Lot 52; 3166
Thence South 00° 20' 24" East, along the west line of Lot 3167
52, a distance of 208.98 feet to an iron pipe set; 3168

H. B. No. 379 Page 112
As Introduced
Thence South 85° 17' 47" West a distance of 120.15 feet to 3169
an iron pipe set; 3170
Thence South 23° 49' 36" West a distance of 2014.02 feet 3171
to an iron pipe set; 3172
Thence South 23° 44' 45" West a distance of 192.08 feet to 3173
an iron pipe set; 3174
Thence South 02° 20' 57" West a distance of 54.82 feet to 3175
an iron pipe set; 3176
Thence South 23° 44' 45" West a distance of 1104.51 feet 3177
to an iron pipe set; 3178
Thence North 45° 03' 31" East a distance of 55.75 feet to 3179
an iron pipe set; 3180
Thence South 23° 50' 31" West a distance of 443.95 feet to 3181
an iron pipe set; 3182
Thence South 23° 45' 36" West a distance of 234.48 feet to 3183
an iron pipe set; 3184
Thence North 00° 40' 53" West a distance of 95.42 feet to 3185
an iron pipe set; 3186
Thence South 23° 44' 45" West a distance of 2371.61 feet 3187
to an iron pipe set; 3188
Thence South 89 ° 15' 31" West a distance of 10.85 feet to 3189
a P.K. nail set in a twelve inch Cherry Tree; 3190
Thence South 23° 43' 44" West (passing through the south 3191
line of Saybrook Township, at 2713.00 feet, more or less) a 3192
total distance of 2738.76 feet to an iron pipe set; 3193
Thence South 23° 44' 58" West a distance of 2862.44 feet 3194
to a railroad spike set on the south line of Lot 6 (Austinburg 3195

H. B. No. 379 Page 113
As Introduced
Township); also being in the centerline of Clay Street; 3196
Thence North 88° 57' 25" East, along the centerline of 3197
Clay Street, a distance of 22.04 feet to a railroad spike set; 3198
Thence South 23° 45' 38" West a distance of 229.01 feet to 3199
an iron rod found; 3200
Thence South 02° 40' 44" East a distance of 112.50 feet to 3201
an iron rod found; 3202
Thence North 71° 28' 44" East a distance of 407.46 feet to 3203
an iron rod found; 3204
Thence South 01° 00' 30" East a distance of 519.94 feet to 3205
an iron rod found; 3206
Thence South 53° 20' 02" West a distance of 1049.64 feet 3207
to an iron pipe set in Coffee Creek; 3208
Thence South 89 ° 15' 51" West a distance of 56.42 feet to 3209
an iron pipe set; 3210
Thence South 23° 45' 38" West a distance of 1252.18 feet 3211
to an iron pipe set 70.0 feet east of the P.T. of the point of 3212
curvature of the original centerline; 3213
Thence South 22° 24' 19" West a distance of 119.71 feet to 3214
an iron pipe set; 3215
Thence South 87° 42' 23" East a distance of 21.13 feet to 3216
an iron pipe set; 3217
Thence South 16° 53' 53" West a distance of 772.00 feet to 3218
an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 3219
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 25' 3220
36", a radius of 2570.57 feet, a chord which bears South 00° 33' 3221
56" West, a chord distance of 288.193 feet to an iron pipe set 3222

H. B. No. 379 Page 114
As Introduced
at a point of compound curve; 3223
Thence South 02° 58' 36" East a distance of 65.43 feet to 3224
an iron pipe set; 3225
Thence North 89° 13' 21" East a distance of 3.00 feet to 3226
an iron pipe set; 3227
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 20° 13' 3228
34", a radius of 5696.65 feet, a chord which bears South 13° 25' 3229
11" East, a chord distance of 2000.558 feet to an iron pipe set 3230
at a point of tangency; 3231
Thence South 23° 31' 58" East a distance of 1050.79 feet 3232
to an iron pipe set; 3233
Thence North 89° 28' 02" East a distance of 40.20 feet to 3234
an iron pipe set; 3235
Thence South 23° 31' 58" East a distance of 1005.52 feet 3236
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 3237
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 09° 09' 3238
22", a radius of 11529.19 feet, a chord which bears South 18° 3239
57' 17" East, a chord distance of 1840.45 feet to an iron pipe 3240
set; 3241
Thence South 78° 42' 44" West a distance of 20.03 feet to 3242
an iron pipe set; 3243
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 06° 34' 3244
12", a radius of 11509.19 feet, a chord which bears South 11° 3245
05' 49", a chord distance of 1319.01 feet to an iron pipe set on 3246
the south line of Lot 47, being in the centerline of Lampson 3247
Road; 3248
Thence South 89° 00' 39" West, along the south line of Lot 3249

H. B. No. 379 Page 115
As Introduced
47, and the centerline of Lampson Road, a distance of 17.12 feet 3250
to an iron pipe set; 3251
Thence South 07° 44' 48" East a distance of 30.21 feet to 3252
an iron pipe set on the south right of way line of Lampson Road; 3253
Thence North 89° 00' 39" East, along the south right of 3254
way line of Lampson Road, a distance of 379.50 feet to an iron 3255
pipe set; 3256
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 07° 13' 3257
44", a radius of 11869.19 feet, a chord which bears South 03° 3258
50' 38" East, a chord distance of 1496.52 feet to an iron pipe 3259
set at a point of tangency; 3260
Thence South 00° 13' 46" East a distance of 3905.32 feet 3261
to an iron pipe set on the north right of way line of Allen 3262
Road; 3263
Thence South 89° 36' 41" West, along the north right of 3264
way line of Allen Road, a distance of 357.00 feet to an iron 3265
pipe set; 3266
Thence South 00° 13' 46" East a distance of 25.00 feet to 3267
an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 67, being in the 3268
centerline of Allen Road; 3269
Thence North 89° 36' 41" East, along the south line of Lot 3270
67, and the centerline of Allen Road, a distance of 40.00 feet 3271
to an iron pipe set; 3272
Thence South 00° 13' 46" East (being 60.00 feet east of 3273
and parallel to the west line of Lot 77) a distance of 593.06 3274
feet to an iron pipe set; 3275
Thence South 88° 28' 36" West a distance of 13.00 feet to 3276
a corner post; 3277

H. B. No. 379 Page 116
As Introduced
Thence South 00° 13' 46" East (being 47.00 feet east of 3278
and parallel to the west line of Lots 77 and 87) a distance of 3279
2690.29 feet to an iron pipe set; 3280
Thence South 83° 31' 08" East a distance of 10.07 feet to 3281
an iron pipe set; 3282
Thence South 00° 13' 46" East a distance of 3816.85 feet 3283
to an iron pipe set on the south side of Mill Creek; 3284
Thence South 89° 46' 14" West a distance of 24.00 feet to 3285
an iron pipe set; 3286
Thence South 00° 13' 46" East a distance of 400.00 feet to 3287
an iron pipe set in Mill Creek; 3288
Thence South 18° 02' 01" West a distance of 105.30 feet to 3289
an iron pipe set; 3290
Thence South 00° 13' 46" East (being 66.00 feet east of 3291
and parallel to the west line of Lot 97) a distance of 519.14 3292
feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Eagleview- 3293
Jefferson Road; 3294
Thence North 72° 26' 12" East, along the centerline of 3295
said Eagleview-Jefferson Road, a distance of 34.57 feet to a 3296
railroad spike set; 3297
Thence South 00° 13' 46" East a distance of 330.00 feet to 3298
an iron pipe set; 3299
Thence South 89° 46' 14" West a distance of 33.00 feet to 3300
an iron pipe set; 3301
Thence South 00" 13' 46" East a distance of 224.37 feet to 3302
an iron pipe set; 3303
Thence South 00° 20' 40" East a distance of 6659.22 feet 3304

H. B. No. 379 Page 117
As Introduced
to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 37; 3305
Thence South 00" 26' 27" East a distance of 3328.87 feet 3306
to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 57; 3307
Thence South 00° 32' 27" East a distance of 3336.68 feet 3308
to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 77, being in the 3309
centerline of Tische Road; 3310
Thence South 00° 38' 02" East a distance of 4116.13 feet 3311
to an iron pipe set on the south side of Jefferson Street; 3312
Thence South 00° 40' 45" East a distance of 3446.62 feet 3313
to an iron pipe set; 3314
Thence South 15° 56' 45" East a distance of 228.00 feet to 3315
an iron pipe set; 3316
Thence South 00° 40' 45" East a distance of 80.00 feet to 3317
an iron pipe set; 3318
Thence South 22° 31' 29" West (passing an iron pipe set at 3319
122.37 feet) a total distance of 152.37 feet to a point in Rock 3320
Creek; 3321
Thence South 00° 40' 45" East a distance of 381.73 feet to 3322
an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 127; 3323
Thence North 89° 00' 50" East a distance of 4.00 feet to 3324
an iron pipe set; 3325
Thence South 01° 14' 28" East a distance of 996.25 feet to 3326
an iron pipe set; 3327
Thence South 89° 20' 12" West a distance of 14.00 feet to 3328
an iron pipe set; 3329
Thence South 00° 39' 48" East a distance of 690.00 feet to 3330
an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 136; 3331

H. B. No. 379 Page 118
As Introduced
Thence North 89° 20' 12" East, along the south line of Lot 3332
136, a distance of 10.00 feet to an iron pipe set at the 3333
southeast corner of Lot 136; 3334
Thence South 00° 50' 41" West a distance of 380.00 feet to 3335
an iron pipe set; 3336
Thence South 00° 39' 48" East a distance of 1470.00 feet 3337
to an iron pipe set; 3338
Thence North 89° 49' 05" East a distance of 27.00 feet to 3339
an iron pipe set; 3340
Thence South 00° 39' 49" East a distance of 824.34 feet to 3341
an iron pipe set on the south line of Morgan Township (north 3342
line of Rome Township); 3343
Thence South 00° 43' 56" East a distance of 2072.17 feet 3344
to an iron pipe set; 3345
Thence South 01° 26' 14" East a distance of 6093.80 feet 3346
to an iron pipe set on the north right of way line of Ketcham 3347
Road; 3348
Thence South 88° 55' 46" West, along the north right of 3349
way line of Ketcham Road, a distance of 20.01 feet to an iron 3350
pipe set; 3351
Thence South 01° 27' 02" East, along the east line of Lots 3352
24 and 25, a distance of 2988.00 feet to an iron pipe set; 3353
Thence South 88° 32' 58" West a distance of 7.00 feet to 3354
an iron pipe set; 3355
Thence South 01° 27' 02" East a distance of 1390.17 feet 3356
to an iron pipe set; 3357
Thence North 88° 32' 19" East a distance of 150.00 feet to 3358

H. B. No. 379 Page 119
As Introduced
an iron pipe set; 3359
Thence South 01° 27' 02" East a distance of 1000.00 feet 3360
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of U.S. Route 6; 3361
Thence South 88° 32' 19" West, along the centerline of 3362
U.S. Route 6, a distance of 150.00 feet to a railroad spike set; 3363
Thence South 01° 26' 00" East a distance of 289.08 feet to 3364
an iron pipe set; 3365
Thence North 87° 36' 35" East a distance of 33.00 feet to 3366
an iron pipe set; 3367
Thence South 01° 26' 00" East (being 66.00 feet east of 3368
and parallel to the west line of Lot 36) a distance of 2426.30 3369
feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 36; 3370
Thence North 89° 35' 33" West, along the south line of Lot 3371
36, a distance of 8.00 feet to an iron pipe set; 3372
Thence South 01° 26' 00" East (being 58.00 feet east of 3373
and parallel to the west line of Lot 37) a distance of 2632.69 3374
feet to a railroad spike set on the south line of Lot 37, being 3375
in the centerline of Dodgeville Road; 3376
Thence North 88° 31' 16" East, along the centerline of 3377
Dodgeville Road, a distance of 2.00 feet to a railroad spike 3378
set; 3379
Thence South 01° 03' 18" East (being 60.00 feet east of 3380
and parallel to the west line of Lot 38) a distance of 1620.32 3381
feet to an iron pipe set; 3382
Thence North 89° 19' 02" East a distance of 13.00 feet to 3383
an iron pipe set; 3384
Thence South 01° 03' 18" East (being 73.00 feet east of 3385

H. B. No. 379 Page 120
As Introduced
and parallel to the west line of Lots 38 and 39) a distance of 3386
3686.19 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 39, 3387
being in the centerline of Fillingham Road; 3388
Thence South 88° 48' 02" West, along the centerline of 3389
Fillingham Road, a distance of 40.00 feet to an iron pipe set; 3390
Thence South 01° 03' 18" East, a distance of 162.68 feet 3391
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 3392
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 12° 22' 3393
07", a radius of 5762.65 feet, a chord which bears South 05° 07' 3394
45" West, a chord distance of 1241.586 feet to an iron pipe set 3395
at a point of tangency; 3396
Thence South 11° 18' 49" West (passing through the south 3397
line of Rome Township, at 320.00 feet, more or less) a total 3398
distance of 2391.76 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of 3399
curvature; 3400
Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 12° 31' 3401
23", a radius of 5696.65 feet, a chord which bears South 05° 03' 3402
07" West, a chord distance of 1242.64 feet to an iron pipe set 3403
at a point of tangency; 3404
Thence North 88° 31' 00" East a distance of 12.00 feet to 3405
an iron pipe set; 3406
Thence South 00° 09' 14" West a distance of 420.00 feet to 3407
an iron pipe set; 3408
Thence South 01° 29' 34" East a distance of 9611.46 feet 3409
to a railroad spike set in the centerline of U.S. Route 322; 3410
Thence South 88° 58' 16" West, along the centerline of 3411
U.S. Route 322, a distance of 3.00 feet to a railroad spike set; 3412

H. B. No. 379 Page 121
As Introduced
Thence South 01° 25' 22" East a distance of 11232.78 feet 3413
to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; 3414
Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 04° 08' 3415
29", a radius of 11489.19 feet, a chord which bears South 00° 3416
38' 52" West, a chord distance of 830.27 feet to an iron pipe 3417
set on the west line of Section 24; 3418
Thence South 01° 25' 22" East, along the west line of 3419
Section 24 (east line of Section 23) a distance of 424.92 feet 3420
to The Place of Beginning; 3421
Containing 342.940 acres, more or less, of which 39.586 3422
acres are in Orwell Township, including 5.896 acres in the 3423
Village of Orwell; 43.848 acres in Morgan Township, including 3424
7.012 acres in the Village of Rock Creek; 128.847 acres are in 3425
Austinburg Township; 60.322 acres are in Rome Township; 53.044 3426
acres are in Saybrook Township; 17.293 acres are in Ashtabula 3427
Township, including 9.285 acres in The City of Ashtabula; 3428
Iron pipes set are 1" O.D. x 30" length steel pipes with 3429
yellow plastic caps stamped STULTS AND ASSOC.; 3430
The bearing system herein are referenced to and derived 3431
from the Ohio State Plane Coordinate System, North Zone (pages 3432
Ohio revised code, Sections 157.01 to 157.07 inclusive.) All 3433
distances, bearings and coordinates have been converted from 3434
geographic position to plane coordinate position based on the 3435
Lambert conformal conic projection. The coordinates of The Place 3436
of Beginning are North 672,489.10770 and East 2,452,473.55552. 3437
This survey is made subject to all easements, restrictions 3438
and rights-of-way that are recorded or unrecorded. 3439
A survey plat entitled "Plat of Survey of Land of The Penn 3440
Central, Corporation to be acquired by The State of Ohio" 3441

H. B. No. 379 Page 122
As Introduced
consists of Sheet No. 14 through Sheet No. 37 inclusive, is to 3442
be recorded, upon final acquisition, with the Recorder's Office 3443
of Ashtabula County. 3444
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 3445
modified by the Department of Administrative Services or the 3446
Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the 3447
Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, to a final form if such 3448
corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate 3449
recordation of the deed. 3450
(B)(1) The conveyance includes all privileges, rights, 3451
easements, and appurtenances to the real estate, and any 3452
buildings and other structures and improvements erected thereon, 3453
and is subject to all leases, easements, reservations, 3454
restrictions, licenses, permits, memoranda of understanding, 3455
agreements, conditions, and covenants of record and 3456
encroachments whether of record or not; all legal highways and 3457
public rights-of-way; zoning, building, and other laws, 3458
ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate taxes 3459
and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate shall 3460
be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" condition. 3461
(2) The deed or deeds may contain restrictions, 3462
exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, and other 3463
terms and conditions the Ohio Rail Development Commission, 3464
successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, 3465
determines to be in the best interest of the State. 3466
(3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, 3467
exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms 3468
and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the 3469
State or the Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in 3470
interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, without the 3471

H. B. No. 379 Page 123
As Introduced
necessity of further legislation. 3472
(C) Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate 3473
described in division (A) of this section shall be $1.00. 3474
The Director of Administrative Services shall offer the 3475
real estate to Ashtabula County Metropolitan Park District 3476
through a real estate purchase agreement. Consideration for the 3477
conveyance of the real estate shall be at a price acceptable to 3478
the Director of Administrative Services and the Director of Ohio 3479
Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio 3480
Rail Transportation Authority. If Ashtabula County Metropolitan 3481
Park District does not complete the purchase of the real estate 3482
within the time period provided in the real estate purchase 3483
agreement, the Director of Administrative Services may use any 3484
reasonable method of sale considered acceptable by the Ohio Rail 3485
Development Commission to determine an alternate grantee willing 3486
to complete the purchase within three years after the effective 3487
date of this section. The Ohio Rail Development Commission, 3488
successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, 3489
shall pay all advertising costs, additional fees, and other 3490
costs incident to the sale of the real estate. 3491
(D) The real estate described in division (A) of this 3492
section may be conveyed as an entire tract or as multiple 3493
parcels. 3494
(E) Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the 3495
purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title 3496
evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording 3497
costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and 3498
costs that may be imposed. 3499
The net proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the 3500

H. B. No. 379 Page 124
As Introduced
state treasury to the credit of the Rail Development Fund (Fund 3501
4N40) under section 4981.09 of the Revised Code. 3502
(F)(1) Upon payment of the purchase price, the Director of 3503
Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney 3504
General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate 3505
described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed 3506
shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the 3507
Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the 3508
Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, 3509
presented in the Department of Administrative Services for 3510
recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall 3511
present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the 3512
Ashtabula County Recorder. 3513
(2) The intent of this conveyance is for the Purchaser to 3514
use the real estate for recreational purposes; therefore, the 3515
deed shall contain a restriction stating that if the real estate 3516
described in division (A) of this section is no longer being 3517
used for recreational purposes, the real estate described in 3518
division (A) of this section shall revert back to the State of 3519
Ohio at the sole discretion of the Director of the Ohio Rail 3520
Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail 3521
Transportation Authority, at the purchase price of the real 3522
estate described in division (A) of this section. 3523
(G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 3524
date. 3525
Section 9. (A) Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 3526
123.01 of the Revised Code, the Director of Administrative 3527
Services may execute a perpetual easement in the name of the 3528
State with the City of Columbus, Ohio, an Ohio municipal 3529
corporation, and its successors and assigns, for the 3530

H. B. No. 379 Page 125
As Introduced
installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, 3531
reconstruction, servicing and/or replacement of a twelve inch 3532
(12") sanitary sewer pipeline, burdening the following described 3533
real estate: 3534
Situated in the Southwest Quarter of Town 1 North, Range 3535
18 West, City of Columbus, Franklin County, Ohio and being part 3536
of Lots 1 (PID 010-032095) in the name of the State of Ohio 3537
(Ohio State University) as recorded in Vol 2663, Page 143 and 3538
Lot 2 (PID 010-004693), Lot 3 (PID 010-004692), Lot 4 (PID 010- 3539
004690), in the name of the State of Ohio (Ohio State 3540
University) as recorded in Vol 2660 Page 651 and Lots 5&6 (PID 3541
010-004731), in the name of the State of Ohio (Ohio State 3542
University) as recorded in Vol 2668, Page 112, and part Lot 7 3543
(PID 010-045989) in the name of the State of Ohio (Ohio State 3544
University) as recorded in Vol 2670, Page 498, and a portion of 3545
former 10th Ave. vacated per Ordinance 779-66 (010-026543) as 3546
shown on the Record Plat of the Kings Neil Ave. Subdivision Plat 3547
as recorded in Plat Book 7, Page 96 of the Exempted Lands of The 3548
Ohio State University and being more particularly described as 3549
follows: 3550
Beginning at a set mag nail the southeasterly corner of 3551
said Lot 1 of Kings Neil Ave. Subdivision Plat and the westerly 3552
right-of-way line of Neil Ave. and the northerly right-of-way 3553
line of W. 9th Ave., 3554
Thence along said northerly right-of-way line of West 9th 3555
Ave., North 87°01'43" West, a distance of 15.96 feet to the True 3556
Point of Beginning. 3557
Thence continuing along said northerly right-of-way line 3558
of West 9th Ave., North 87°01'43" West, a distance of 31.50 feet 3559
to a point, 3560

H. B. No. 379 Page 126
As Introduced
Thence along a line through the aforementioned Lots 1-7 3561
the following six courses: 3562
(1) North 53°33'28" East, a distance of 47.41 feet, to a 3563
point, 3564
(2) North 08°14'18" West, a distance of 94.83 feet, to a 3565
point, 3566
(3) South 81°45'42" West, a distance of 12.00 feet, to a 3567
point, 3568
(4) North 08°14'18" West, a distance of 25.00 feet, to a 3569
point, 3570
(5) North 81°45'42" East, a distance of 12.00 feet, to a 3571
point, 3572
(6) North 08°14'18" West, a distance of 247.38 feet, to a 3573
point on the southerly line of a 1' reservation strip as shown 3574
on said Record Plat and the former northerly right-of-way line 3575
of W. 10th Ave. 3576
Thence along said southerly line of the reservation strip 3577
and the former northerly right-of-way line of W. 10th Ave. South 3578
87°01'43" East a distance of 12.74 feet to a mag nail on the 3579
aforementioned westerly right-of-way line of Neil Ave. 3580
Thence along said westerly right-of-way line of Neil Ave. 3581
South 08°14'18" East, a distance of 386.40 feet to a point and 3582
Thence along a line through the aforementioned Lot of 3583
Kings Plat, South 53°33'28" West, a distance of 17.77 feet to 3584
the True Point of Beginning. 3585
Containing 0.1337 total acres (5824 sq. ft.) and being 3586
subject to all other easements, encumbrances, rights, 3587

H. B. No. 379 Page 127
As Introduced
reservations and restrictions that may affect the subject 3588
parcels. 3589
North and bearing system based upon the Ohio State Plane 3590
Coordinate System South Zone NAD83(11) (Converted from 12a 3591
utilizing CORPSCON) and referenced to the O.D.O.T. CORS Network 3592
and collected utilizing a Spectra SP80 Network Rover and by a 3593
field survey conducted by or under the direct supervision of J. 3594
Bryant Abt, PS #8593. 3595
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 3596
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 3597
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 3598
facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. 3599
(B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, 3600
and the duties to be observed and performed by the City of 3601
Columbus, Ohio, with regard to the perpetual easement, and 3602
require the City of Columbus, Ohio to assume perpetual 3603
responsibility for the installation, construction, operation, 3604
maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or 3605
replacement of the twelve inch (12") sanitary sewer pipeline 3606
that is currently located on the real estate. 3607
(C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual 3608
easement shall be $1.00. 3609
(D) The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare 3610
the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall state the 3611
consideration and the terms and conditions for the granting of 3612
the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed 3613
by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the 3614
State, be kept in the records of the Department of 3615
Administrative Services, and delivered to the City of Columbus, 3616

H. B. No. 379 Page 128
As Introduced
Ohio. The City of Columbus, Ohio, shall present the perpetual 3617
easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County 3618
Recorder. The City of Columbus, Ohio, shall pay the costs 3619
associated with recording the perpetual easement. 3620
(E) This section shall expire three years after its 3621
effective date. 3622
Section 10. (A) Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 3623
123.01 of the Revised Code, the Director of Administrative 3624
Services may execute a perpetual easement in the name of the 3625
state with the City of Columbus, Ohio, an Ohio municipal 3626
corporation, and its successors and assigns, for the operation, 3627
maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing, and replacement 3628
of the Olentangy Scioto Interceptor Sewer and appurtenances 3629
thereto, burdening the following described real estate: 3630
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of 3631
Columbus, lying in Quarter Township 3, Township 1, Range 18, 3632
United States Military District, being a 35 foot wide strip of 3633
land on, over, and across that tract conveyed to The State of 3634
Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 620, Page 413 and that tract 3635
conveyed to The State of Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 3636
627, Page 253 (all references are to the records of the 3637
Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio) and being more 3638
particularly described as follows: 3639
Beginning, for reference, at the Southeast corner of the 3640
"Reserve" as shown on the Plat titled "ELIZABETH J. McMILLEN - 3641
HOMESTEAD" of record in Plat Book 4, Page 400, at the 3642
intersection of a Northerly Right-Of-Way line of an 18 foot wide 3643
Alley with a Westerly Right-Of-Way line of an 18 foot wide 3644
Alley; both Alleys of Record in said Plat Book 4, Page 400; 3645

H. B. No. 379 Page 129
As Introduced
Thence North 73° 59' 54" West, across said State of Ohio 3646
tract and crossing said "Reserve", a distance of 94.90 feet to a 3647
point, being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING; 3648
Thence continuing across said State of Ohio tract, the 3649
following courses and distances: 3650
North 82° 28' 17" West, a distance of 35.02 feet to a 3651
point; 3652
North 09° 17' 31" East, a distance of 80.78 feet to a 3653
point; 3654
North 09° 25' 36" East, a distance of 38.59 feet to a 3655
point; 3656
North 10° 02' 12" East, a distance of 42.12 feet to a 3657
point; 3658
North 15° 51' 47" East, a distance of 43.93 feet to a 3659
point; 3660
North 15° 08' 24" East, a distance of 37.63 feet to a 3661
point; 3662
North 15° 59' 29" East, a distance of 78.61 feet to a 3663
point; 3664
North 13° 32' 33" East, a distance of 41.80 feet to a 3665
point; 3666
North 24° 20' 52" East, a distance of 28.50 feet to a 3667
point; 3668
North 74° 10' 08" East, a distance of 45.81 feet to a 3669
point; 3670
South 24° 20' 52" West, a distance of 54.74 feet to a 3671
point; 3672

H. B. No. 379 Page 130
As Introduced
South 13° 32' 33" West, a distance of 39.24 feet to a 3673
point; 3674
South 15° 59' 29" West, a distance of 79.10 feet to a 3675
point; 3676
South 15° 08' 24" West, a distance of 37.59 feet to a 3677
point; 3678
South 15° 51' 47" West, a distance of 42.37 feet to a 3679
point; 3680
South 10° 02' 12" West, a distance of 40.15 feet to a 3681
point; 3682
South 09° 25' 36" West, a distance of 38.36 feet to a 3683
point; 3684
South 09° 17' 31" West, a distance of 79.66 feet to the 3685
TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 0.323 acres, more or less, 3686
which is located in Auditor's Parcel Number 010-067017. 3687
The bearings listed herein are based on the Ohio State 3688
Plane Coordinate System, South Zone as per NAD 83 (2011). 3689
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 3690
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 3691
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 3692
facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. 3693
(B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, 3694
and the duties to be observed and performed by the City of 3695
Columbus, Ohio, with regard to the perpetual easement, and 3696
require the City of Columbus, Ohio to assume perpetual 3697
responsibility for the operation, maintenance, repair, 3698
reconstruction, servicing, and replacement of the Olentangy 3699
Scioto Interceptor Sewer and appurtenances thereto, that is 3700

H. B. No. 379 Page 131
As Introduced
currently located on the real estate. 3701
(C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual 3702
easement shall be $1.00. 3703
(D) The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare 3704
the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall state the 3705
consideration and the terms and conditions for the granting of 3706
the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed 3707
by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the 3708
state, be kept in the records of the Department of 3709
Administrative Services, and delivered to the City of Columbus, 3710
Ohio. The City of Columbus, Ohio shall present the perpetual 3711
easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County 3712
Recorder. The City of Columbus, Ohio shall pay the costs 3713
associated with recording the perpetual easement. 3714
(E) This section shall expire three years after its 3715
effective date. 3716
Section 11. (A) Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 3717
123.01 of the Revised Code, the Director of Administrative 3718
Services may execute a perpetual easement in the name of the 3719
state with the City of Columbus, Ohio, an Ohio municipal 3720
corporation, and its successors and assigns, for the 3721
installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, 3722
reconstruction, servicing, and replacement of storm sewer 3723
infrastructure, burdening the following described real estate: 3724
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, 3725
Township of Clinton, lying in Quarter Township 3, Township 1, 3726
Range 18, United States Military District, being on, over, and 3727
across Lots 5 and 6 of that plat titled "J.O. Lisle Subdivision" 3728
of record in Plat Book 5, Page 431 and that 0.716 acre tract 3729

H. B. No. 379 Page 132
As Introduced
conveyed to The State of Ohio, for the use and benefit of The 3730
Ohio State University by deed of record in Instrument Number 3731
200009290198264, and that tract conveyed to The State of Ohio by 3732
deed of record in Deed Book 602, Page 463 (all references are to 3733
the records of the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio) and 3734
being more particularly described as follows: 3735
Beginning, for reference, at the centerline intersection 3736
of Kinnear Road and Kenny Road; 3737
Thence North 03° 41' 02" East, with the centerline of said 3738
Kenny Road, a distance of 977.49 feet to a point; 3739
Thence South 86° 18' 58" East, crossing said Kenny Road 3740
and that "Easement for Highway Purposes" as conveyed to the 3741
County of Franklin of record in Deed Book 3052, Page 549, to a 3742
point in the easterly right-of-way line of said Kenny Road, 3743
being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING; 3744
Thence with said easterly right-of-way line, the following 3745
courses and distances: 3746
North 03° 41' 02" East, a distance of 15.89 feet to an 3747
angle point in said easterly right-of-way line, in the southerly 3748
line of that "Right-of-Way Easement" conveyed as Parcel No. 8 to 3749
the County of Franklin, Ohio of record in Instrument Number 3750
201012020163433; 3751
South 86° 42' 58" East, with said southerly line, a 3752
distance of 10.00 feet to an angle point in said easterly right- 3753
of-way line; and 3754
North 03° 41' 02" East, with the easterly line of said 3755
Parcel No. 8, distance of 30.04 feet to a point; 3756
Thence crossing said State of Ohio tracts, the following 3757

H. B. No. 379 Page 133
As Introduced
courses and distances: 3758
South 86° 18' 47" East, a distance of 18.97 feet to a 3759
point; 3760
South 03° 26' 41" West, a distance of 32.05 feet to a 3761
point; 3762
South 48° 26' 01" West, a distance of 19.65 feet to a 3763
point; and 3764
North 86° 18' 47" West, a distance of 15.27 feet to the 3765
TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 0.022 acre, more or less, of 3766
which 0.009 acre is from Auditor's Parcel Number 130-011864-00, 3767
and 0.013 acre is from Auditor's Parcel Number 130-011841-00. 3768
The bearings listed herein are based on the Ohio State 3769
Plane Coordinate System South Zone per NAD83 (NSRS2007). Control 3770
for bearings was from coordinates of monuments RINGLE and COC 4- 3771
83 having a bearing of South 34° 13' 31" West, established by 3772
the Franklin County Engineering Department, using Global 3773
Positioning procedures and equipment. 3774
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 3775
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 3776
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 3777
facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. 3778
(B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, 3779
and the duties to be observed and performed by the City of 3780
Columbus, Ohio, with regard to the perpetual easement, and 3781
require the City of Columbus, Ohio to assume perpetual 3782
responsibility for the installation, construction, operation, 3783
maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing, and replacement 3784
of the storm sewer infrastructure that is currently located on 3785
the real estate. 3786

H. B. No. 379 Page 134
As Introduced
(C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual 3787
easement shall be $1.00. 3788
(D) The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare 3789
the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall state the 3790
consideration and the terms and conditions for the granting of 3791
the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed 3792
by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the 3793
state, be kept in the records of the Department of 3794
Administrative Services, and delivered to the City of Columbus, 3795
Ohio. The City of Columbus, Ohio shall present the perpetual 3796
easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County 3797
Recorder. The City of Columbus, Ohio shall pay the costs 3798
associated with recording the perpetual easement. 3799
(E) This section shall expire three years after its 3800
effective date. 3801
Section 12. (A) The Director of Administrative Services is 3802
authorized to execute a perpetual easement burdening state-owned 3803
real estate under the jurisdiction of The Ohio State University, 3804
for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, 3805
repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or replacement of a 3806
sanitary sewer pipeline, in accordance with the following 3807
guidelines: 3808
Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 123.01 of the 3809
Revised Code, the Director of Administrative Services may 3810
execute a perpetual easement in the name of the state with the 3811
city of Columbus, Ohio, an Ohio municipal corporation, and its 3812
successors and assigns, for the installation, construction, 3813
operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or 3814
replacement of a sanitary sewer pipeline, burdening the 3815
following described real estate: 3816

H. B. No. 379 Page 135
As Introduced
Situated in the state of Ohio, county of Franklin, city of 3817
Columbus, lying in Quarter Township 3, Township 1, Range 18, 3818
United State Military District, being on, over, and across that 3819
60.82 acre tract conveyed to state of Ohio by deed of record in 3820
Deed Book 103, Page 552 and that 79.59 acre tract conveyed to 3821
The State of Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 428, Page 192, 3822
(all references are to the records of the Recorder's Office, 3823
Franklin County, Ohio) being more particularly described as 3824
follows: 3825
Beginning, for reference, in the easterly line of said 3826
79.59 acre tract, at the southwest corner of Lot 45 of that 3827
subdivision entitled ''R.P. Woodruffs", of record in Plat Book 3828
3, Page 421, being the westerly terminus of the northerly right- 3829
of-way line of Woodruff Avenue (60 feet in width), as dedicated 3830
by Plat Book 3, Page 421, and vacated by Ordinance Number 416- 3831
38; 3832
Thence South 03° 37' 41" West, with the westerly terminus 3833
of said Woodruff Avenue, a distance of 30.00 feet to a point at 3834
the westerly terminus of the centerline of said Woodruff Avenue, 3835
at a common corner of said 60.82 and 79.59 acre tracts; 3836
Thence South 13° 55' 11" West, with the line common to 3837
said 60.82 and 79.59 acre tracts, a distance of 179.93 feet to 3838
the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING; 3839
Thence across said 60.82 and 79.59 acre tracts, the 3840
following courses and distances: 3841
South 86° 24' 45" East, a distance of 88.00 feet to a 3842
point; 3843
South 86° 24' 00" East, a distance of 32.29 feet to a 3844
point; 3845

H. B. No. 379 Page 136
As Introduced
North 81° 20' 51" East, a distance of 68.63 feet to a 3846
point; 3847
North 03° 51' 45" East, a distance of 12.79 feet to a 3848
point; 3849
South 86° 07' 43" East, a distance of 40.00 feet to a 3850
point; 3851
South 03° 51' 45" West, a distance of 44.88 feet to a 3852
point; 3853
South 81° 20' 51" West, a distance of 105.02 feet to a 3854
point; 3855
North 86° 24' 00" West, a distance of 36.58 feet to a 3856
point; 3857
North 86° 24' 45" West, a distance of 438.94 feet to a 3858
point; and 3859
North 41° 30' 46" West, a distance of 18.74 feet to a 3860
point in the easterly right-of-way line of Olentangy River Road; 3861
Thence North 04° 39' 57" East, with said easterly right- 3862
of-way line, a distance of 55.44 feet to a point; 3863
Thence South 41° 30' 46" East, across said 79.59 acre 3864
tract, a distance of 40.60 feet to a point; 3865
Thence South 86° 24' 45" East, across said 79.59 acre 3866
tract, a distance of 334.42 feet to the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, 3867
containing 0.561 acre, more or less, out of Auditor Parcel 3868
Numbers 010-067007 and 010-203994. 3869
The coordinates shown hereon are based on the Ohio State 3870
Plane Coordinate System, South Zone, NAD 83 (1986). Said 3871
coordinates originated from a field traverse which was tied 3872

H. B. No. 379 Page 137
As Introduced
(referenced) to said coordinate system by Static GPS 3873
observations of Franklin County Engineering Department monuments 3874
COC4-83 and RINGLE, with a bearing of North 34° 13' 31" East 3875
between said monuments. 3876
The foregoing legal description may be corrected or 3877
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 3878
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 3879
facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. 3880
(B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, 3881
and the duties to be observed and performed by the city of 3882
Columbus, Ohio, with regard to the perpetual easement, and 3883
require the city of Columbus, Ohio to assume perpetual 3884
responsibility for the installation, construction, operation, 3885
maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or 3886
replacement of the sanitary sewer pipeline that is currently 3887
located on the real estate. 3888
(C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual 3889
easement shall be $1.00. 3890
(D) The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare 3891
the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall state the 3892
consideration and the terms and conditions for the granting of 3893
the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed 3894
by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the 3895
State, be kept in the records of the Department of 3896
Administrative Services, and delivered to the city of Columbus, 3897
Ohio. The city of Columbus, Ohio shall present the perpetual 3898
easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County 3899
Recorder. The city of Columbus, Ohio shall pay the costs 3900
associated with recording the perpetual easement. 3901

H. B. No. 379 Page 138
As Introduced
(E) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 3902
date. 3903
Section 13. (A) The Director of Administrative Services is 3904
authorized to execute a perpetual easement burdening state-owned 3905
real estate under the jurisdiction of The Ohio State University, 3906
for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, 3907
repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or replacement of a 3908
thirty-inch sanitary sewer pipeline, in accordance with the 3909
following guidelines: 3910
Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 123.01 of the 3911
Revised Code, the Director of Administrative Services may 3912
execute a perpetual easement in the name of the state with the 3913
city of Columbus, Ohio, an Ohio municipal corporation, and its 3914
successors and assigns, for the installation, construction, 3915
operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, use, servicing 3916
and/or replacement of a thirty-inch (30") sanitary sewer 3917
pipeline, burdening the following described real estate: 3918
0.087-ACRE DESCRIPTION 3919
Being Situated in the state of Ohio, county of Franklin, 3920
city of Columbus, Quarter Township 3, Township 1N, Range 18W, 3921
United States Military Lands and being part of an original 3922
56.66-acre tract as conveyed to state of Ohio by deed of record 3923
in Deed Book 564, Page 9 of the Recorder's Office, Franklin 3924
County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: 3925
Commencing at an aluminum disk in PVC encased concrete 3926
found in a monument box at an angle point in the centerline of 3927
Kenny Road (Width Varies), designation FCGS 1160, said point 3928
being part of the Franklin County Survey Control network and 3929
also being along the easterly line of an original 75.38-acre 3930

H. B. No. 379 Page 139
As Introduced
tract as conveyed to state of Ohio by deed of record in Deed 3931
Book 564, Page 8; 3932
Thence along the centerline of Kenny Road, the easterly 3933
line of said 75.38-acre tract, and the easterly line of an 3934
original 56.66-acre tract as conveyed to state of Ohio in Deed 3935
Book 564, Page 9, North 03° 35' 03" East for a distance of 92.12 3936
feet to the True Point of Beginning; 3937
Thence leaving the centerline of Kenny Road and across 3938
said 56.66-acre tract for the following three courses: 3939
1. North 87° 13' 13" West for a distance of 151.58 feet to 3940
a point; 3941
2. North 02° 46' 47" East for a distance of 25.00 feet to 3942
a point; 3943
3. South 87° 13' 13" East for a distance of 151.93 feet to 3944
a point in the centerline of Kenny Road and the easterly line of 3945
said 56.66-acre tract; 3946
Thence along the centerline of Kenny Road and the easterly 3947
line of said 56.66-acre tract, South 03° 35' 03" West for a 3948
distance of 25.00 feet to the True Point of Beginning, 3949
containing 0.087 acres, more or less, all of which are within 3950
Auditor's Parcel Number 010-203994, subject however to all other 3951
legal rights of way, easements and agreements of record. 3952
Bearings are based on the centerline of Kenny Road being N 3953
03° 35' 03" E as referenced to the State Plane Coordinate 3954
System, Ohio South Zone, NAD 83 with 2011 NSRS Adjustment. 3955
0.479-ACRE DESCRIPTION 3956
Being Situated in the state of Ohio, county of Franklin, 3957
city of Columbus, Quarter Township 3, Township 1N, Range 18W, 3958

H. B. No. 379 Page 140
As Introduced
United States Military Lands and being part of a Reserve and 3959
Lots Numbered 33-35, 39, 40, 89 & 90 as the same are numbered 3960
and delineated upon the recorded plat of Wood-Brown Place (Plat 3961
Book 5, Page 196) and also being parts of lands owned by the 3962
state of Ohio as conveyed in Deed Book 649, Pages 245, 246, 248, 3963
249, 328 and Deed Book 694, Page 373 of the Recorder's Office, 3964
Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as 3965
follows: 3966
Commencing at an aluminum disk in PVC encased concrete 3967
found in a monument box at an angle point in the centerline of 3968
Kenny Road (Width Varies), designation FCGS 1160, said point 3969
being part of the Franklin County Survey Control; 3970
Thence along the centerline of Kenny Road, North 03° 35' 3971
03" East for a distance of 92.12 feet to a point; 3972
Thence leaving the centerline of Kenny Road, South 87° 13' 3973
13" East for a distance of 25.00 feet to a point on the existing 3974
westerly line of said state of Ohio Lands, said point being True 3975
Point of Beginning; 3976
Thence along the existing westerly line of said state of 3977
Ohio lands, North 03° 35' 03" East for a distance of 25.00 feet 3978
to a point; 3979
Thence across said state of Ohio lands the following four 3980
courses: 3981
1. South 87° 13' 13" East for a distance of 185.10 feet to 3982
a point; 3983
2. North 88° 27' 19" East for a distance of 251.68 feet to 3984
a point; 3985
3. North 70° 38' 49" East for a distance of 372.16 feet to 3986

H. B. No. 379 Page 141
As Introduced
a point; 3987
4. North 68° 13' 01" East for a distance of 22.40 feet to 3988
a point on the easterly line of said state of Ohio lands and the 3989
existing westerly railroad right of way as partitioned to CSX 3990
Transportation, Inc. in Complete Record 8, Page 459 of the 3991
Probate Records, Franklin County, Ohio and affected by Article 3992
of Merger in Official Record 13283, Page G13 of the Recorder's 3993
Office, Franklin County, Ohio; 3994
Thence with the easterly line of said state of Ohio lands 3995
and the existing westerly railroad right of way, South 11° 29' 3996
43" East for a distance of 25.41 feet to a point; 3997
Thence across said state of Ohio lands the following four 3998
courses: 3999
1. South 68° 13' 01" West for a distance of 18.39 feet to 4000
a point; 4001
2. South 70° 38' 49" West for a distance of 376.60 feet to 4002
a point; 4003
3. South 88° 27' 19" West for a distance of 256.54 feet to 4004
a point; 4005
4. North 87° 13' 13" West for a distance of 186.39 feet to 4006
the True Point of Beginning, containing 0.479 acres, more or 4007
less, all of which are within Auditor's Parcel Number 010- 4008
204047, subject however to all other legal rights of way, 4009
easements and agreements of record. 4010
Bearings are based on the centerline of Kenny Road being N 4011
03° 35' 03" E as referenced to the State Plane Coordinate 4012
System, Ohio South Zone, NAD 83 with 2011 NSRS Adjustment. 4013
0.872-ACRE DESCRIPTION 4014

H. B. No. 379 Page 142
As Introduced
Being Situated in the state of Ohio, county of Franklin, 4015
city of Columbus, Quarter Township 3, Township 1N, Range 18W, 4016
United States Military Lands and being part of an original 4017
79.59-acre tract as conveyed to The State of Ohio by deed of 4018
record in Deed Book 428, Page 192 of the Recorder's Office, 4019
Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as 4020
follows: 4021
Commencing at angle point on the existing easterly limited 4022
access right of way of State Route 315 (FRA-315-2.85) and the 4023
grantor's westerly line, said point being located 115 feet right 4024
of station 118+00.00 (FRA-315-2.85); 4025
Thence along the existing easterly limited access right of 4026
way of State Route 315 (FRA-315-2.85) and the grantor's westerly 4027
line, North 00° 02' 46" West for a distance of 251.17 feet to 4028
the True Point of Beginning; 4029
Thence continuing along the existing easterly limited 4030
access right of way of State Route 315 (FRA-315-2.85) and the 4031
grantor's westerly line, North 00° 02' 46" West for a distance 4032
of 26.64 feet to a point; 4033
Thence across the grantor's property the following eleven 4034
courses: 4035
(1) North 69° 45' 55" East for a distance of 375.30 feet; 4036
(2) South 80° 21' 24" East for a distance of 287.18 feet; 4037
(3) North 76° 50' 24" East for a distance of 124.49 feet; 4038
(4) South 86° 07' 10" East for a distance of 331.14 feet; 4039
(5) South 86° 20' 13" East for a distance of 402.48 feet; 4040
(6) South 03° 39' 47" West for a distance of 25.00 feet; 4041

H. B. No. 379 Page 143
As Introduced
(7) North 86° 20' 13" West for a distance of 402.52 feet; 4042
(8) North 86° 07' 10" West for a distance of 327.44 feet; 4043
(9) South 76° 50' 24" West for a distance of 125.78 feet; 4044
(10) North 80° 21' 24" West for a distance of 285.55 feet; 4045
(11) South 69° 45' 55" West for a distance of 377.82 feet 4046
to the True Point of Beginning, containing 0.872 acres, more or 4047
less, all of which are within Auditor's Parcel Number 010- 4048
203994, subject however to all other legal rights of way, 4049
easements and agreements of record. 4050
Bearings are based on the centerline of State Route 315 4051
being N 06° 58' 10" W as referenced to the State Plane 4052
Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone, NAD 83 with 2011 NSRS 4053
Adjustment. 4054
Stations are based on ODOT Right of Way Plan Set "FRA-315- 4055
2.85", dated March 03, 1973. 4056
The foregoing legal descriptions may be corrected or 4057
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 4058
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 4059
facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. 4060
(B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, 4061
and the duties to be observed and performed by, the city of 4062
Columbus, Ohio with regard to the perpetual easement, and 4063
require the city of Columbus, Ohio to assume perpetual 4064
responsibility for the installation, construction, operation, 4065
maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or 4066
replacement of the thirty-inch (30") sanitary sewer pipeline 4067
that is currently located on the real estate. 4068
(C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual 4069

H. B. No. 379 Page 144
As Introduced
easement shall be $1.00. 4070
(D) The Director of the Department of Administrative 4071
Services shall prepare the perpetual easement. The perpetual 4072
easement shall state the consideration and the terms and 4073
conditions for the granting of the perpetual easement. The 4074
perpetual easement shall be executed by the Director of 4075
Administrative Services in the name of the state, be kept in the 4076
records of the Department of Administrative Services, and 4077
delivered to the city of Columbus, Ohio. The city of Columbus, 4078
Ohio shall present the perpetual easement for recording in the 4079
Office of the Franklin County Recorder. The city of Columbus, 4080
Ohio shall pay the costs associated with recording the perpetual 4081
easement. 4082
(E) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 4083
date. 4084
Section 14. (A) The Director of Administrative Services is 4085
authorized to execute a perpetual easement burdening state-owned 4086
real estate under the jurisdiction of The Ohio State University, 4087
for the installation, construction, reconstruction, use, 4088
operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, removal, servicing 4089
and improvement of one twenty-inch natural gas pipeline with a 4090
maximum operating pressure of 190 psig, two twelve-inch natural 4091
gas pipelines, one eight-inch natural gas pipeline, one two-inch 4092
natural gas pipeline, two gas house facilities and two valves, 4093
in accordance with the following guidelines: 4094
Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 123.01 of the 4095
Revised Code, the Director of Administrative Services may 4096
execute a perpetual easement in the name of the State with 4097
Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc., an Ohio corporation, and its 4098
successors and assigns, for the installation, construction, 4099

H. B. No. 379 Page 145
As Introduced
reconstruction, use, operation, maintenance, repair, 4100
replacement, removal, servicing, and improvement of one twenty- 4101
inch natural gas pipeline with a maximum operating pressure of 4102
190 psig, two twelve-inch natural gas pipelines, one eight-inch 4103
natural gas pipeline, one two-inch natural gas pipeline, two gas 4104
house facilities and two valves, burdening the following 4105
described real estate: 4106
2.583-ACRE DESCRIPTION 4107
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of 4108
Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United 4109
States Military Lands, being a 40 foot wide Pipeline Easement to 4110
Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the lands of The 4111
State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-203996) as conveyed to them by 4112
deed in Deed Vol. 942, Page 326 as recorded in the Recorder's 4113
Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly 4114
described as follows: 4115
Commencing in a ¾ inch iron rod found in the intersection 4116
of the Northerly right-of-way of Zollinger Road (As dedicated by 4117
the plat of Wright Place, PB40, Pg4) and the Southwesterly 4118
corner of Lot 4 of said Wright Place, THENCE; 4119
Leaving said intersection, and in the Westerly line of 4120
said Wright Place, and the Westerly line of Section 3, South 03° 4121
07' 21" West, 12.52 feet to a point in the Northwesterly corner 4122
of said State of Ohio lands, and being THE TRUE POINT OF 4123
BEGINNING of the herein described 40' Pipeline Easement, THENCE; 4124
(1) Leaving the Westerly line of said Wright Place, and in 4125
the Northerly line of said State of Ohio lands, South 86° 23' 4126
34" East, 2336.70 feet to a point in the Northerly extension of 4127
the Westerly line of Kenny Road (ROW Varies), THENCE; 4128

H. B. No. 379 Page 146
As Introduced
(2) Leaving said Northerly line, and in said Westerly 4129
right-of-way-line, South 33° 49' 27" East, 151.29 feet to a 4130
point, THENCE; 4131
(3) Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 4132
37° 57' 29" East, 190.98 feet to a point, THENCE; 4133
(4) Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 4134
26° 19' 17" East, 152.69 feet to a point, THENCE; 4135
(5) Leaving said Westerly right-of-way, and over and 4136
across the lands of the aforementioned State of Ohio, South 82° 4137
38' 04" West, 45.50 feet to a point, THENCE; 4138
(6) Continuing in said easement line, North 25° 01' 19" 4139
West, 133.73 feet to a point, THENCE; 4140
(7) Continuing in said easement line, North 38° 21' 18" 4141
West 188.34 feet to a point, THENCE; 4142
(8) Continuing in said easement line, North 33° 19' 52" 4143
West, 133.35 feet to a point, THENCE; 4144
(9) Continuing in said easement line, North 86° 23' 34" 4145
West 2316.39 feet to a point in the Westerly line of the 4146
Grantor, also being the Westerly line of said Section 3, THENCE; 4147
(10) In said Westerly line, North 3° 07' 21" East, 40.00 4148
feet to THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described 4149
Pipeline Easement, containing 112,533.64 Sq. Ft. or 2.583 Acres 4150
of land. 4151
Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions 4152
of record. 4153
Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 942, Page 326 4154
Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN 4155

H. B. No. 379 Page 147
As Introduced
observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the 4156
Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 4157
2023.0425, resulting in the Northerly line of the State of Ohio 4158
being South 86° 23' 34" East. 4159
The above legal description is the result of an actual 4160
field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of 4161
Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 4162
in April of 2023. 4163
0.051-ACRE DESCRIPTION 4164
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of 4165
Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United 4166
States Military Lands, being a Gas Facilities and Regulator 4167
Easement granted to Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and 4168
across the lands of The State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-203996) as 4169
conveyed to them by deed in Deed Vol. 942, Page 326 as recorded 4170
in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more 4171
particularly described as follows: 4172
Commencing in a 3/4 inch iron rod found in the 4173
intersection of the Northerly right-of-way of Zollinger Road (As 4174
dedicated by the plat of Wright Place, PB40, Pg4) and the 4175
Southwesterly corner of Lot 4 of said Wright Place, THENCE; 4176
Leaving said intersection, and in the Westerly line of 4177
said Wright Place, and the Westerly line of Section 3, South 03° 4178
07' 21" West, 12.52 feet to a point, THENCE; 4179
Leaving the Westerly line of said Wright Place, South 86° 4180
23' 34" East, 2336.70 feet to a point in the Westerly line of 4181
Kenny Road (ROW Varies), THENCE; 4182
In said Westerly right-of-way-line, South 33° 49' 27" 4183
East, 151.29 feet to a point, THENCE; 4184

H. B. No. 379 Page 148
As Introduced
Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 37° 4185
57' 29" East, 190.98 feet to a point, THENCE; 4186
Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 26° 4187
19' 17" East, 152.69 feet to a point, being THE TRUE POINT OF 4188
BEGINNING of the herein described gas facilities and regulator 4189
easement, THENCE; 4190
(1) Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 4191
26° 19' 17" East, 16.36 feet to a point, THENCE; 4192
(2) Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 4193
16° 03' 22" East, 34.93 feet to a point, THENCE; 4194
(3) Leaving said Westerly right-of-way line, in the said 4195
easement line and over and across the lands of the State of 4196
Ohio, South 82° 38' 04" West 40.46 feet to a point, THENCE; 4197
(4) Continuing in said easement line, North 24° 43' 22" 4198
West, 52.39 feet to a point in the Southwesterly corner of a 40' 4199
pipeline easement, THENCE; 4200
(5) In the Southerly line of said 40' pipeline easement, 4201
North 82° 38' 04" East 45.50 feet to THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING 4202
of the herein described Gas Facilities and Regulator Easement, 4203
containing 2,200.02 Sq. Ft. or 0.051 Acres of land. 4204
Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions 4205
of record. 4206
Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 942, Page 326 4207
Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN 4208
observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the 4209
Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 4210
2023.0425, resulting in the Northerly line of the State of Ohio 4211
being South 86° 23' 34" East. 4212

H. B. No. 379 Page 149
As Introduced
The above legal description is the result of an actual 4213
field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of 4214
Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 4215
in April of 2023. 4216
0.923-ACRE DESCRIPTION 4217
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of 4218
Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United 4219
States Military Lands, being a variable width Pipeline Easement 4220
to Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the lands of 4221
The State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-204024) as conveyed to them by 4222
deed in Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222 as recorded in the Recorder's 4223
Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly 4224
described as follows: 4225
Commencing in a found three-fourths inch iron pipe in the 4226
intersection of the Northerly right-of-way line of Ackerman 4227
Road. (variable ROW) and the Westerly right-of-way line of CSX 4228
Railroad (FKA Chesapeake and Ohio Railroad), THENCE; 4229
Leaving said Northerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, 4230
and in said Westerly right-of-way line of said CSX Railroad, 4231
South 11° 28' 15" East, 208.57 feet to a point, said point being 4232
101.38 feet right of centerline station 99+63.00 (Ackerman Road) 4233
and 50 feet left of station 227+17.14 of CSX Railroad as shown 4234
on SR 315 plans FRA-315-2.85-6.1 (1969), recorded in Plat Book 4235
41, Page 28 of the Franklin County Recorder's Office, also being 4236
THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Pipeline 4237
Easement, THENCE; 4238
(1) Leaving the Southerly right-of-way line of said 4239
Ackerman Road, and in said Westerly right-of-way line of CSX 4240
Railroad, South 11° 38' 11" East, 5.15 feet to a point, THENCE; 4241

H. B. No. 379 Page 150
As Introduced
(2) Leaving Westerly right-of-way line, and in the line of 4242
the herein described Pipeline Easement, North 88° 37' 20" West, 4243
632.50 feet to a point, THENCE; 4244
(3) Continuing in said Easement line, North 01° 22' 41" 4245
East, 35.50 feet to a point, THENCE; 4246
(4) Continuing in said Easement line, North 87° 55' 26" 4247
West, 30.84 feet to a point, THENCE; 4248
(5) Continuing in said Easement line, North 85° 00' 46" 4249
West, 107.98 feet to a point in the Easterly right-of-way line 4250
of Kenny Road (ROW Varies), THENCE; 4251
(6) In said Easterly right-of-way line, North 29° 48' 03" 4252
West, 30.17 feet to a point, THENCE; 4253
(7) In a line that transitions from the Easterly right-of- 4254
way line of Kenny Road to the Southerly right-of-way line of the 4255
aforementioned Ackerman Road, North 48° 23' 04" East, 34.71 feet 4256
to a point in the Southerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, 4257
THENCE; 4258
(8) Continuing in said Southerly right-of-way line, South 4259
84° 05' 33" East 100.08 feet to a point, THENCE; 4260
(9) Continuing in said Southerly right-of-way line, South 4261
88° 40' 26" East 100.08 feet to a point, THENCE; 4262
(10) Continuing in said Southerly right-of-way line, South 4263
82° 39' 48" East 200.34 feet to a point, THENCE; 4264
(11) Continuing in said Southerly right-of-way line, South 4265
79° 24' 51" East, 365.79 feet to THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of 4266
the herein described Pipeline Easement, containing 40,187.03 Sq. 4267
Ft. or 0.923 Acres of land. 4268

H. B. No. 379 Page 151
As Introduced
Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions 4269
of record. 4270
Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222 4271
Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN 4272
observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the 4273
Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 4274
2023.1212, resulting in the centerline of Ackerman Road being 4275
South 86° 23' 00" East. 4276
The above legal description is the result of an actual 4277
field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of 4278
Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 4279
in December of 2023. 4280
2.319-ACRE DESCRIPTION 4281
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of 4282
Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United 4283
States Military Lands, being a 50' wide Pipeline Easement to 4284
Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the lands of The 4285
State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-062731) as conveyed to them by 4286
deed in Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; Bk. 804, Pg. 4287
360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 as recorded in 4288
the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more 4289
particularly described as follows: 4290
Commencing in a found ¾ inch iron pipe in the intersection 4291
of the Northerly right-of-way of Ackerman Road (variable ROW) 4292
and the Easterly right-of-way of State Route 315 (SR315), 4293
THENCE; 4294
Leaving said Northerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, 4295
and in a tie-line, South 16° 50' 22" East, 170.68 feet to a 4296
point, said point being 70.00 feet right of centerline station 4297

H. B. No. 379 Page 152
As Introduced
107+10.00 (Ackerman Road) and 364.65 feet right of station 4298
172+01.48 of State Route 315 as shown on SR 315 plans FRA-315- 4299
2.85-6.1 (1969), recorded in Plat Book 41, Page 28 of the 4300
Franklin County Recorder's Office, also being THE TRUE POINT OF 4301
BEGINNING of the herein described Pipeline Easement, THENCE; 4302
Leaving said Easterly right-of-way line of SR315, and in 4303
the Southerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, North 89° 06' 4304
10" East, 190.59 feet to a point, THENCE; 4305
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" 4306
East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; 4307
Continuing in said right-of-way line, North 89° 53' 52" 4308
East, 200.42 feet to a point, THENCE; 4309
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" 4310
East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; 4311
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 84° 05' 34" 4312
East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE; 4313
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 88° 40' 26" 4314
East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE; 4315
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" 4316
East, 200.00 feet to a point, THENCE; 4317
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 85° 27' 42" 4318
East, 495.54 feet to a point, THENCE; 4319
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 79° 25' 21" 4320
East, 93.73 feet to a point, THENCE; 4321
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 64° 37' 23" 4322
East, 151.47 feet to a point, THENCE; 4323
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 87° 02' 07" 4324

H. B. No. 379 Page 153
As Introduced
East, 25.58 feet to a point, THENCE; 4325
Continuing in said right-of-way line, In a curve to the 4326
right, having a radius of 608.86 feet, an arc length of 69.11 4327
feet, and a delta angle of 06° 30' 14", also having a chord 4328
bearing South 55° 43' 12" East, with a chord distance of 69.08 4329
feet to a point, THENCE; 4330
Leaving said Southerly right-of-way-line, and in the line 4331
of the herein described Pipeline Easement, South 38° 03' 22" 4332
West, 28.64 feet to a point in the Northeasterly corner of the 4333
existing Gas Facilities and Regulator Easement, THENCE; 4334
In the Northerly line of said Easement, North 88° 14' 34" 4335
West, 55.00 feet to a point in the Northwesterly corner of said 4336
station, THENCE; 4337
Leaving said station and over and across the lands of the 4338
aforementioned State of Ohio, North 64° 19' 55" West, 180.19 4339
feet to a point, THENCE; 4340
Continuing in said easement line, North 79° 25' 21" West, 4341
84.59 feet to a point, THENCE; 4342
Continuing in said easement line, North 85° 27' 42" West, 4343
492.50 feet to a point, THENCE; 4344
Continuing in said easement line, North 86° 23' 00" West, 4345
198.60 feet to a point, THENCE; 4346
Continuing in said easement line, North 88° 40' 26" West, 4347
201.16 feet to a point, THENCE; 4348
Continuing in said easement line, North 84° 05' 34" West, 4349
201.16 feet to a point, THENCE; 4350
Continuing in said easement line, North 86° 23' 00" West, 4351

H. B. No. 379 Page 154
As Introduced
97.38 feet to a point, THENCE; 4352
Continuing in said easement line, South 89° 53' 52" West, 4353
200.42 feet, to a point, THENCE; 4354
Continuing in said easement line, North 86° 23' 00" West, 4355
99.65 feet to a point, THENCE; 4356
Continuing in said easement line, South 89° 04' 29" West, 4357
212.08 feet to a point in the aforementioned Easterly right-of- 4358
way of SR315, THENCE; 4359
In said Easterly right-of-way line, North 24° 11' 27" 4360
East, 55.32 feet to THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein 4361
described Pipeline Easement, containing 101,040.12 Sq. Ft. or 4362
2.319 Acres of land. 4363
Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions 4364
of record. 4365
Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; 4366
Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 4367
Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN 4368
observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the 4369
Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 4370
2023.1212, resulting in the centerline of Ackerman Road being 4371
South 86° 23' 00" East. 4372
The above legal description is the result of an actual 4373
field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of 4374
Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 4375
in December of 2023. 4376
0.111-ACRE DESCRIPTION 4377
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of 4378

H. B. No. 379 Page 155
As Introduced
Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United 4379
States Military Lands, being an Access Easement to Columbia Gas 4380
of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the lands of The State of Ohio 4381
(Parcel No. 010-062731) as conveyed to them by deed in Deed Vol. 4382
2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 4383
339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 as recorded in the Recorder's 4384
Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly 4385
described as follows: 4386
Commencing in a found ¾ inch iron pipe in the intersection 4387
of the Northerly right-of-way of Ackerman Road (variable ROW) 4388
and the Easterly right-of-way of State Route 315 (SR315), 4389
THENCE; 4390
Leaving said Northerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, 4391
and in a tie-line, South 16° 50' 22" East, 170.68 feet to a 4392
point, said point being 70.00 feet right of centerline station 4393
107+10.00 (Ackerman Road) and 364.65 feet right of station 4394
172+01.48 of State Route 315 as shown on SR 315 plans FRA-315- 4395
2.85-6.1 (1969), recorded in Plat Book 41, Page 28 of the 4396
Franklin County Recorder's Office, THENCE; 4397
Leaving said Easterly right-of-way line of SR315, and in 4398
the Southerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, North 89° 06' 4399
10" East, 190.59 feet to a point, THENCE; 4400
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" 4401
East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; 4402
Continuing in said right-of-way line, North 89° 53' 52" 4403
East, 200.42 feet to a point, THENCE; 4404
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" 4405
East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; 4406
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 84° 05' 34" 4407

H. B. No. 379 Page 156
As Introduced
East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE; 4408
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 88° 40' 26" 4409
East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE; 4410
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" 4411
East, 200.00 feet to a point, THENCE; 4412
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 85° 27' 42" 4413
East, 495.54 feet to a point, THENCE; 4414
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 79° 25' 21" 4415
East, 93.73 feet to a point, THENCE; 4416
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 64° 37' 23" 4417
East, 100.06 feet to a point, also being THE TRUE POINT OF 4418
BEGINNING of the herein described Access Easement, THENCE; 4419
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 64° 37' 23" 4420
East, 21.73 feet to a point, THENCE; 4421
Leaving said right-of-way line, and over and across the 4422
lands of the aforementioned State of Ohio, in the line of the 4423
herein described Access Easement, South 02° 21' 13" West, 87.66 4424
feet to a point, THENCE; 4425
South 88° 14' 34" East, 39.96 feet to a point in the 4426
Westerly line of the existing Gas Facilities and Regulator 4427
Easement, THENCE; 4428
In the Westerly line of said Easement, North 88° 14' 34" 4429
West, 60.48 feet to a point, THENCE; 4430
Continuing over and across the lands of the aforementioned 4431
State of Ohio, North 02° 21' 13" East, 146.34 feet to THE TRUE 4432
POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Access Easement, 4433
containing 4,851.11 Sq. Ft. or 0.111 Acres of land. 4434

H. B. No. 379 Page 157
As Introduced
Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions 4435
of record. 4436
Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; 4437
Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 4438
Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN 4439
observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the 4440
Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 4441
2023.1212, resulting in the centerline of Ackerman Road being 4442
South 86° 23' 00" East. 4443
The above legal description is the result of an actual 4444
field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of 4445
Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 4446
in December of 2023. 4447
0.082-ACRE DESCRIPTION 4448
Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of 4449
Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United 4450
States Military Lands, being a Gas Facilities and Regulator 4451
Easement to Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the 4452
lands of The State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-062731) as conveyed 4453
to them by deed in Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; 4454
Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 as 4455
recorded in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and 4456
being more particularly described as follows: 4457
Commencing in a found ¾ inch iron pipe in the intersection 4458
of the Northerly right-of-way of Ackerman Road (variable ROW) 4459
and the Easterly right-of-way of State Route 315 (SR315), 4460
THENCE; 4461
Leaving said Northerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, 4462
and in a tie-line, South 16° 50' 22" East, 170.68 feet to a 4463

H. B. No. 379 Page 158
As Introduced
point, said point being 70.00 feet right of centerline station 4464
107+10.00 (Ackerman Road) and 364.65 feet right of station 4465
172+01.48 of State Route 315 as shown on SR 315 plans FRA-315- 4466
2.85-6.1 (1969), recorded in Plat Book 41, Page 28 of the 4467
Franklin County Recorder's Office, THENCE; 4468
Leaving said Easterly right-of-way line of SR315, and in 4469
the Southerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, North 89° 06' 4470
10" East, 190.59 feet to a point, THENCE; 4471
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" 4472
East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; 4473
Continuing in said right-of-way line, North 89° 53' 52" 4474
East, 200.42 feet to a point, THENCE; 4475
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" 4476
East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; 4477
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 84° 05' 34" 4478
East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE; 4479
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 88° 40' 26" 4480
East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE;` 4481
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" 4482
East, 200.00 feet to a point, THENCE; 4483
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 85° 27' 42" 4484
East, 495.54 feet to a point, THENCE; 4485
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 79° 25' 21" 4486
East, 93.73 feet to a point, THENCE; 4487
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 64° 37' 23" 4488
East, 151.47 feet to a point, THENCE; 4489
Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 87° 02' 07" 4490

H. B. No. 379 Page 159
As Introduced
East, 25.58 feet to a point, THENCE; 4491
Continuing in said right-of-way line, In a curve to the 4492
right, having a radius of 608.86 feet, an arc length of 69.11 4493
feet, and a delta angle of 06° 30' 14", also having a chord 4494
bearing South 55° 43' 12" East, with a chord distance of 69.08 4495
feet to a point, THENCE; 4496
Leaving said Southerly right-of-way-line, and in the 4497
Easterly line of a Pipeline Easement, South 38° 03' 22" West, 4498
28.64 feet to a point, being the Northeasterly corner, and THE 4499
TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Gas Facilities 4500
and Regulator Easement, THENCE; 4501
Continuing over and across the lands of the aforementioned 4502
State of Ohio and in the Easterly line of said Easement, South 4503
01° 45' 26" West, 65.00 feet to a point, THENCE; 4504
Continuing over and across the lands of the aforementioned 4505
State of Ohio, North 88° 14' 34" West, 55.00 feet to a point in 4506
the Easterly line of an Access Easement, THENCE; 4507
In said Easterly line, North 01° 45' 26" East, 65.00 feet 4508
to a point, THENCE; 4509
South 88° 14' 34" East, 55.00 feet to THE TRUE POINT OF 4510
BEGINNING of the herein described Gas Facilities and Regulator 4511
Easement, containing 3,575.00 Sq. Ft. or 0.082 Acres of land. 4512
Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions 4513
of record. 4514
Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; 4515
Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 4516
Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN 4517
observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the 4518

H. B. No. 379 Page 160
As Introduced
Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 4519
2023.1212, resulting in the centerline of Ackerman Road being 4520
South 86° 23' 00" East. 4521
The above legal description is the result of an actual 4522
field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of 4523
Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 4524
in December of 2023. 4525
The foregoing legal descriptions may be corrected or 4526
modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final 4527
form if such corrections or modifications are needed to 4528
facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. 4529
(B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, 4530
and the duties to be observed and performed by Columbia Gas of 4531
Ohio, Inc., with regard to the perpetual easement, and require 4532
Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. to assume perpetual responsibility 4533
for the installation, construction, reconstruction, use, 4534
operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, removal, servicing 4535
and improvement of one (1) twenty-inch (20") natural gas 4536
pipeline with a maximum operating pressure of 190 psig, two (2) 4537
twelve-inch (12") natural gas pipelines, one (1) eight-inch (8") 4538
natural gas pipeline, one (1) two-inch (2") natural gas 4539
pipeline, two (2) gas house facilities and two (2) valves that 4540
are currently located on the real estate. 4541
(C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual 4542
easement shall be at a price acceptable to the Director of 4543
Administrative Services and Board of Trustees of The Ohio State 4544
University. 4545
(D) The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare 4546
the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed 4547

H. B. No. 379 Page 161
As Introduced
by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the 4548
State, be kept in the records of the Department of 4549
Administrative Services, and delivered to Columbia Gas of Ohio, 4550
Inc. Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc., shall present the perpetual 4551
easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County 4552
Recorder. Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc., shall pay the costs 4553
associated with recording the perpetual easement. 4554
(E) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective 4555
date. 4556